THE LIFE OF JESUS
THE
WORD
MADE
FLESH
In the beginning was the Word, and the Word was
with God, and the Word was God. The same was in the
beginning with God. All things were made through him;
and without him was not anything made that hath been
In him was life; and the life was the light of men.
made.
And the light shineth in the darkness; and the darkness
apprehended it not. There came a man, sent from God,
whose name was John. The same came for witness, that
he might bear witness of the light, that all might believe
through him. He was not the light, but came that he might
bear witness of the light. There was the true light, even
the light which lighteth every man, coming into the world.
He was in the world, and the world was made through him,
and the world knew him not. He came unto his own, and
they that were his own received him not. But as many as
received him, to them gave he the right to become children
of God, even to them that believe on his name: who were
born, not of blood, nor of the will of the flesh, nor of the
will of man, but of God. And the Word became flesh, and
dwelt among us (and we beheld his glory, glory as of the
only begotten from the Father), full of grace and truth.
THE
BIRTH
AND
CHILDHOOD
OF
JESUS
a de-
Now it came to pass in those days, there went out
be
should
world
the
all
that
us,
August
Cesar
cree from
Quiri-
when
made
ent
enrolled. This was the first enrolm
to enrol them-
nius was governor of Syria. And all went
also went up
Joseph
And
selves, every one to his own city.
Judza, to
into
th,
Nazare
of
city
the
of
from Galilee, out
e he
becaus
hem,
the city of David, which is called Bethle
enrol himself with
was of the house and family of David; to
betrothed to him, being great with child.
Mary, who was
385386
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
And it came to pass, while they were there, the days were
fulfilled that she should be delivered.
And she brought
forth her first-born son; and she wrapped him in swaddling
clothes, and laid him in a manger, because there was no
room for them in the inn.
And there were shepherds in the same country abiding in
the field, and keeping watch by night over their flock. And
an angel of the Lord stood by them, and the glory of the
Lord shone round about them: and they. were sore afraid.
And the angel said unto them, Be not afraid; for behold, I
bring you good tidings of great joy which shall be to all the
people: for there is born to you this day in the city of David
a Saviour, who is Christ the Lord. And this is the sign
unto you: Ye shall find a babe wrapped in swaddling
clothes, and lying in a manger.
And suddenly there was
with the angel a multitude of the heavenly host praising
God, and saying,
Glory to God in the highest,
And on earth peace among men in whom he is well
pleased.
And it came to pass, when the angels went away from
them into heaven, the shepherds said one to another, Let us
now go even unto Bethlehem, and see this thing that is
come to pass, which the Lord hath made known unto us.
And they came with haste, and found both Mary and Jo-
seph, and the babe lying in the manger. And when they saw
it, they made known concerning the saying which was spoken
to them about this child. And all that heard it wondered
at the things which were spoken unto them by the shepherds.
But Mary kept all these sayings, pondering them in her
heart. And the shepherds returned, glorifying and praising
God for all the things that they had heard and seen, even
as it was spoken unto them.
And when eight days were fulfilled for circumcising him,
his name was called JESUS.
Now when Jesus was born in Bethlehem of Judza in the
days of Herod the king, behold, Wise-men from the east
came to Jerusalem saying, Where is he that is born King
of the Jews? for we saw his star in the east, and are come
to worship him. And when Herod the king heard it, he
was troubled, and all Jerusalem with him. And gatheringTHE
LIFE
OF
JESUS
387
together all the chief priests and scribes of the people, he
inquired of them where the Christ should be born. And
they said unto him, In Bethlehem of Judea: for thus it is
written through the prophet,
And thou Bethlehem, land of Judah,
Art in no wise least among the princes of Judah:
For out of thee shall come forth a governor,
Who shall be shepherd of my people Israel.
Then Herod privily called the Wise-men, and learned of
them exactly what time the star appeared.
And he sent
them to Bethlehem, and said, Go and search out exactly
concerning the young child; and when ye have found him,
bring me word, that I also may come and worship him. And
they, having heard the king, went their way; and lo, the
star, which they saw in the east, went before them, till it
came and stood over where the young child was. And when
they saw the star, they rejoiced with exceeding great joy.
And they came into the house and saw the young child with
Mary his mother; and they fell down and worshipped him;
and opening their treasures they offered unto him gifts, gold
and frankincense and myrrh. And being warned of God in
a dream that they should not return to Herod, they departed
into their own country another way.
Now when they were departed, behold, an angel of the
Lord appeareth to Joseph in a dream, saying, Arise and
take the young child and his mother, and flee into Egypt,
and be thou there until I tell thee: for Herod will seek the
young child to destroy him. And he arose and took the
young child and his mother by night, and departed into
Egypt; and was there until the death of Herod: that it
might be fulfilled which was spoken by the Lord through
the prophet, saying, Out of Egypt did I call my son.
Then Herod, when he saw that he was mocked of the
Wise-men, was exceeding wroth, and sent forth, and slew
all the male children that were in Bethlehem, and in all
the borders thereof, from two years old and under, accord-
ing to the time which he had exactly learned of the Wise-
‘Then was fulfilled that which was spoken through
men.
Jeremiah the prophet, saying,
A voice was heard in Ramah,
Weeping and great mourning,388
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
Rachel weeping for her children;
And she would not be comforted, because they are not.
But when Herod was dead, behold, an angel of the Lord
Arise
appeareth in a dream to Joseph in Egypt, saying,
and take the young child and his mother, and go into the
land of Israel: for they are dead that sought the young
child’s life. And he arose and took the young child and his
But when he
mother, and came into the land of Israel.
heard that Archelaus was reigning over Judza in the room
of his father Herod, he was afraid to go thither; and being
warned of God in a dream, he withdrew into the parts of
Galilee, and came and dwelt in a city called Nazareth; that
it might be fulfilled which was spoken through the prophets
that he should be called a Nazarene.
And the child grew, and waxed strong, filled with wis-
dom: and the grace of God was upon him.
And his parents went every year to Jerusalem at the feast
of the passover. And when he was twelve years old, they
went up after the custom of the feast; and when they had
fulfilled the days, as they were returning, the boy Jesus tar-
ried behind in Jerusalem; and his parents knew it not; but
supposing him to be in the company, they went a day’s
journey; and they sought for him among their kinsfolk and
acquaintance: and when they found him not, they returned
to Jerusalem, seeking for him. And it came to pass, after
three days they found him in the temple, sitting in the midst
of the teachers, both hearing them, and asking them ques-
tions: and all that heard him were amazed at his under-
standing and his answers. And when they saw him, they
were astonished; and his mother said unto him, Son, why
hast thou thus dealt with us? behold, thy father and I
sought thee sorrowing.
And he said unto them, How
is it
that ye sought me? knew ye not that I must be in my
Father’s house? And they understood not the saying which
he spake unto them. And he went down with them, and
came to Nazareth; and he was subject unto them: and his
mother kept all these sayings in her heart.
And Jesus advanced in wisdom and. stature, and in favor
with God and men.THE’
JOHN
THE
BAPTIST
LIFE
OF:
JESUS:
AND THE OPENING
PUBLIC MINISTRY
|
389
OF
JESUS’
And in those days cometh John the Baptist, preaching in
the wilderness of Judza, saying, Repent ye; for the king-
dom of heaven is at hand.
Now John himself had his
raiment of camel’s hair, and a leathern girdle about his
loins; and his food was locusts and wild honey. Then went
out unto him Jerusalem, and all Judea, and all the region
round about the Jordan; and they were baptized of him in
the river Jordan, confessing their sins. But when he saw
many of the Pharisees and Sadducees coming to his baptism,
he said unto them, Ye offspring of vipers, who warned you
to flee from the wrath to come? Bring forth therefore fruit
worthy of repentance: and think not to say within your-
selves, We have Abraham to our father: for I say unto you,
that God is able of these stones to raise up children unto
Abraham.
And even now the axe lieth at the root of the
trees: every tree therefore that bringeth not forth good fruit
is hewn down, and cast into the fire. I indeed baptize you
in water unto repentance: but he that cometh after me is
mightier than I, whose shoes I am not worthy to-bear: he
shall baptize you in the Holy Spirit and in fire: whose fan
is in his hand, and he will thoroughly cleanse his threshing-
floor; and he will gather his wheat into the garner, but the.
chaff he will burn up with unquenchable fire.
Then cometh Jesus from Galilee to the Jordan unto John,
to be baptized of him. But John would have hindered him,
saying, I have need to be baptized of thee, and comest thou
to me? But Jesus answering said unto him, Suffer it now:
for thus it becometh us to fulfil all righteousness. Then he
suffereth him. And Jesus, when he was baptized, went up
straightway from the water: and lo, the heavens were opened
unto him, and he saw the Spirit of God descending as a
dove, and coming upon him; and lo, a voice out of the
heavens, saying, This is my beloved Son, in whom I am well
pleased.
And Jesus, full of the Holy Spirit, returned from the
Jordan, and was led in the Spirit in the wilderness during
forty days, being tempted of the devil.
And he did eat
nothing in those days: and when they were completed, he390
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
him, If thou art the Son
hungered. And the devil said unto
And
it become bread.
of God, command this stone that
live
not
shall
Man
en,
writt
is
It
,
Jesus answered untoshim
the
all
him
ed
show
and
by bread alone. And he led him up,
devil
the
And
time.
of
nt
mome
a
kingdoms of the world in
this authority, and the
said unto him, To thee will I give all
unto me; and to
ered
deliv
been
glory of them: for it hath
wilt worship
fore
whomsoever I will I give it. If thou there
ered and
answ
Jesus
And
.
thine
before me, it shall.all be
the Lord
hip
wors
shalt
Thou
en,
writt
is
It
said unto him,
him to
led
he
And
.
serve
thou
thy God, and him only shalt
temple, and
the
of
cle
pinna
the
on
him
set
and
Jerusalem,
cast thyself down
said unto him, If thou art the Son of God,
en,
writt
is
it
for
:
from hence
thee, to guard
He shall give his angels charge concerning
thee:
and,
“On their hands they shall bear thee up,
Lest haply thou dash thy foot against a stone.
is said, Thou shalt
And Jesus answering said unto him, It
God.
thy
not make trial of the Lord
temptation, he
And when the devil had completed every
.
departed from him for a season
, This was
John beareth witness of him, and crieth, saying
me is become before
he of whom I said, He that cometh after
all re-
s we
me: for he was before me. For of his fulnes
through
given
was
law
the
For
ceived, and grace for grace.
man
No
.
Christ
Jesus
gh
throu
came
truth
and
Moses; grace
is
who
Son,
ten
begot
only
hath seen God at any time; the
ed him.
in the bosom of the Father, he hath declar
sent unto
And this is the witness of John, when the Jews
Who
him,
ask
to
s
Levite
and
priests
lem
Jerusa
him from
con-
he
and
not;
denied
and
art thou? And he confessed,
fessed, I am
not the Christ.
And
they asked him, What
Art
not.
then? Art thou Elijah? And he saith, I am
said
They
No.
ed,
answer
he
And
t?
prophe
thou the
give an
therefore unto him, Who art thou? that we may
f?
thysel
of
thou
sayest
What
us.
sent
that
them
answer to
ness,
wilder
the
in
crying
He said, I am the voice of one
Make
prophet.
straight
the way
of the Lord,
as said
Isaiah
theTHE
On
the morrow
LIFE
OF
JESUS
391
he seeth Jesus coming unto him, and
saith, Behold, the Lamb of God, that taketh away the sin of
the world! This is he of whom I said, After me cometh a
man who is become before me: for he was before me. And
I knew him not; but that he should be made manifest to
Israel, for this cause came I baptizing in water. And John
bare witness, saying, I have beheld the Spirit descending as
a dove out of heaven; and it abode upon him. And I knew
him not: but he that sent me to baptize in water, he said
unto me, Upon whomsoever thou shalt see the Spirit descend-
ing, and abiding upon him, the same is he that baptizeth in
the Holy Spirit. And I have seen, and have borne witness
that this is the Son of God.
Again on the morrow John was standing, and two of his
disciples ;and he looked upon Jesus as he walked, and saith,
Behold, the Lamb of God!
And the two disciples heard
him speak, and they followed Jesus. And Jesus turned,
and beheld them following, and saith unto them, What seek
ye? And they said unto him, Rabbi (which is to say, being
interpreted, Teacher), where abidest thou? He saith unto
them, Come, and ye shall see. They came therefore and
saw where he abode; and they abode with him that day: it
was about the tenth hour. One of the two that heard John
speak, and followed him, was Andrew, Simon Peter’s
brother. He findeth first his own brother Simon, and saith
unto him, We have found the Messiah (which is, being in-
terpreted, Christ).
He brought him unto Jesus.
Jesus
looked upon him, and said, Thou art Simon the son of
John: thou shalt be called Cephas (which is by interpreta-
tion, Peter).
EARLY
MINISTRY
IN
GALILEE
AND
JUDZA
On the morrow he was minded to go forth into Galilee,
and he findeth Philip: and Jesus saith unto him, Follow me.
Now Philip was from Bethsaida, of the city of Andrew and
Peter.
Philip findeth Nathanael, and saith unto him, We
have found him, of whom Moses in the law, and the
prophets, wrote, Jesus of Nazareth, the son of Joseph. And
Nathanael said unto him, Can any good thing come out of
Nazareth?
Philip saith unto him, Come and see. Jesus392
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
saw Nathanael coming to him, and saith of him, Behold, an
Israelite indeed, in whom is no guile! Nathanael saith unto
him, Whence knowest thou me? Jesus answered and said
unto him, Before Philip called thee, when thou wast under
the fig-tree, I saw thee. Nathanael answered him, Rabbi,
thou art the son of God; thou art King of Israel. Jesus
answered and said unto him, Because I said unto thee, I
saw thee underneath the fig-tree, believest thou? thou shalt
see greater things than these. And he saith unto him, Ver-
ily, verily, I say unto you, Ye shall see the heaven opened,
and the angels of God ascending and descending upon the
Son of man.
And the third day there was a marriage in Cana of
Galilee; and the mother of Jesus was there: and Jesus also
was bidden, and his disciples, to the marriage. And when
the wine failed, the mother of Jesus saith unto him, They
And Jesus saith unto her, Woman, what
have no wine.
His
have I to do with thee? mine hour is not yet come.
mother saith unto the servants, Whatsoever he saith unto
you, do it. Now there were six waterpots of stone set there
after the Jews’ manner of purifying, containing two or
three firkins apiece. Jesus saith unto them, Fill the water-
pots with water. And they filled them up to the brim. And
he saith unto them, Draw out now, and bear unto the ruler
of the feast. And they bare it. And when the ruler of the
feast tasted the water now become wine, and knew not
whence it was (but the servants that had drawn the water
knew), the ruler of the feast calleth the bridegroom, and
saith unto him, Every man setteth on first the good wine;
and when men have drunk freely, then that which is worse:
thou hast kept the good wine until now. This beginning of
his signs did Jesus in Cana of Galilee, and manifested his
glory; and his disciples believed on him.
After this he went down to Capernaum, he, and _ his
mother, and his brethren, and his disciples; and there they
abode not many days.
And the passover of the Jews was at hand, and Jesus
And he found in the temple those
went up to Jerusalem.
that sold oxen and sheep and doves, and the changers of
money sitting: and he made a scourge of cords, and cast all
out of the temple, both the sheep and the oxen; and heTHE LIFE OF JESUS
393
poured out the changers’ money, and overthrew their tables;
and to them that sold the doves he said, Take these things
hence; make not my Father’s house a house of merchandise.
His disciples remembered that it was written, Zeal for thy
house shall eat me up. The Jews therefore answered and
said unto him, What sign showest thou unto us, seeing that
thou doest these things? Jesus answered and said unto them,
Destroy this temple, and in three days I will raise it up.
The Jews therefore said, Forty and six years was this temple
in building, and wilt thou raise it up in three days? But
he spake of the temple of his body. When therefore he was
raised from the dead, his disciples remembered that he spake
this; and they believed the scripture, andethe word which
Jesus had said.
Now when he was in Jerusalem at the passover, during
the feast, many believed on his name, beholding his signs
which he did. But Jesus did not trust himself unto them, for
that he knew all men, and because he needed not that any
one should bear witness concerning man; for he himself
knew what was in man.
Now there was a man of the Pharisees, ‘named Nicodemus,
a ruler of the Jews: the same came unto him by night, and
said to him, Rabbi, we know that thou art a teacher come
from God; for no one can do these signs that thou doest,
except God be with him. Jesus answered and said unto
him, Verily, verily, I say unto thee, Except one be born
anew, he cannot see the kingdom of God.
Nicodemus saith
unto him, How can a man be born when he is old? can he
enter a second time into his mother’s womb, and be born?
Jesus answered, Verily, verily, I say unto thee, Except one
be born of water and the Spirit, he cannot enter into the
kingdom of God. That which is born of the flesh is flesh;
and that which is born of the Spirit is spirit. Marvel not
that I said unto thee, Ye must be born anew.
The wind
bloweth where it will, and thou hearest the voice thereof,
but knowest not whence it cometh, and whither it goeth: so
is every one that is born of the Spirit. Nicodemus answered
and said unto him, How can these things be? Jesus an-
swered and said unto him, Art thou the teacher of Israel,
and understandest not these things? Verily, verily, I say
unto thee, We speak that which we know, and bear witness394
THE NEW
TESTAMENT
of that which we have seen; and ye receive not our witness.
If I told you earthly things and ye believe not, how shall ye
And no one hath
believe if I tell you heavenly things?
ascended into heaven, but he that descended out of heaven,
even the Son of man, who is in heaven. And as Moses lifted
up the serpent in the wilderness, even so must the Son of
man be lifted up; that whosoever believeth may in him have
eternal life.
For God so loved the world, that he gave his only begot-
ten Son, that whosoever believeth on him should not perish,
but have eternal life. For God sent not the Son into the
world to judge the world; but that the world should be
saved through him. He that believeth on him is not judged:
he that believeth not hath been judged already, because he
hath not believed on the name of the only begotten Son of
God. And this is the judgment, that the light is come into
the world, and men loved the darkness rather than the
light; for their works were evil. For every one that doeth
evil hateth the light, and cometh not to the light, lest his
But he that doeth the truth
works should be reproved.
% cometh
to the light, that his works may be made manifest,
that they have been wrought in God.
After these things came Jesus and his disciples into the
land of Judza; and there he tarried with them, and bap-
tized. And John also was baptizing in A2non near to Salim,
because there was much water there: and they came, and
For John was not yet cast into prison.
were baptized.
There arose therefore a questioning on the part of John’s
disciples with a Jew about purifying. And they came unto
John, and said to him, Rabbi, he that was with thee beyond
the Jordan, to whom thou hast borne witness, behold, the
same baptizeth, and all men come to him. John answered
and said, A man can receive nothing, except it have been
given him from heaven.
Ye yourselves bear me witness,
that I said, I am not the Christ, but, that I am sent, before
him. He that hath the bride is the bridegroom: but the
friend of the bridegroom, that standeth and heareth him,
rejoiceth greatly because of the bridegroom’s voice: this my
joy therefore is made full. He must increase, but I must
decrease.
He that cometh from above is above all: he that is of theTHE
/LIFE:
OF
JESUS
395
earth is of the earth, and of the earth he speaketh: he that
cometh from heaven is above all. What he hath seen and
heard, of that he beareth witness; and no man receiveth his
witness.
He that hath received his witness hath set his
seal to this, that God is true. For he whom God hath sent
speaketh the words of God: for he giveth not the Spirit by
measure. The Father loveth the Son, and hath given all
things into his hand.
He that believeth on the Son hath
eternal life; but he that obeyeth not the Son shall not see
life, but the wrath of God abideth on him.
THE
WOMAN
OF
SAMARIA
When therefore the Lord knew that the Pharisees had
heard that Jesus was making and baptizing more disciples
than John (although Jesus himself baptized not, but his
disciples), he left Judaa, and departed again into Galilee.
And he must needs pass through Samaria.
So he cometh
to a city of Samaria, called Sychar, near to the parcel of
ground that Jacob gave to his son Joseph: and Jacob’s well
was there. Jesus therefore, being wearied with his journey,
sat thus by the well. It was about the sixth hour. There
cometh a woman of Samaria to draw water: Jesus saith
unto her, Give me to drink. For his disciples were gone
away into the city to buy food. The Samaritan woman
therefore saith unto him, How is it that thou, being a Jew,
(For
askest drink of me, who am a Samaritan woman?
Jesus answered
Jews have no dealings with Samaritans.)
and said unto her, If thou knewest the gift of God, and who
it is that saith to thee, Give me to drink; thou wouldest
have asked of him, and he would have given thee living
water. The woman saith unto him, Sir, thou hast nothing
to draw with, and the well is deep: whence then hast thou
that living water? Art thou greater than our father Jacob,
who gave us the well, and drank thereof himself, and his
sons, and his cattle? Jesus answered and said unto her,
Every one that drinketh of this water shall thirst again: but
whosoever drinketh of the water that I shall give him shall
never thirst; but the water that I shall give him shall become
in him a well of water springing up unto eternal life. The
woman saith unto him, Sir, give me this water, that I thirst396
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
not, neither come all the way hither to draw. Jesus saitn
The
unto her, Go, call thy husband, and come hither.
woman answered and said unto him, I have no husband.
Jesus saith unto her, Thou saidst well, I have no husband:
for thou hast had five husbands; and he whom thou now
hast is not thy husband: this hast thou said truly. The
woman saith unto him, Sir, I perceive that thou art a
prophet. Our fathers worshipped in this mountain; and ye
say, that in Jerusalem is the place where men ought to wor-
ship. Jesus saith unto her, Woman, believe me, the hour
cometh, when neither in this mountain, nor in Jerusalem,
shall ye worship the Father.
Ye worship that which ye
know not: we worship that which we know; for salvation is
from the Jews. But the hour cometh, and now is, when the
true worshippers shall worship the Father in spirit and truth:
for such doth the Father seek to be his worshippers. God
is a Spirit: and they that worship him must worship in spirit
and truth. The woman saith unto him, I know that Mes-
siah cometh (he that is called Christ) : when he is come, he
will declare unto us all things. Jesus saith unto her, I that
speak unto thee am he.
And upon this came his disciples; and they marvelled that
he was speaking with a woman; yet no man said, What
seekest thou? or, Why speakest thou with her?
So the
woman left her waterpot, and went away into the city, and
saith to the people, Come, see a man, who told me all things
that ever I did: can this be the Christ? “They went out of
the city, and were coming to him. In the mean while the dis-
ciples prayed him, saying, Rabbi, eat. But he said unto them,
I have meat to eat that ye know not. The disciples therefore
said one to another, Hath any man brought him aught to eat?
Jesus saith unto them, My meat is to do the will of him
that sent me, and to accomplish his work. Say not ye, There
are yet four months, and then cometh the harvest? behold,
I say unto you, Lift up your eyes, and look on the fields,
that they are white already unto harvest. He that reapeth
receiveth wages, and gathereth fruit unto life eternal; that
he that soweth and he that reapeth may rejoice together.
For herein is the saying true, One soweth, and another reap-
eth. I sent you to reap that whereon ye have not labored:
others have labored, and ye are entered into their labor.THE
‘LIFE:
OF
JESUS
397
And from that city many of the Samaritans believed on
him because of the word of the woman, who testified, He
told me all things that ever I did. So when the Samaritans
came unto him, they besought him to abide with them: and
he abode there two days. And many more believed because
of his word; and they said to the woman, Now we believe,
not because of thy speaking: for we have heard for ourselves,
and know that this is indeed the Saviour of the world.
OPENING
EVENTS
OF THE GREAT
MINISTRY
GALILZZAN
Now Jesus came into Galilee, preaching the gospel of God,
and saying, The time is fulfilled, and the kingdom of God is
at hand: repent ye, and believe in thc gospel.
He came therefore again unto Cana of Galilee, where he
made the water wine. And there was-a certain nobleman,
whose son was sick at Capernaum.
When he heard that
Jesus was come out of Judza into Galilee, he went unto
him, and besought him that he would come down, and heal
his son; for he was at the point of death. Jesus therefore
said unto him, Except ye see signs and wonders, ye will in
no wise believe. ‘The nobleman saith unto him, Sir, come
down ere my child die. Jesus saith unto him, Go thy way;
thy son liveth. The man believed the word that Jesus spake
unto him, and he went his way. And as he was now going
down, his servants met him, saying, that his son lived. So
he inquired of them the hour when he began to amend.
They said therefore unto him, Yesterday at the seventh hour
che fever left him. So the father knew that it was at that
hour in which Jesus said unto him, Thy son liveth: and
himself believed, and his whole house.
This is again the
second sign that Jesus did, having come out of Judza into
Galilee.
And he came to Nazareth, where he had been brought .
up: and he entered, as his custom was, into the synagogue
on the sabbath day, and stood up to read. And there was
delivered unto him the book of the prophet Isaiah. And he
opened the book, and found the place where it was written,
The Spirit of the Lord is upon me,
Because he anointed me to preach good tidings to the poor:398
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
He hath sent me to proclaim release to the captives,
And recovering of sight to the blind,
To set at liberty them that are bruised,
To proclaim the acceptable year of the Lord.
And he closed the book, and gave it back to the attendant,
and sat down: and the eyes of all in the synagogue were
fastened on him. And he began to say unto them, To-day
hath this scripture been fulfilled in your ears. Then all bare
him witness, and wondered at the words of grace which pro-
ceeded out of his mouth: and they said, Is not this Joseph’s
son? And he said unto them, Doubtless ye will say unto me
this parable, Physician, heal thyself: whatsoever we have
heard done at Capernaum, do also here in thine own coun-
try. And he said, Verily I say unto you, No prophet is
acceptable in his own country. But of a truth I say unto
you, There were many widows in Israel in the days of
Elijah, when the heaven was shut up three years and six
months, when there came a great famine over all the land;
and unto none of them was Elijah sent, but only to Za-
rephath, in the land of Sidon, unto a woman that was a
widow. And there were many lepers in Israel in the time
of Elisha the prophet; and none of them was cleansed, but
only Naaman the Syrian. And they were all filled with
wrath in the synagogue, as they heard these things; and
they rose up, and cast him forth out of the city, and led him
unto the brow of the hill whereon their city was built, that
But he passing
they might throw him down headlong.
way.
his
went
them
of
midst
the
through
And he came down to Capernaum, a city of Galilee. And
he was teaching them on the sabbath day: and they were
astonished at his teaching; for his word was with authority.
And walking by the sea of Galilee, he saw two brethren,
Simon who is called Peter, and Andrew his brother, casting
a net into the sea; for they were fishers. And he saith unto
them, Come ye after me, and I will make you fishers of men.
And they straightway left the nets, and followed him. And
going on from thence he saw two other brethren, James the
son of Zebedee, and John his brother, in the boat with Zeb-
edee their father, mending their nets; and he called them.
And they straightway left the boat and their father, and
followed him.THE LIFE OF JESUS
399
And they go into Capernaum; and straightway on the
sabbath day he entered into the synagogue and taught. And
they were astonished at his teaching: for he taught them as
having authority, and not as the scribes. And straightway
there was in their synagogue a man with an unclean spirit;
and he cried out, saying, What have we to do with thee,
Jesus thou Nazarene? art thou come to destroy us? I know
thee who thou art, the Holy One of God. And Jesus re-
buked him, saying, Hold thy peace, and come out of him.
And the unclean spirit, tearing him and crying with a loud
voice, came out of him. And they were all amazed, inso-
much that they. questioned among themselves, saying, What
is this? a new teaching! with authority he commandeth even
the unclean spirits, and they obey him. And the report of
him went out straightway everywhere into all the region of
Galilee round about.
And straightway, when they were come out of the syna-
gogue, they came into the house of Simon and Andrew,
with James and John. Now Simon’s wife’s mother lay sick
of a fever; and straightway they tell him of her: and he
came and took her by the hand, and raised her up; and the
fever left her, and she ministered unto them.
And at even, when the sun did set, they brought unto him
all that were sick, and them that were possessed with de-
mons. And all the city was gathered together at the door.
And he healed many that were sick with divers diseases, and
cast out many demons; and he suffered not the demons to
speak, because they knew him.
And in the morning, a great while before day, he rose up
and went out, and departed into a desert place, and there
prayed. And Simon and they that were with him followed
after him; and they found him, and say unto him, All are
seeking thee. And he saith unto them, Let us go elsewhere
into the next towns, that I may preach there also; for to
this end came I forth. And he went into their synagogues
throughout all Galilee, preaching and casting out demons.
And there cometh to him a leper, beseeching him, and
kneeling down to him, and saying unto him, If thou wilt,
thou canst make me clean. And being moved with compas-
and
sion, he stretched forth his hand, and touched him,
straight-
And
clean.
made
thou
be
will;
I
him,
unto
saith400
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
way the leprosy departed from him, and he was made clean.
And he strictly charged him, and straightway sent him out,
and saith unto him, See thou say nothing to any man: but
go show thyself to the priest, and offer for thy cleansing the
things which Moses commanded, for a testimony unto them.
But he went out, and began to publish it much, and to
spread abroad the matter, insomuch that Jesus could no
more openly enter into a city, but was without in desert
places: and they came to him from every quarter.
And when he entered again into Capernaum after some
days, it was noised that he was in the house. And many
were gathered together, so that there was no longer room
for them, no, not even about the door: and he spake the
word unto them. And they came, bringing unto him a man
sick of the palsy, borne of four. And when they could not
come nigh unto him for the crowd, they uncovered the roof
where he was: and when they had broken it up, they let
down the bed whereon the sick of the palsy lay. And Jesus
seeing their faith saith unto the sick of the palsy, Son, thy
sins are forgiven. But there were certain of the scribes sit-
ting there, and reasoning in their hearts, Why doth this man
thus speak? he blasphemeth: who can forgive sins but one,
even God? And straightway Jesus, perceiving in his spirit
that they so reasoned within themselves, saith unto them,
Why reason ye these things in your hearts? Which is easier,
to say to the sick of the palsy, Thy sins are forgiven; or to
say, Arise, and take up thy bed, and walk? But that ye may
know that the Son of man hath authority on earth to for-
give sins (he saith to the sick of the palsy), I say unto thee,
Arise, take up thy bed, and go unto thy house. And he
arose, and straightway took up the bed, and went forth
before them all; insomuch that they were all amazed, and
glorified God, saying, We never saw it on this fashion.
And he went forth again by the sea side; and all the
multitude resorted unto him, and he taught them.
And
as he passed by, he saw Levi the son of Alpheus sitting at
the place of toll, and he saith unto him, Follow me. And
he arose and followed him.
And it came to pass, that he was sitting at meat in his
house, and many publicans and sinners sat down with Jesus
and his disciples: for there were many, and they followedTHE
him.
LIFE
OF
JESUS
401
And the scribes of the Pharisees, when they saw that
he was eating with the sinners and publicans, said unto his
disciples, How is it that he eateth and drinketh with publi-
cans and sinners? And when Jesus heard it, he saith unto
them, They that are whole have no need of a physician, but
they that are sick: I came not to call the righteous, but
sinners.
;
_ And John’s disciples and the Pharisees were fasting: and
they come and say unto him, Why do John’s disciples and
the disciples of the Pharisees fast, but thy disciples fast not?
And Jesus said unto them, Can the sons of the bride-
chamber fast, while the bridegroom is with them? as long
as they have the bridegroom with them, they cannot fast.
But the days will come, when the bridegroom shall be
taken away from them, and then will they fast in that day.
No man seweth a piece of undressed cloth on an old gar-
ment: else that which should fill it up taketh from it, the
new from the old, and a worse rent is made. And no man
putteth new wine into old wine-skins; else the wine will
burst the skins, and the wine perisheth, and the skins: but
they put new wine into fresh wine-skins.
A
FEAST
OF
THE
JEWS
IN
JERUSALEM
After these things there was a feast of the Jews; and
Jesus went up to Jerusalem.
Now there is in Jerusalem by the sheep gate a pool, which
In
is called in Hebrew Bethesda, having five porches.
these lay a multitude of them that were sick, blind, halt,
And a certain man was there, who had been
withered.
thirty and eight years in his infirmity. When Jesus saw
him lying, and knew that he had been now a long time in
‘that case, he saith unto him, Wouldest thou be made whole?
‘The sick man answered him, Sir, I have no man, when the
water is troubled, to put me into the pool: but while I am
coming, another steppeth down before me. Jesus saith unto
him, Arise, take up thy bed, and walk. And straightway
the man was made whole, and took up his bed and walked.
Now it was the sabbath on that day. So the Jews said
unto him that was cured, It is the sabbath, and it is not
lawful for thee to take up thy bed.
But he answered them,402
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
He that made me whole, the same said unto me, Take up
thy bed, and walk. They asked him, Who is the man that
said unto thee, Take up thy bed, and walk? But he that
was healed knew not who it was; for Jesus had conveyed
himself away, a multitude being in the place. Afterward
Jesus findeth him in the temple, and said unto him, Behold,
thou art made whole: sin no more, lest a worse thing befall
thee. The man went away, and told the Jews that it was
And for this cause the
Jesus who had made him whole.
these things on the
did
he
because
Jesus,
Jews persecuted
But Jesus answered them, My Father worketh
sabbath.
even until now, and I work. For this cause therefore the
Jews sought the more to kill him, because he not only brake
the sabbath, but also called God his own Father, making
himself equal with God.
Jesus therefore answered and said unto them, Verily, ver-
ily, I say unto you, The Son can do nothing of himself, but
what he seeth the Father doing: for what things soever he
For the
doeth, these the Son also doeth in like manner.
Father loveth the Son, and showeth him all things that
himself doeth: and greater works than these will he show
For as the Father raiseth the
him, that ye may marvel.
dead and giveth them life, even so the Son also giveth life
to whom he will. For neither doth the Father judge any
man, but he hath given all judgment unto the Son; that all
He
may honor the Son, even as they honor the Father.
that honoreth not the Son honoreth not the Father that
sent him. Verily, verily, I say unto you, He that heareth
my word, and believeth him that sent me, hath eternal life,
and cometh not into judgment, but hath passed out of
death into life. Verily, verily, I say unto you, The hour
cometh, and now is, when the dead shall hear the voice of
the Son of God; and they that hear shall live. For as the
Father hath life in himself, even so gave he to the Son also
to have life in himself: and he gave him authority to execute
judgment, because he is a son of man. Marvel not at this:
for the hour cometh, in which all that are in the tombs shall
hear his voice, and shall come forth; they that have done
good, unto the resurrection of life; and they that have done
evil, unto the resurrection of judgment.
I can of myself do nothing: as I hear, I judge: and myTHE
LIFE
OF
JESUS
403
judgment is righteous; because I seek not mine own will, but
the will of him that sent me. If I bear witness of myself,
my witness is not true.
It is another that beareth witness
of me ; and I know that the witness which he witnesseth of
me is true. Ye have sent unto John, and he hath borne
witness unto the truth. But the witness which I receive is
not from man: howbeit I say these things, that ye may be
saved.
He was the lamp that burneth and shineth; and
ye were willing to rejoice for a season in his light. But
the witness which I have is greater than that of John; for
the works which the Father hath given me to accomplish,
the very works that I do, bear witness of me, that the
Father hath sent me. And the Father that sent me, he hath
borne witness of me. Ye have neither heard his voice at
And ye have not his word
any time, nor seen his form.
abiding in you: for whom he sent, him ye believe not. Ye
search the scriptures, because ye think that in them ye have
eternal life; and these are they which bear witness of me;
and ye will not come to me, that ye may have life. I re-
ceive not glory from men. But I know you, that ye have
I am come in my
not the love of God in yourselves.
Father’s name, and ye receive me not: if another shall come
in his own name, him ye will receive. How can ye believe,
who receive glory one of another, and the glory that cometh
from the only God ye seek not? Think not that I will
accuse you to the Father: there is one that accuseth you,
even Moses, on whom ye have set your hope.. For if ye
believed Moses, ye would believe me; for he wrote of me.
But if ye believe not his writings, how shall ye believe my
words?
And it came to pass, that he was going on the sabbath
day through the grainfields; and his disciples began, as they
went, to pluck the ears. And the Pharisees said unto him,
Behold, why do they on the sabbath day that which is not
lawful? And he said unto them, Did ye never read what
they
David did, when he had need, and was hungry, he, and
How he entered into the house of
that were with him?
show-
God when Abiathar was high priest, and ate the
and
priests,
the
for
save
eat
to
lawful
not
is
it
bread, which
unto
said
he
And
gave also to them that were with him?404
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
them, The sabbath was made for man, not man for the
sabbath: so that the Son of man is lord even of the sabbath.
And he entered again into the synagogue; and there was
a man there who had his hand withered. And they watched
him, whether he would heal him on the sabbath day; that
they might accuse him. And he saith unto the man that
had his hand withered, Stand forth. And he saith unto
them, Is it lawful on the sabbath day to do good, or to do
harm? to save a life, or to kill? But they held their peace.
And when he had looked round about on them with anger,
being grieved at the hardening of their heart, he saith unto
the man, Stretch forth thy hand. And he stretched it forth;
and his hand was restored.
And the Pharisees went out,
and straightway with the Herodians took counsel against
him, how they might destroy him.
And he appointed twelve, that they might be with him,
and that he might send them forth to preach, and to have
authority to cast. out demons: and Simon he surnamed
Peter; and James the son of Zebedee, and John the brother
of James; and them he surnamed Boanerges, which is, Sons
of thunder: and Andrew, and Philip, and Bartholomew,
and Matthew, and Thomas, and James the son of Alphzus,
and Thaddeus, and Simon, the Cananzan, and Judas Isca-
riot, who also betrayed him. And the report of him went
forth into all Syria: and they brought unto him all that
were sick, holden with divers diseases and torments, possessed
with demons, and epileptic, and palsied; and he healed them.
And there followed him great multitudes from Galilee and
Decapolis and Jerusalem and Judza and from beyond the
Jordan.
THE
SERMON
ON
THE
MOUNT
And seeing the multitudes, he went up into the mountain:
and when
he had sat down,
his disciples came
unto
him:
and he opened his mouth and taught them, saying,
Blessed are the poor in spirit: for theirs is the kingdom
of heaven.
Blessed are they that mourn: for they shall be comforted.
Blessed are the meek: for they shall inherit the earth.
Blessed are they that hunger and thirst after righteous-
ness: for they shall be filled.THE
LIFE
OF
JESUS
405
Blessed are the merciful: for they shall obtain mercy,
Blessed are the pure in heart: for they shall see God.
Blessed are the peacemakers: for they shall be called
sons of God.
Blessed are they that have been persecuted for righteous-
ness’ sake: for theirs is the kingdom of heaven. Blessed are
ye when men shall reproach you, and persecute you, and
say all manner of evil against you falsely, for my sake.
Rejoice, and be exceeding glad: for great is your reward in
heaven: for so persecuted they the prophets that were before
you.
Ye are the salt of the earth: but if the salt have lost its
savor, wherewith shall it be salted? it is thenceforth good
for nothing, but to be cast out and trodden under foot of
men. Ye are the light of the world. A city set on a hill
cannot be hid. Neither do men light a lamp, and put it
under the bushel, but on the stand; and it shineth unto all
that are in the house. Even so let your light shine before
men; that they may see your good works, and glorify your
Father who is in heaven.
Think not that I came to destroy the law or the prophets:
I came not to destroy, but to fulfil. For verily I say unto
you, Till heaven and earth pass away, one jot or one tittle
shall in no wise pass away from the law, till all things be
accomplished. Whosoever therefore shall break one of these
least commandments, and shall teach men so, shall be called
least in the kingdom of heaven: but whosoever shall do and
teach them, he shall be called great in the kingdom of
For I say unto you, that except your righteous-
heaven.
ness shall exceed the righteousness of the scribes and Phari-
sees, ye shall in no wise enter into the kingdom of heaven.
Ye have heard that it was said to them of old time, Thou
shalt not kill; and whosoever shall kill shall be in danger
of the judgment: but I say unto you, that every one who is
angry with his brother shall be in danger of the judgment;
and whosoever shall say to his brother, Raca, shall be in
danger of the council; and whosoever shall say, Thou fool,
shall be in danger of the hell of fire. If therefore thou art
offering thy gift at the altar, and there rememberest that
thy brother hath aught against thee, leave there thy gift
before the altar, and go thy way, first be reconciled to thy406
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
brother, and then come and offer thy gift. Agree with thine
adversary quickly, while thou art with him in the way; lest
haply the adversary deliver thee to the judge, and the judge
deliver thee to the officer, and thou be cast into prison.
Verily I say unto thee, Thou shalt by no means come out
thence, till thou have paid the last farthing.
Ye have heard that it was said, Thou shalt not commit
adultery: but I say unto you, that every one that looketh on
a woman to lust after her hath committed adultery with
her already in his heart. And if thy right eye causeth thee
to stumble, pluck it out, and cast it from thee: for it is
profitable for thee that one of thy members should perish,
and not thy whole body be cast into hell. And if thy
right hand causeth thee to stumble, cut it off, and cast it
from thee: for it is profitable for thee that one of thy mem-
bers should perish, and not thy whole body go into hell. It
was said also, Whosoever shall put away his wife, let him
give her a writing of divorcement: but I say unto you, that
every one that putteth away his wife, saving for the cause
of fornication, maketh her an adulteress: and whosoever
shall marry her when she is put away committeth adultery.
Again, ye have heard that it was said to them of old time,
Thou shalt not forswear thyself, but shalt perform unto
the Lord thine oaths: but I say unto you, Swear not at all;
neither by the heaven, for it is the throne of God; nor by the
earth, for it is the footstool of his feet; nor by Jerusalem,
for it is the city of the great King. Neither shalt thou
swear by thy head, for thou canst not make one hair white
or black. But let your speech be, Yea, yea; Nay, nay: and
whatsoever is more than these is of the evil one.
Ye have heard that it was said, An eye for an eye, and
a tooth for a tooth: but I say unto you, Resist not him
that is evil: but whosoever smiteth thee on thy right cheek,
turn to him the other also. And if any man would go to
law with thee, and take away thy coat, let him have thy
cloak also. And whosoever shall compel thee to go one mile,
go with him two. Give to him that asketh thee, and from
him that would borrow of thee turn not thou away.
Ye have heard that it was said, Thou shalt love thy
neighbor, and hate thine enemy: but I say unto you, Love
your enemies, and pray for them that persecute you; thatTHE
LIFE
OF
JESUS
407
ye may be sons of your Father who is in heaven: for he
maketh his sun to rise on the evil and the good, and sendeth
rain on the just and the unjust. For if ye love them that
love you, what reward have ye? do not even the publicans
the same? And if ye salute your brethren only, what do
ye more than others? do not even the Gentiles the same ?
Ye therefore shall be perfect, as your heavenly Father is
perfect.
Take heed that ye do not your righteousness before men,
to, be seen of them: else ye have no reward with your
Father who is in heaven.
When therefore thou doest alms, sound not a trumpet
before thee, as the hypocrites do in the synagogues and
Verily
in the streets, that they may have glory of men.
But
I say unto you, They have received their reward.
thy
what
know
hand
left
thy
not
let
alms,
doest
when thou
right hand doeth: that thine alms may be in secret: and thy
Father who seeth in secret shall recompense thee.
And when ye pray, ye shall not be as the hypocrites: for
they love to stand and pray in the synagogues and in the
corners of the streets, that they may be seen of men. Verily
But
I say unto you, They have received their reward.
thou, when thou prayest, enter into thine inner chamber,
and having shut thy door, pray to thy Father who is in
secret, and thy Father who seeth in secret shall recompense
thee. And in praying use not vain repetitions, as the Gen-
tiles do: for they think that they shall be heard for their
much speaking. Be not therefore like unto them: for your
Father knoweth what things ye have need of, before ye ask
After this manner therefore pray ye: Our Father
him.
who art in heaven, Hallowed be thy name. Thy kingdom
Thy will be done, as in heaven, so on earth. Give
come.
day our daily bread. And forgive us our debts, as
this
us
into
we also have forgiven our debtors. And bring us not
if ye
For
one.
evil
the
from
us
deliver
but
n,
temptatio
will also
forgive men their trespasses, your heavenly Father
trespasses,
their
men
not
forgive
ye
if
But
you.
forgive
neither will your Father forgive your trespasses.
of a
Moreover when ye fast, be not, as the hypocrites,
may
they
that
faces,
their
re
sad countenance: for they disfigu
have
They
you,
unto
say
I
Verily
fast.
to
men
be seen of408
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
received their reward. But thou, when thou fastest, anoint
thy head, and wash thy face; that thou be not seen of men
to fast, but of thy Father who is in secret: and thy Father,
who seeth in secret, shall recompense thee.
Lay not up for yourselves treasures upon the earth, where
moth and rust consume, and where thieves break through
and steal: but lay up for yourselves treasures in heaven,
where neither moth nor rust doth consume, and where
thieves do not break through nor steal: for where thy
treasure is, there will thy heart be also. The lamp of the
body is the eye: if therefore thine eye be single, thy whole
body shall be full of light. But if thine eye be evil, thy
whole body shall be full of darkness. If therefore the light
that is in thee be darkness, how great is the darkness!
No
man can serve two masters: for either he will hate the one,
and love the other; or else he will hold to one, and despise
the other. Ye cannot serve God and mammon.
Therefore
I say unto you, Be not anxious for your life, what ye shall
eat, or what ye shall drink; nor yet for your body, what ye
shall put on. Is not the life more than the food, and the
body than the raiment?
Behold the birds of the heaven,
that they sow not, neither do they reap, nor gather into
barns; and your heavenly Father feedeth them. Are not ye
of much more value than they? And which of you by being
anxious can add one cubit unto the measure of his life?
And why are ye anxious concerning raiment? Consider the
lilies of the field, how they grow; they toil not, neither do
they spin: yet I say unto you, that even Solomon in all his
glory was not arrayed like one of these. But if God doth
so clothe the grass of the field, which to-day is, and to-
morrow is cast into the oven, shall he not much more clothe
you, O ye of little faith? Be not therefore anxious, saying,
What shall we eat? or, What shall we drink? or, Where-
withal shall we be clothed? For after all these things do
the Gentiles seek; for your heavenly Father knoweth that
ye have need of all these things. But seek ye first his king-
dom, and his righteousness; and all these things shall be
added unto you. Be not therefore anxious for the morrow:
for the morrow will be anxious for itself. Sufficient unto
the day is the evil thereof.
Judge not, that ye be not judged. For with what judg-THE
(LIFE!
OF
‘JESUS
409
ment ye judge, ye shall be judged: and with what measure
ye mete, it shall be measured unto you. And why beholdest
thou the mote that is in thy brother’s eye, but considerest'
not the beam that is in thine own eye? Or how wilt thou
say to thy brother, Let me cast out the mote out of thine
-eye; and lo, the beam is in thine own eye? Thou hypo-
crite, cast out first the beam out of thine own eye; and then
shalt thou see clearly to cast out the mote out of thy broth-
er’s eye.
Give not that which is holy unto the dogs, neither cast
your pearls before the swine, lest haply they trample them
under their feet, and turn and rend you.
Ask, and it shall be given you; seek, and ye shall find;
knock, and it shall be opened unto you: for every one that
asketh receiveth; and he that seeketh findeth; and to him
Or what man is there
that knocketh it shall be opened.
of you, who, if his son shall ask him for a loaf, will give
him a stone; or if he shall ask for a fish, will give him a
serpent? If ye then, being evil, know how to give good
gifts unto your children, how much more shall your Father
who is in heaven give good things to them that ask him?
All things therefore whatsoever ye would that men should
do unto you, even so do ye also unto them: for this is the
law and the prophets.
Enter ye in by the narrow gate: for wide is the gate, and
broad is the way, that leadeth to destruction, and many are
For narrow is the gate, and
they that enter in thereby.
straitened the way, that leadeth unto life, and few are they
that find it.
Beware of false prophets, who come to you in sheep’s
clothing, but inwardly are ravening wolves. By their fruits
ye shall know them. Do men gather grapes of thorns, or
Even so every good tree bringeth forth
figs of thistles?
good fruit; but the corrupt tree bringeth forth evil fruit.
A good tree cannot bring forth evil fruit, neither can a cor-
rupt tree bring forth good fruit. Every tree that bringeth
not forth good fruit is hewn down, and cast into the fire.
Not every
Therefore by their fruits ye shall know them.
one that saith unto
me,
Lord,
Lord,
shall enter
into the
kingdom of heaven; but he that doeth the will of my Father
who is in heaven.
Many will say to me in that day, Lord,410
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
Lord, did we not prophesy by thy name, and by thy name
cast out demons, and by thy name do many mighty works?
And then will I profess unto them, I never knew you:
depart from me, ye that work iniquity.
Every one therefore that heareth these words of mine,
and doeth them, shall be likened unto a wise man, who built
his house upon the rock: and the rain descended, and the
floods came, and the winds blew, and beat upon that house;
and it fell not: forit was founded upon the rock. And
every one that heareth these words of mine, and doeth them
not, shall be likened unto a foolish man, who built his house
upon the sand: and the rain descended, and the floods came,
and the winds blew, and smote upon that house; and it
fell: and great was the fall thereof.
And it came to pass, when Jesus had finished these words,
the multitudes were astonished at his teaching: for he taught
them as one having authority, and not as their scribes.
FURTHER
EVENTS
OF THE
MINISTRY
GREAT
GALILZAN
And when he was come down from the mountain, great
multitudes followed him.
And when he was entered into Capernaum, there came
unto him a centurion, beseeching him, and saying, Lord, my
servant lieth in the house sick of the palsy, grievously tor-
mented.
And he saith unto him, I will come and heal him.
And the centurion answered and said, Lord, I am not
worthy that thou shouldest come under my roof; but only
say the word, and my servant shall be healed. For I also
am a man under authority, having under myself soldiers:
and I say to this one, Go, and he goeth; and to another,
Come, and he cometh; and to my servant, Do this, and he
doeth it. And when Jesus heard it, he marvelled, and said
to them that followed, Verily I say unto you, I have not
found so great faith, no, not in Israel. And I say unto you,
that many shall come from the east and the west, and shall
sit down with Abraham, and Isaac, and Jacob, in the king-
dom of heaven: but the sons of the kingdom shall be cast
forth into the outer darkness: there shall be the weeping
and the gnashing of teeth. And Jesus said unto the cen-THE
LIFE
OF
JESUS
411
turion, Go thy way; as thou hast believed, so be it done
unto thee. And the servant was healed in that hour.
And it came to pass soon afterwards, that he went to a
city called Nain; and his disciples went with him, and a
Now when he drew near to the gate of
great multitude.
the city, behold, there was carried out one that was dead,
the only son of his mother, and she was a widow: and much
people of the city was with her. And when the Lord saw
her, he had compassion on her, and said unto her, Weep not.
And he came nigh and touched the bier: and the bearers
stood still. And he said, Young man, I say unto thee,
Arise. And he that was dead sat up, and began to speak.
And fear took hold on
And he gave him to his mother.
A great prophet is
saying,
God,
glorified
all: and they
arisen among us: and, God hath visited his people. And this
report went forth concerning him in the whole of Judza,
and all the region round about.
And the disciples of John told him of all these things.
them to
And John calling unto him two of his disciples sent
look we for
the Lord, saying, Art thou he that cometh, or
him, they
another? And when the men were come unto
Art
saying,
thee,
unto
us
sent
hath
said, John the Baptist
that hour
In
r?
anothe
for
we
look
or
,
cometh
that
thou he
spirits; and
he cured many of diseases and plagues and evil
he an-
And
sight.
ed
bestow
he
blind
were
that
on many
John the things
swered and said unto them, Go and tell
their sight,
receive
blind
the
heard;
and
seen
have
which ye
deaf hear,
the
and
d,
cleanse
are
the lame walk, the lepers
tidings preached
the dead are raised up, the poor have good
find no occa-
shall
ver
whosoe
And blessed is he,
to them.
sion of stumbling in me.
departed, he
And when the messengers of John were
John, What
rning
conce
tudes
multi
the
unto
began to say
reed shaken
a
d?
behol
to
went ye out into the wilderness
see? a man
to
out
ye
went
what
But
with the wind?
that are gorgeously
clothed in soft raiment? Behold, they
But
courts.
kings’
in
are
tely,
delica
live
apparelled, and
you,
unto
say
I
Yea,
et?
what went ye out to see? a proph
is he of whom it is
and much more than a prophet. This
written,
e thy face,
Behold, I send my messenger befor412
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
Who shall prepare thy way before thee.
I say unto you, Among them that are born of women there
is none greater than John: yet he that is but little in the
kingdom of God is greater than he. And all the people
when they heard, and the publicans, justified God, being
baptized with the baptism of John. But the Pharisees and
the lawyers rejected for themselves the counsel of God, be-
ing not baptized of him. Whereunto then shall I liken the
men of this generation, and to what are they like? They
are like unto children that sit in the marketplace, and call
one to another; who say, We piped unto you, and ye did
not dance; we wailed, and ye did not weep. For John the
Baptist is come eating no bread nor drinking wine; and ye
say, He hath a demon. The Son of man is come eating and
drinking; and ye say, Behold, a gluttonous man, and a
winebibber, a friend of publicans and sinners! And wisdom
is justified of all her children.
Then began he to upbraid the cities wherein most of his
mighty works were done, because they repented not. Woe
unto thee, Chorazin! woe unto thee, Bethsaida! for if the
mighty works had been done in Tyre and Sidon which were
done in you, they would have repented long ago in sack-
cloth and ashes. But I say unto you, it shall be more toler-
able for Tyre and Sidon in the day of judgment, than for
you. And thou, Capernaum, shalt thou be exalted unto
heaven? thou shalt go down unto Hades: for if the mighty
works had been done in Sodom which were done in thee, it
would have remained until this day. But I say unto you
that it shall be more tolerable for the land of Sodom in the
day of judgment, than for thee.
At that season Jesus answered and said, I thank thee, O
Father, Lord of heaven and earth, that thou didst hide these
things from the wise and understanding, and didst reveal
them unto babes: yea, Father, for so it was well-pleasing in
thy sight. All things have been delivered unto me of my
Father: and no one knoweth the Son, save the Father ;
neither doth any know the Father, save the Son, and he to
whomsoever the Son willeth to reveal him. Come unto me,
all ye that labor and are heavy laden, and I will give you
rest. “Take my yoke upon you, and learn of me; for I amTHE
LIFE
OF
JESUS
413
meek and lowly in heart: and ye shall find rest. unto your
souls. For my yoke is easy, and my burden is light.
And one of the Pharisees desired him that he would eat
with him. And he entered into the Pharisee’s house, and
sat down to meat. And behold, a woman who was in the
city, a sinner; and when she knew that he was sitting at
meat in the Pharisee’s house, she brought an alabaster cruse
of ointment, and standing behind at his feet, weeping, she
began to wet his feet with her tears, and wiped them with
the hair of her head, and kissed his feet, and anointed them
with the ointment. Now when the Pharisee that had bidden
him saw it, he spake within himself, saying, This man, if he
were a prophet, would have perceived who and what manner
of woman this is that toucheth him, that she is a sinner.
And Jesus answering said unto him, Simon, I have some-
what to say unto thee. And he saith, Teacher, say on. A
certain lender had two debtors: the one owed five hundred
shillings, and the other fifty. When they had not where-
with to pay, he forgave them both. Which of them there-
fore will love him most? Simon answered and said, He, I
And he said unto
suppose, to whom he forgave the most.
him, Thou hast rightly judged. And turning to the woman,
he said unto Simon, Seest thou this woman? I entered into
thy house, thou gavest me no water for my feet: but she
hath wetted my feet with her tears, and wiped them with
her hair. Thou gavest me no kiss: but she, since the time
I came in, hath not ceased to kiss my feet. My head with
oil thou didst not anoint: but she hath anointed my feet
with ointment. Wherefore I say unto thee, Her sins, which
are many, are forgiven; for she loved much: but to whom
little is forgiven, the same loveth little. And he said unto
her, Thy sins are forgiven. And they that sat at meat with
him began to say within themselves, Who is this that even
forgiveth sins? And he said unto the woman, Thy faith
hath saved thee; go in peace.
And it came to pass soon afterwards, that he went about
through cities and villages, preaching and bringing the good
tidings of the kingdom of God, and with him the twelve, and
certain women who had been healed of evil spirits and in-
firmities:;
Mary
that was
called
Magdalene,
from
whom
seven demons had gone out, and Joanna the wife of Chuzas414
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
Herod’s steward, and Susanna, and many others, who min-
istered unto them of their substance. And the scribes that
came down from Jerusalem said, He hath Beelzebub, and,
By the prince of the demons casteth he out the demons.
And he called them unto him, and said unto them in para-
bles, How can Satan cast out Satan? And if a kingdom
be divided against itself, that kingdom cannot stand. And
if a house be divided against itself, that house will not be
able to stand. And if Satan hath risen up against himself,
and is divided, he cannot stand, but hath an end. But no
one can enter into the house of the strong man, and spoil his
goods, except he first bind the strong man; and then he will
spoil his house. Verily I say unto you, All their sins shall
be forgiven unto the sons of men, and their blasphemies
wherewith soever they shall blaspheme: but whosoever shall
blaspheme against the Holy Spirit hath never forgiveness,
but is guilty of an eternal sin: because they said, He hath an
unclean spirit.
And there come his mother and his brethren; and, standing
without, they sent unto him, calling him. And a multitude
was sitting about him; and they say unto him, Behold, thy
mother and brethren without seek for thee. And he an-
swereth them, and saith, Who is my mother and my breth-
ren? And looking round on them that sat around about
him, he saith, Behold, my mother and my brethren!
For
whosoever shall do the will of God, the same is my brother,
and sister, and mother.
THE
LAKESIDE
PARABLES
On that day went Jesus out of the house, and sat by the
sea side. And there were gathered unto him great multi-
tudes, so that he entered into a boat, and sat; and all the
multitude stood on the beach. And he spake to them many
things in parables, saying, Behold, the sower went forth to
sow; and as he sowed, some seeds fell by the way side, and
the birds came and devoured them: and others fell upon the
rocky places, where they had not much earth: and straight-
way they sprang up, because they had no deepness of earth:
and when the sun was risen, they were scorched ; and because
they had no root, they withered away. And others fell uponTHE
LIFE
OF
JESUS
+15
the thorns; and the thorns grew up and choked them: and
others fell upon the good ground, and yielded fruit, some a
He that hath ears,
hundredfold, some sixty, some thirty.
let him hear.
And the disciples came, and said unto him, Why speakest
thou unto them in parables? And he answered and said
unto them, Unto you it is given to know the mysteries of
the kingdom of heaven, but to them it is not given. For
whosoever hath, to him shall be given, and he shall have
abundance: but whosoever hath not, from him shall be taken
away even that which he hath. Therefore speak I to them
in parables; because seeing they see not, and hearing they
And unto them is
hear not, neither do they understand.
saith,
which
Isaiah,
of
prophecy
the
fulfilled
By hearing ye shall hear, and shall in no wise understand ;
And seeing ye shall see, and shall in no wise perceive:
For this people’s heart is waxed gross,
And their ears are dull of hearing,
And their eyes they have closed;
Lest haply they should perceive with their eyes,
And hear with their ears,
And understand with their heart,
And should turn again,
And I should heal them.
your ears, for
But blessed are your eyes, for they see; and
prophets
many
that
you,
unto
say
I
verily
they hear. For
ye see,
which
things
the
and righteous men desired to see
hear,
ye
which
things
the
hear
to
and
not;
and saw them
sower.
the
of
e
parabl
the
and heard them not. Hear then ye
m, and under-
When any one heareth the word of the kingdo
and snatcheth
one,
evil
standeth it not, then cometh the
This is he
heart.
his
in
sown
been
hath
away that which
was sown
that
he
And
that was sown by the way side.
and
word,
the
h
hearet
that
he
is
this
upon the rocky places,
in
root
not
he
hath
yet
straightway with joy receiveth it;
or
ation
tribul
when
and
while;
a
for
himself, but endureth
straightway he
persecution ariseth because of the word, the thorns, this
among
sown
was
stumbleth. And he that
care of the world, and
is he that heareth the word; and the
and he becometh
word,
the
choke
the deceitfulness of riches,
the good ground,
unfruitful.
And he that was sown upon416
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
this is he that heareth the word, and understandeth it; who
verily beareth fruit, and bringeth forth, some a hundred-
fold, some sixty, some thirty.
Another parable set he before them, saying, The kingdom
of heaven is likened unto a man that sowed good seed in his
field: but while men slept, his enemy came and sowed tares
also among the wheat, and went away. But when the blade
sprang up and brought forth fruit, then appeared the tares
also. And the servants of the householder came and said
unto him, Sir, didst thou not sow good seed in thy field?
whence then hath it tares? And he said unto them, An
enemy hath done this. And the servants say unto him, Wilt
thou then that we go and gather them up? But he saith,
Nay; lest haply while ye gather up the tares, ye root up the
wheat with them. Let both grow together until the harvest:
and in the time of the harvest I will say to the reapers,
Gather up first the tares, and bind them in bundles to burn
them; but gather the wheat into my barn.
Another parable set he before them, saying, The kingdom
of heaven is like unto a grain of mustard seed, which a man
took, and sowed in his field: which indeed is less than all
seeds; but when it is grown, it is greater than the herbs,
and becometh a tree, so that the birds of the heaven come
and lodge in the branches thereof.
Another parable spake he unto them; The kingdom of
heaven is like unto leaven, which a woman took, and hid in
three measures of meal; till it was all leavened.
All these things spake Jesus in parables unto the multi-
tudes; and without a parable spake he nothing unto them:
that it might be fulfilled which was spoken through the
prophet, saying,
I will open my mouth in parables;
I will utter things hidden from the foundation of the
world.
Then he left the multitudes, and went into the house:
and his disciples came unto him, saying, Explain unto us
the parable of the tares of the field. And he answered and
said, He that soweth the good seed is the Son of man; and
the field is the world; and the good seed, these are the sons
of the kingdom; and the tares are the sons of the evil one;
and the enemy that sowed them is the devil: and the harvestTHE
LIFE
OF
JESUS
417
is the end of the world; and the reapers are angels. As
therefore the tares are gathered up and burned with fire; so
shall it be in the end of the world. The Son of man shall
send forth his angels, and they shall gather out of his king-
dom all things that cause stumbling, and them that do
iniquity, and shall cast them into the furnace of fire: there
shall be the weeping and the gnashing of teeth. Then shall
the righteous shine forth as the sun in the kingdom of their
Father. He that hath ears, let him hear.
The kingdom of heaven is like unto a treasure hidden in
the field; which a man found, and hid; and in his joy he
goeth and selleth all that he hath, and buyeth that field.
Again, the kingdom of heaven is like unto a man that is
a merchant seeking goodly pearls: and having found one
pearl of great price, he went and sold all that he had, and
bought it.
Again, the kingdom of heaven is like unto a net, that was
cast into the sea, and gathered of every kind: which, when it
was filled, they drew up on the beach; and they sat down and
gathered the good into vessels, but the bad they cast away.
So shall it be in the end of the world: the angels shall come
forth, and sever the wicked from among the righteous, and
shall cast them into the furnace of fire: there shall be the
weeping and the gnashing ef teeth.
Have ye understood all these things? They say unto him,
who
Yea. And he said unto them, Therefore every scribe
like
is
heaven
of
kingdom
the
to
hath been made a disciple
out of
unto a man that is a householder, who bringeth forth
his treasure things new and old.
par-
And it came to pass, when Jesus had finished these
ables, he departed thence.
THE
CLOSE
OF THE
GREAT
GALILZAN:
MINISTRY
he gave
~ Now when Jesus saw great multitudes about him,
commandment to depart unto the other side.
fol-
And when he was entered into a boat, his disciples
in the
lowed him. And behold, there arose a great tempest
but
sea, insomuch that the boat was covered with the waves:
him,
awoke
and
him,
to
came
they
And
asleep.
was
he
them,
saying, Save, Lord; we perish. And he saith unto418
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
Why are ye fearful, O ye of little faith? Then he arose,
and rebuked the winds and the sea; and there was a great
calm. And the men marvelled, saying, What manner of
man is this, that even the winds and the sea obey him?
And they arrived at the country of the Gerasenes, which
is over against Galilee. And when he was come forth upon
the land, there met him a certain man out of the city, who
had demons; and for a long time he had worn no clothes,
and abode not in any house, but in the tombs. And when
he saw Jesus, he cried out, and fell down before him, and
with a loud voice said, What have I to do with thee, Jesus,
I beseech thee, torment
thou Son of the Most High God?
me not. For he was commanding the unclean spirit to come
For oftentimes it had seized him: and
out from the man.
he was kept under guard, and bound with chains and fet-
ters; and breaking the bands asunder, he was driven of the
demon into the deserts. And Jesus asked him, What is thy
And he said, Legion; for many demons were en-
name?
tered into him. And they entreated him that he would not
command them to depart into the abyss. Now there was
there a herd of many swine feeding on the mountain: and
they entreated him that he would give them leave to enter
into them. And he gave them leave. And the demons came
out from the man, and entered into the swine: and the herd
rushed down the steep into the lake, and were drowned.
And when they that fed them saw what had come to pass,
they fled, and told it in the city and in the country. And
they went out to see what had come to pass; and they came
to Jesus, and found the man, from whom the demons were
gone out, sitting, clothed and in his right mind, at the feet
of Jesus: and they were afraid. And they that saw it told
them how he that was possessed with demons was made
whole. And all the people of the country of the Gerasenes
round -about asked him to depart from them; for they. were
holden with great fear: and he entered into a boat, and
returned. But the man from whom the demons were gone
out prayed him that he might be with him: but he sent him
away, saying, Return to thy house, and declare how great
things God hath done for thee. And he went his way, pub-
lishing throughout the whole city how great things Jesus
had done for him.THE
LIFE
OF
JESUS
419
And as Jesus returned, the multitude welcomed him; for
they were all waiting for him. And behold, there came a
man named Jairus, and he was a ruler of the synagogue:
and he fell down at Jesus’ feet, and besought him to come
into his house; for he had an only daughter, about twelve
years of age, and she was dying. But as he went the mul-
titudes thronged him.
And a woman having an issue of blood twelve years, who
had spent all her living upon physicians, and could not be
healed of any, came behind him, and touched the border of
his garment: and immediately the issue of her blood stanched.
And Jesus said, Who is it that touched me? And when all
denied, Peter said, and they that were with him, Master, the
multitudes press thee and crush thee. But Jesus said, Some
one did touch me; for I perceived. that power had gone
And when the woman saw that she was
forth from me.
trembling, and falling down before him
came
she
hid,
not
declared in the presence of all the people for what cause
And
she touched him, and how she was healed immediately.
whole;
thee
made
hath
faith
he said unto her, Daughter, thy
go in peace.
of
While he yet spake, there cometh one from the ruler
trouble
dead;
is
er
daught
Thy
saying,
house,
gue’s
the synago
Fear
not the Teacher. But Jesus hearing it, answered him,
when
And
whole.
made
be
shall
she
and
,
not: only believe
to enter in
he came to the house, he suffered not any man
the father
and
James,
and
John,
and
Peter,
with him, save
weeping,
were
all
And
of the maiden and her mother.
is not
she
for
not;
Weep
said,
he
but
her:
and bewailing
know-
scorn,
to
him
d
dead, but sleepeth. And they laughe
ing that she was dead.
But he, taking her by the hand,
returned, and
called, saying, Maiden, arise. And her spirit
something
that
nded
comma
he
and
she rose up immediately:
: but he
amazed
were
be given her to eat. And her parents
;
done.
been
had
what
man
no
charged them to tell
his
into
h
comet
he
And he went out from thence; and
the
when
And
him.
w
follo
les
discip
own country; and his
the synagogue: and
sabbath was come, he began to teach in
, Whence hath
saying
,
ished
aston
many hearing him were
om that is given
wisd
the
is
What
and,
s?
thing
these
this man
works wrought
y
might
such
unto this man, and what mean420
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
by his hands?
Is not this the carpenter, the son of Mary,
and brother of James, and Joses, and Judas, and Simon?
and are not his sisters here with us? And they were offended
in him, And Jesus said unto them, A prophet is not without
honor, save in his own country, and among his own kin, and
in his own house. And he could there do no mighty work,
save that he laid his hands upon a few sick folk. and healed
them. And he marvelled because of their unbelief.
And Jesus went about all the cities and the villages,
teaching in their synagogues, and preaching the gospel of
the kingdom, and healing all manner of disease and all
manner of sickness. But when he saw the multitudes, he
was moved with compassion for them, because they were
distressed and scattered, as sheep not having a shepherd.
Then saith he unto his disciples, The harvest indeed is plen-
teous, but the laborers are few.
Pray ye therefore the
Lord of the harvest, that he send forth laborers into his
harvest.
THE
SENDING
OUT
OF
THE
TWELVE
And he called unto him his twelve disciples, and gave
them authority over unclean spirits, to cast them out, and
to heal all manner of disease and all manner of sickness.
These twelve Jesus sent forth, and charged them, saying,
Go not into any way of the Gentiles and enter not into any
city of the Samaritans: but go rather to the lost sheep of
the house of Israel.
And as ye go, preach, saying, The
kingdom of heaven is at hand.
Heal the sick, raise the
dead, cleanse the lepers, cast out demons: freely ye received,
freely give. Get you no gold, nor silver, nor brass in your
purses; no wallet for your journey, neither two coats, nor
shoes, nor staff: for the laborer is worthy of his food. And
into whatsoever city or village ye shall enter, search out
who in it is worthy; and there abide till ye go forth. And
as ye enter into the house, salute it. And if the house be
worthy, let your peace come upon it: but if it be not worthy,
let your peace return to you.
And whosoever shall not
receive you, nor hear your words, as ye go forth out of that
house or that city, shake off the dust of your feet. Verily
I say unto you, It shall be more tolerable for the land of;
' THE
Sodom and Gomorrah
that city.
LIFE
OF
JESUS
421
in the day of judgment,
than for
Behold, I send you forth as sheep in the midst of wolves:
be ye therefore wise as serpents, and harmless as doves. But
beware of men: for they will deliver you up to councils,
and in their synagogues they will scourge you; yea and be-
fore governors and kings shall ye be brought for my sake,
for a testimony to them and to the Gentiles. But when they
deliver you up, be not anxious how or what ye shall speak:
for it shall be given you in that hour what ye shall speak.
For it is not ye. that speak, but the Spirit of your Father
that speaketh in you. And brother shall deliver up brother
to death, and the father his child: and children shall rise
up against parents, and cause them to be put to death. And
ye shall be hated of all men for my name’s sake: but he that
endureth to the end, the same shall be saved. But when
they persecute you in this city, flee into the next: for verily
I say unto you, Ye shall not have gone through the cities of
Israel, till the Son of man be come.
A disciple is not above his teacher, nor a servant above
his lord. It is enough for the disciple that he be as his
teacher, and the servant as his lord. If they have called
the master of the house Beelzebub, how much more them
of his household!
Fear them not therefore: for there ‘is
nothing covered, that shall not be revealed; and hid, that
shall not be known. What I tell you in the darkness, speak
ye in the light; and what ye hear in the ear, proclaim upon
the house-tops.
And be not afraid of them that kill the
body, but are not able to kill the soul: but rather fear him
who is able to destroy both soul and body in hell. Are not
two sparrows sold for a penny? and not one of them shall
fall on the ground without your Father: but the very hairs
of your head are all numbered. Fear not therefore: ye are
of more
value than many
sparrows.
Every one therefore
who shall confess me before men, him will I also confess be-
fore my Father who is in heaven. But whosoever shall deny
me before men, him will I also deny before my Father who
is in heaven.
:
Think not that I came to send peace on the earth: I came
not to send peace, but a sword.For I came
at varianceand
against his father,
to set a man
the daughter
againstTHE
422
NEW
TESTAMENT
:
mother-in-
her mother, and the daughter-in-law against her
household.
own
his
of
they
be
shall
foes
man’s
a
law: and
worthy
not
is
me
than
more
r
He that loveth father or mothe
me is
than
more
er
daught
or
son
loveth
that
he
of me; and
and
cross
his
take
not
doth
not worthy of me. And he that
me.
of
y
worth
not
is
me,
follow after
th
He that receiveth you receiveth me, and he that receive
t
prophe
a
th
receive
that
He
me.
sent
that
him
th
me receive
:
reward
’s
prophet
a
in the name of a prophet shall receive
of a
and he that receiveth a righteous man in the name
And
.
reward
man’s
us
righteous man shall receive a righteo
ones
little
these
of
one
unto
drink
to
give
whosoever shall
verily
a cup of cold water only, in the name of a disciple,
I say unto you he shall in no wise lose his reward.
And it came to pass when Jesus had finished commanding
his twelve disciples, he departed thence to teach and preach
in their cities.
A
PERIOD
OF
WITHDRAWAL
FROM
THE
CROWDS
And king Herod heard thereof; for his name had become
known: and he said, John the Baptizer is risen from the
But
dead, and therefore do these powers work in him.
prophet,
a
is
It
said,
others
And
Elijah.
is
others said, It
even as one of the prophets. But Herod, when he heard
For
thereof, said, John, whom I beheaded, he is risen.
Herod himself had sent forth and laid hold upon John, and
bound him in prison for the sake of Herodias, his brother
Philip’s wife; for he had married her. For John said unto
Herod, It is not lawful for thee to have thy brother’s wife.
And Herodias set herself against him, and desired to kill
him; and she could not; for Herod feared John, knowing
that he was a righteous and holy man, and kept him safe.
And when he heard him, he was much perplexed; and he
heard him gladly. And when a convenient day was come,
that Herod on his birthday made a supper to his lords, and
the high captains, and the chief men of Galilee; and when
the daughter of Herodias herself came in and danced, she
pleased Herod and them that sat at meat with him; and the
king said unto the damsel, Ask of me whatsoever thou wilt,
and I will give it thee. And he sware unto her, WhatsoeverTHE
LIFE
OF
JESUS
423
thou shalt ask of me, I will give it thee, unto the half of my
kingdom.
And she went out, and said unto her mother,
What shall I ask? And she said, The head of John the
Baptizer. And she came in straightway with haste unto the
king, and asked, saying, I will that thou forthwith give me
on a platter the head of John the Baptist. And the king
was exceeding sorry; but for the sake of his oaths, and of
them that sat at meat, he would not reject her. And straight-
way the king sent forth a soldier of his guard, and com-
manded to bring his head: and he went and beheaded him
in the prison, and brought his head on a platter, and gave
it to the damsel; and the damsel gave it to-her mother.
And when his disciples heard thereof, they came and took
up his corpse, and laid it in a tomb.
And the apostles gather themselves together unto Jesus;
and they told him all things, whatsoever they had done, and
whatsoever they had taught. And he saith unto them, Come
ye yourselves apart into a desert place, and rest a while.
For there were many coming and going, and they had no
leisure so much as to eat. And they went away in the boat
to a desert place apart. And the people saw them going,
and many knew them, and they ran together there on foot
from all the cities, and outwent them. And he came forth
and saw a great multitude, and he had compassion on them,
because they were as sheep not having a shepherd: and he
began to teach them many things.
And when the day was
now far spent, his disciples came unto him, and said, The
place is desert, and the day is now far spent; send them
away, that they may go into the country and villages round
But he an-
about, and buy themselves somewhat to eat.
swered and said unto them, Give ye them to eat. And they
say unto him, Shall we go and buy two hundred shillings’
worth of bread, and give them to eat? And he saith unto
them, How many loaves have ye? go and see. And when
they knew, they say, Five, and two fishes. And he com-
manded them that all should sit down by companies upon
the green grass. And they sat down in ranks, by hundreds,
and by fifties. And he took the five loaves and the two
fishes, and looking up to heaven, he blessed, and brake the
loaves; and he gave to the disciples to set before them; and
the two fishes divided he among them all. And they all ate,424
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
n pieces, twelve
and were filled... And they took up broke
that ate the
they,
And
.
fishes
basketfuls, and also of the
men.
and
thous
Joaves were five
les to enter into
And straightway he constrained the discip
side, till he
other
the
unto
him
e
befor
go
to
the boat, and
sent the
had
he
after
‘And
should send the multitudes away.
to
apart
ain
mount
the
into
up
went
he
multitudes away,
there alone. But
pray: and when even was come, he was
distressed by the
sea,
the
of
midst
the
in
the boat was now.
the fourth watch
in
And
waves; for the wind was contrary.
the sea. And
upon
ng
walki
them,
unto
of the night he came
they were
when the disciples saw him walking on the sea,
for fear.
out
cried
they
and
;
ghost
a
is
troubled, saying, It
g, Be, of good
sayin
them,
unto
spake
Jesus
y
ghtwa
strai
But
and
red him
cheer; it is 1; be not afraid. And Peter answe
thee upon the
unto
come
me
bid
thou,
be
it
if
Lord,
said,
down from
waters. And he said, Come. And. .Peter went
to Jesus.
come
to
s
water
the
upon
d
walke
and
boat,
the
and beginning
But when he saw the wind, he was afraid;
And im-
me.
save
Lord,
,
saying
out,
cried
he
sink,
to
hold of
took
and
hand,
his
forth
mediately Jesus stretched
wherefore
faith,
little
of
thou
O
him,
unto
saith
and
him,
up into, the
didst thou doubt? And when they were gone
boat wor-
the
in
were
that
they
And
.
ceased
wind
the
boat,
God.
of
Son
the
art
thou
shipped him, saying, Of/a truth
land,
the
to
came
they
over,
crossed
had
they
when
And
knew
place
that
of
men
the
And: when
unto Gennesaret.
brought
him, they sent into all that region round about, and
they
that
him
ht
besoug
they
and
unto him all that were sick;
many
as.
t:-and
garmen
his
of
border
the
touch
might only
as touched were made whole.
On the morrow the multitude that stood on the other side
one,
of the sea saw that there was no other boat there, save
boat,
the
into
s
disciple
his
with
not
entered
Jesus
and that
but that his disciples went away alone (howbeit there came
boats from Tiberias nigh unto the place where they ate the
bread after the Lord had given thanks): when the multi
tude therefore saw that Jesus was not there, neither his dis-
ciples, they themselves got into the boats, and came to Caper-
naum, seeking Jesus. And when they found him on the
other side of the sea, they said unto him, Rabbi, when camestTHE
/LIFE!
OF
JESUS
425
thou hither? Jesus answered them and said, Verily, verily,
I say unto you, Ye seek me, not because ye saw signs, but
because ye ate of the loaves, and were filled.. Work not for
the food which perisheth, but for the food which abideth
unto eternal life; which the Son of man shall give unto you:
for him the Father, even God; hath sealed.
‘They said
therefore unto him,’ What must we do, that: we may work
the works of God?
Jesus answered and said unto them,
This is the work of God, that ye believe on him whom he
hath sent. They said therefore unto him, What then doest
thou for a sign, that we may see, and believe thee? what
workest thou? Our fathers ate the manna in the wilder-
"ness; as it is written, He gave them bread out of heaven to
eat. Jesus therefore said unto them, Verily, verily, I say
unto you, It was not Moses that gave you the bread out
of heaven; but my Father giveth you the true bread out of
heaven. For the bread of God is that which cometh down
out of heaven, and giveth life unto the world. .They said
therefore unto him, Lord, evermore give us. this’ bread.
Jesus said unto them, I am the bread of life: he that cometh
to me shall not hunger, and he that believeth on me shall
never thirst. But I said unto you, that ye have seen me,
and yet believe not. All that which the Father giveth me
shall come unto me; and him that cometh to me I will in
no wise cast out. For I am come down from heaven, not
to do mine own will; but the will of him that sent me. And
this is the will of him that sent me, that of all that which he
hath given me I should lose nothing, but should raise it up
at the last day. For this is the will of my Father, that every
one
that beholdeth
the Son, and believeth
on him, should
have eternal life; and I will raise him up at the last day.
The Jews therefore murmured concerning him, because he
said, I am the bread which came down out of heaven. And
they said, Is not this Jesus, the son of Joseph, whose father
and mother we know? how doth he now say, I am come
down out of heaven? Jesus answered and said unto them,
Murmur not among yourselves. No man can come to me,
except the Father that sent me draw him: and I will raise
him up in the last day. It is written in the prophets, And
they shall all be taught of God.
Every one that hath heard
from the Father, and hath learned, cometh unto me.
Not426
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
from
that any man hath seen the Father, save he that is
unto
say
I
verily,
Verily,
Father.
the
God, he hath seen
the bread
you, He that believeth hath eternal life. I am
and
of life. Your fathers ate the manna in the wilderness,
out of
they died. This is the bread which cometh down
I am the
heaven, that a man may eat thereof, and not die.
any man
if
:
heaven
of
out
down
came
which
bread
living
bread
the
and
yea
ever:
for
live
eat of this bread, he shall
world.
the
of
life
the
for
flesh,
my
is
give
will
I
which
How
The Jews therefore strove one with another, saying,
said
re
therefo
Jesus
eat?
to
flesh
his
us
give
man
can this
the
eat
ye
Except
you,
unto
unto them, Verily, verily, I say
life
not
have
ye
blood,
his
drink
and
man
of
Son
the
flesh of
He that eateth my flesh and drinketh my
in yourselves.
life; and I will raise him up at the last
eternal
blood hath
day. For my flesh is meat indeed, and my blood is drink
He that eateth my flesh and drinketh my blood
indeed.
me,
abideth in me, and I in him. As the living Father sent
he
me,
eateth
that
he
so
;
Father
the
of
because
and I live
also shall live because of me.
down
out of heaven:
This is the bread which came
not as the fathers ate, and died; he
that eateth this bread shall live for ever. These things said
he in the synagogue, as he taught in Capernaum.
Many therefore of his disciples, when they heard this,
said, This is a hard saying; who can hear it? But Jesus
knowing in himself that his disciples murmured at this, said
unto them, Doth this cause you to stumble? What then if
ye should behold the Son of man ascending where he was
before? It is the spirit that giveth life; the flesh profiteth
nothing: the words that I have spoken unto you are spirit,
and are life. But there are some of you that believe not.
For Jesus knew from the beginning who they were that
believed not, and who it was that should betray him. And
he said, For this cause have I said unto you, that no man
can come unto me, except it be given unto him of the
Father.
Upon this many of his disciples went back, and walked
no more with him. Jesus said therefore unto the twelve,
Would ye also go away? Simon Peter answered him, Lord,
to whom shall we go? thou hast the words of eternal life.
And we have believed and know that thou art the HolyTHE LIFE OF JESUS
427
£/One of God. Jesus answered them, Did not I choose you
the twelve, and one of you is a devil? Now he spake of
Judas the son of Simon Iscariot, for he it was that should
betray him, being one of the twelve.
And there are gathered together unto him the Pharisees,
and certain of the scribes, who had come from Jerusalem,
and had seen that some of his disciples ate their bread with
defiled, that is, unwashen, hands.
(For the Pharisees, and
all the Jews, except they wash their hands diligently, eat
not, holding the tradition of the elders; and when they
come from the marketplace, except they bathe themselves,
they eat not; and many other things there are, which they
have received to hold, washings of cups, and pots, and brazen
vessels.) And the Pharisees and the scribes ask him, Why
walk not thy disciples according to the tradition of the
elders, but eat their bread with defiled hands? And he said
unto them, Well did Isaiah prophesy of you hypocrites, as
it is written,
This people honoreth me with their lips,
But their heart is far from me.
But in vain do they worship me,
Teaching as their doctrines the precepts of men.
Ye leave the commandment of God, and hold fast the tra-
dition of men. And he said unto them, Full well do ye
reject the commandment of God, that ye may keep your
For Moses said, Honor thy father and thy
tradition.
mother; and, He that speaketh evil of father or mother, let
him die the death: but ye say, If a man
shall say to his
father or his mother, That wherewith thou mightest have
been profited by me is Corban, that is to say, Given to God;
ye no longer suffer him to do aught for his father or his
mother; making void the word of God by your tradition,
which ye have delivered: and many such like things ye do.
And he called to him the multitude again, and said unto
them, Hear me all of you, and understand: there is nothing
from without the man, that going into him can defile him;
but the things which proceed out of the man are those that
And when he was entered into the house
defile the man.
from the multitude, his disciples asked of him the parable.
And he saith unto them, Are ye so without understanding
also? Perceive ye not, that whatsoever from without goeth428
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
into the man, it cannot defile him; because it goeth not into
his heart, but into his belly, and goeth out into the draught?
This he said, making all meats clean. And he said, That
which proceedeth out of the man, that defileth the man.
For from within, out of the heart of men, evil thoughts
proceed,’ fornications, thefts, murders, adulteries, covetings,
wickednesses, deceit, lasciviousness, an evil eye, railing, pride,
foolishness: all these evil things proceed from within, and
defile the man.
{
;
And Jesus went out thence, and withdrew into the parts
of Tyre and Sidon. And behold, a Canaanitish woman came
out from those borders, and cried, saying, Have mercy on
me, O Lord, thou son of David; my daughter is grievously
But he answered her not a word.
vexed with a demon.
And his disciples came and besought him, saying, Send her
away; for she crieth after us. But he answered and said,
I was not sent but unto the lost sheep of the house of Israel.
But she came and worshipped him, saying, Lord, help me.
And he answered and said, It is not meet to take the chil-
dren’s bread and cast it to the dogs. But she said, Yea,
Lord: for even the dogs eat of the crumbs which fall from
their masters’ table. Then Jesus answered and said unto
her, O woman, great is thy faith: be it done unto thee
even as thou wilt. And her daughter was healed from that
hour.
And Jesus departed thence, and came nigh unto the sea
of Galilee; and he went up into the mountain, and sat there.
And there came unto him great multitudes, having with
them the lame, blind, dumb, maimed, and many others, and
they cast them down at his feet; and he healed them: inso-
much that the multitude wondered, when they saw the dumb
speaking, the maimed whole, and the lame walking, and’ the
blind seeing: and they glorified the God of Israel.
And Jesus called unto him his disciples, and said, I have
compassion on the multitude, because they continue with me
now three days and have nothing to eat: and I would not
send them away fasting, lest haply they faint on the way.
And the disciples say unto him, Whence should we have so
many loaves in a desert place as to fill so great a multitude?
And Jesus said unto them, How many loaves have ye? And
they said, Seven,
and
a few
small
fishes. And
he com-THE
LIFE
OF
JESUS
429
manded the multitude to sit down on the ground; and he
took the seven loaves and the fishes; and he gave thanks
and brake, and gave to the disciples, and the disciples to the
multitudes.
And they all ate, and were filled: and they
took up that which remained over of the broken pieces, seven
baskets full. And they that did eat were four thousand
men, besides women and children. And he sent away the
multitudes, and entered into the boat, and came into the
borders of Magadan.
And the Pharisees and Sadducees came, and trying him
But he an-
asked him to show them a sign from heaven.
swered and said unto them, When it is evening, ye say, It
will be fair weather: for the heaven is red. And in the
morning, It will be foul weather to-day: for the heaven is
red and lowering. Ye know how to discern the face of the
heaven; but ye cannot discern the signs of the times. An
evil and ‘adulterous generation seeketh after a sign; and
there shall no sign be given unto it, but the sign of Jonah.
And he left them, and departed.
And the disciples came to the other side and forgot to
And Jesus said unto them, Take heed and
take bread.
beware of the leaven of the Pharisees and Sadducees. And
they reasoned among themselves, saying, We took no bread.
And Jesus perceiving it said, O ye of little faith, why rea-
Do
son ye among yourselves, because ye have no bread?
ye not yet perceive, neither remember the five loaves of the
five thousand, and how many baskets ye took up? Neither
the seven loaves of the four thousand, and how many baskets
ye took up? How is it that ye do not perceive that I spake
not to you concerning bread? But beware of the leaven of
the Pharisees and Sadducees. Then understood they that
he bade them not beware of the leaven of bread, but of the
teaching of the Pharisees and Sadducees.
And they come unto Bethsaida. And they bring to him a
blind man, and beseech him to touch him. And he took hold
of the blind man by the hand, and brought him out of the
village; and when he had spit on his eyes, and laid his hands
upon him, he asked him, Seest thou aught? And he looked
up, and said, I see men; for I behold them as trees, walking.
looked
Then again he laid his hand upon his eyes; and he
clearly.
things
all
saw
and
stedfastly, and was restored,430
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
And he sent him away to his home, saying, Do not even
enter into the village.
Now when Jesus came into the parts of Caesarea Philippi,
he asked his disciples, saying, Who do men say that the Son
of man is? And they said, Some say John the Baptist; some,
Elijah; and others, Jeremiah, or one of the prophets. He
saith unto them, But who say ye that I am? And Simon
Peter answered and said, Thou art the Christ, the Son of
the living God. And Jesus answered and said unto him,
Blessed art thou, Simon Bar-Jonah: for flesh and blood hath
not revealed it unto thee, but my Father who is in heaven.
And I also say unto thee, that thou art Peter, and upon this
rock I will build my church; and the gates of Hades shall
not prevail against it. I will give unto thee the keys of the
kingdom of heaven: and whatsoever thou shalt bind on earth
shall be bound in heaven; and whatsoever thou shalt loose
on earth shall be loosed in heaven.
Then charged he the
disciples that they should tell no man that he was the Christ.
From that time began Jesus to show unto his disciples,
that he must go unto Jerusalem, and suffer many things of
the elders and chief priests and scribes, and be killed, and
the third day be raised up. And Peter took him, and began
to rebuke him, saying, Be it far from thee, Lord: this shall
never be unto thee. But he turned, and said unto Peter,
Get thee behind me, Satan: thou art a stumblingblock unto
me: for thou mindest not the things of God, but the things
of men.
‘Then said Jesus unto his disciples, If any man
would come after me, let him deny himself, and take up his
cross, and follow me.
For whosoever would save his life
shall lose it, and whosoever shall lose his life for my sake
shall find it. For what shall a man be profited, if he shall
gain the whole world, and forfeit his life? or what shall a
man give in exchange for his life? For the Son of man
shall come in the glory of his Father with his angels; and
then shall he render unto every man according to his deeds.
Verily I say unto you, There are some of them that stand
here, who shall in no wise taste of death, till they see the
Son of man coming in his kingdom.THE
EVENTS
LIFE
OF
JESUS
FROM
THE
TRANSFIGURATION
SENDING OUT OF THE SEVENTY
431
TO
THE
And after six days Jesus taketh with him Peter, and
James, and John his brother, and bringeth them up into a
high mountain apart: and he was transfigured before them;
and his face did shine as the sun, and his garments became
white as the light. And behold, there appeared unto them
Moses and Elijah talking with him. And Peter answered,
and said unto Jesus, Lord, it is good for us to be here: if
thou wilt, I will make here three tabernacles; one for thee,
and one for Moses, and one for Elijah. While he was yet
speaking, behold, a bright cloud overshadowed them: and
behold, a voice out of the cloud, saying, This is my beloved
Son, in whom I am well pleased; hear ye him. And when
the disciples heard it, they fell on their face, and were sore
afraid. And Jesus came and touched them and said, Arise,
and be not afraid. And lifting up their eyes, they saw no
one, save Jesus only.
And as they were coming down from the mountain, Jesus
commanded them, saying, Tell the vision to no man, until
the Son of man be risen from the dead. And his disciples
asked him, saying, Why then say the scribes that Elijah must
first come? And he answered and said, Elijah indeed com-
eth, and shall restore all things: but I say unto you, that
Elijah is come already, and they knew him not, but did unto
him whatsoever they would. Even so shall the Son of man
also suffer of them.
‘Then understood the disciples that he
spake unto them of John the Baptist.
And when they were come to the multitude, there came
to him a man, kneeling to him, and saying, Lord, have mercy
on my son: for he is epileptic, and suffereth grievously ; for
oft-times he falleth into the fire, and oft-times into the water.
And I brought him to thy disciples, and they could not cure
him. And Jesus answered and said, O faithless and per-
verse generation, how long shall I be with you? how long
shall I bear with you? bring him hither to me. And Jesus
rebuked him; and the demon went out of him: and the boy
was cured from that hour.
Then came the disciples to Jesus apart, and said, Why
could not we cast it out? And_he saith unto them, Because432
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
you, If ye have
of your little faith: for verily I say unto
unto this moun-
say
shall
ye
faith as a grain of mustard seed,
shall remove;
it
and
;
place
r
yonde
to
hence
tain, Remove
you.
unto
and nothing shall be impossible
said unto them,
And while they abode in Galilee, Jesus
hands of men;
the
into
up
The Son of man shall be delivered
shall be raised
he
day
third
the
and
him,
and they shall kill
up. And they were exceeding sorry.
they that re-
And when they were come to Capernaum,
Doth not
said,
and
ceived the half-shekel came to Peter,
And
Yea.
saith,
He
hekel?
half-s
the
your teacher pay
say-
him,
to
first
spake
when he came into the house, Jesus
from
earth,
the
of
kings
the
?
Simon
thou,
ing, What thinkest
their sons, or
whom do they receive toll or tribute? from
ers, Jesus
strang
From
said,
he
when
from strangers? And
But, lest we
free.
are
sons
the
fore
There
him,
unto
said
cast a hook,
cause them to stumble, go thou to the sea, and
and when thou
and take up the fish that first cometh up;
: that take,
shekel
a
find
shalt
thou
,
hast opened his mouth
thee.
and
me
for
them
unto
give
and
, Who
In that hour came the disciples unto Jesus, saying
he called to
then is greatest in the kingdom of heaven? And
and said,
him a little child, and set him in the midst of them,
as little
Verily I say unto you, Except ye turn, and become
om of
kingd
the
into
enter
wise
no
children, ye shall in
as this
heaven. Whosoever therefore shall humble himself
.
heaven
of
om
kingd
the
in
st
greate
the
is
little child, the same
re-
And whoso shall receive one such little child in my name
ones
ceiveth me: but whoso shall cause one of these little
that a
that believe on me to stumble, it is profitable for him
that
and
neck,
his
about
d
hange
be
great millstone should
he should be sunk in the ‘depth of the sea.
Woe unto the world because of occasions of stumbling!
for it must needs be that the occasions come ; but. woe to that
man through whom the occasion cometh! See that ye de-
spise not one of these little ones: for I say unto you, that in
heaven their angels do always behold the face of my Father
who js in heaven. Even so it is not;the will of your Father
who is in heaven, that one of these little ones should perish.
And if thy brother sin against.thee, go, show him his
fault between thee and him alone: if he hear thee, thou hastTHE
‘LIFE;
OF
JESUS
- 433.
gained thy brother. But if he hear thee not, take with thee
one or two more, that at the mouth of two witnesses or
three every word may be established. And if he refuse to
hear them, tell it unto the church, and if he refuse to hear
the church also, let him be unto thee as the Gentile and the
publican.
Verily I+say unto you, What things soever ye
shall bind on earth shall be bound in heaven; and what
things soever ye shall loose on earth shall be loosed in heaven:
Again I say unto you, that if two of you shall agree on earth
as touching anything that they shall ask, it shall be done for
them of my Father who is in heaven.
For where two or
three are gathered together in my name, there am | in the
midst of them.
“Then came Peter and said to him, Lord,
how oft shall my brother sin against me, and I forgive him?
until seven times? Jesus saith unto him, I say not unto
thee, Until seven times; but, Until seventy times seven.
Therefore is the kingdom of heaven likened unto a certain
king, who would make a reckoning with his servants. And
when he had begun to reckon, one was brought unto him,
that owed him ten thousand talents. But forasmuch as he
had not wherewith to pay, his lord commanded him to be
sold, and his wife, and children, and all that he had, and
payment to be made. The servant therefore fell down, and
worshipped him, saying, Lord, have patience with me, and
I will pay thee all. And the lord of that servant, being
moved with compassion, released him, and forgave him the
debt.
But that servant went out, and found one of his
fellow-servants, who owed him a hundred shillings: and he
laid hold on him, and took him by the throat, saying, Pay
what thou owest. So his fellow-servant fell down and _be-
sought him, saying, Have patience with me; and I will pay
thee. And he would not: but went and cast him into prison,
till he should pay that which was due. So when his fellow-
servants saw what was done, they were exceeding sorry, and
came and told unto their lord all that was done. Then his
lord called him unto him, and saith to him, Thou wicked
servant, I forgave thee all that debt, because thou besought
est me: shouldest not thou also have had mercy on thy. fel-
low-servant, even as I had ‘mercy on thee? And his lord was
wroth, and delivered him to the tormentors, till he should
pay all that was due. So shall also my heavenly Father do434 -
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
unto you, if ye forgive not every one his brother from your
hearts.
And after these things Jesus walked in Galilee: for he
would not walk in Judaa, because the Jews sought to kill
him. Now the feast of the Jews, the feast of tabernacles,
was at hand. His brethren therefore said unto him, Depart
hence, and go into Judza, that thy disciples also may behold
thy works which thou doest. For no man doeth anything in
If thou
secret, and himself seeketh to be known openly.
doest these things, manifest thyself to the world. For even
his brethren did not believe on him. Jesus therefore saith
unto them, My time is not yet come; but your time is always
ready.
The world cannot hate you; but me
it hateth, be-
cause I testify of it, that its works are evil. Go ye up unto
the feast: I go not up unto this feast; because my time is
not yet fulfilled. And having said these things unto them,
he abode still in Galilee.
And John answered and said, Master, we saw one casting
out demons in thy name; and we forbade him, because he
followeth not with us. But Jesus said unto him, Forbid him»
not: for he that is not against you is for you.
And it came to pass, when the days were well-nigh come
that he should be received up, he stedfastly set his face to
go to Jerusalem, and sent messengers before his face: and
they went, and entered into a village of the Samaritans, to
make ready for him, and they did not receive him, because
And
his face was as though he were going to Jerusalem.
when his disciples James and John saw this, they said, Lord,
wilt thou that we bid fire to come down from heaven, and
And
But he turned, and rebuked them.
consume them?
they went to another village.
And as they went on the way, a certain man said unto him,
I will follow thee whithersoever thou goest. And Jesus said
unto him, The foxes have holes, and the birds of the heaven
have nests; but the Son of man hath not where to lay his
head. And he said unto another, Follow me. But he said,
Lord, suffer me first to go and bury my father. But he said
unto him, Leave the dead to bury their own dead; but go
And an-
thou and publish abroad the kingdom of God.
other also said, I will follow thee, Lord; but first suffer me
to bid farewell to them that are at my house. But JesusTHE,
LIFE
OF
JESUS
435
said unto him, No man, having put his hand to the plow, and
looking back, is fit for the kingdom of God.
Now after these things the Lord appointed seventy others,
and sent them two and two before his face into every city
and place, whither he himself was about to come.
JESUS
AT THE
FEAST
OF TABERNACLES
But when his brethren were gone up unto the feast, then
went he also up, not publicly, but as it were in secret. The
Jews therefore sought him at the feast, and said, Where is
he? And there was much murmuring among the multitudes
concerning him: some said, He is a good man; others said,
Not so, but he leadeth the multitude astray. Yet no’man
spake openly of him for fear of the Jews.
But when it was now the midst of the feast Jesus went
up into the temple, and taught. The Jews therefore mar-
velled, saying, How knoweth this man letters, having never
learned?
Jesus therefore answered them, and said, My
teaching is not mine, but his that sent me. If any man will-
eth to do his will, he shall know of the teaching, whether it
is of God, or whether I speak from myself. He that speak-
eth from himself seeketh his own glory: but he that seeketh
the glory of him that sent him, the same is true, and no un-
righteousness is in him. Did not Moses give you the law,
and yet none of you doeth the law? Why seek ye to kill
me? ‘The multitude answered, Thou hast a demon: who
seeketh to kill thee? Jesus answered and said unto them, I
did one work, and ye all marvel because thereof.
Moses
hath given you circumcision (not that it is of Moses, but of
the fathers) ; and on the sabbath ye circumcise a man.
If a
man receiveth circumcision on the sabbath, that the law of
Moses may not be broken; are ye wroth with me, because I
made a man every whit whole on the sabbath? Judge not
according to appearance, but judge righteous judgment.
Some therefore of them of Jerusalem said, Is not this he
whom they seek to kill? And lo, he speaketh openly, and they
say nothing unto him. Can it be that the rulers indeed
know that this is the Christ? Howbeit we know this man
whence he is: but when the Christ cometh, no one knoweth
whence he is. Jesus therefore cried in the temple, teaching436
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
and saying, Ye both know me, and know whence I am; and
I am not come of myself, but he that sent me is true, whom
ye know not. I know him; because I am from him, and he
sent me. ‘They sought therefore to take him: and no man
laid his hand on him, because his hour was not yet come.:
But of the multitude many believed on him; and they said,
When the Christ shall come, will he do more signs than
those which this man hath done? The Pharisees heard the
multitude murmuring these things concerning him; and the
chief priests and the Pharisees sent officers to take hint: Jesus
therefore said, Yet a little while am I with you, and I go
unto him that sent me.
Ye shall seek me, and shall not find
me: and where I am, ye cannot come. The Jews therefore
said’ among themselves, Whither will this man go that we
shall not find him? will he go unto the Dispersion among
the Greeks, and teach the Greeks? What is this word that
he said, Ye shall seek me, and shall not find me; and where
I am, ye cannot come?
Now on the last day, the great day of ‘the feast, Jesus
stood and cried, saying, If any man thirst, let him come unto
me and drink. He that believeth on me, as the scripture hath
said, from within him shall flow rivers of living water. But
this spake he of the Spirit, which they that believed on him
-were to receive:
for the Spirit was
Jesus was not yet glorified.
not yet given; because
Some of the multitude there-
fore, when they heard these words, said, This is of a truth
the prophet. Others said, This is the Christ. But some said,
What, doth the Christ come out of Galilee? Hath not the
scripture said that the Christ cometh of the seed of David,
and from Bethlehem, the village where David was?
So
there arose a division in the multitude because of him. And
some of them would have taken him; but no man laid hands
on him.
The officers therefore came to the chief priests and Phari-
sees; and they said unto them, Why did ye not bring him?
The officers answered, Never man so spake. The Pharisees
therefore answered chiar, Are ye also led astray? Hath any
of the rulers believed on him, or of the Pharisees? But this
multitude that knoweth not the law are accursed: Nicode-
mus saith unto them (he that came to him before, being one
of them), Doth our law judge a man, except it-first hearTHES
LIFE
OF?
JESUS437
from himself and know what he doeth?.They answered
and said unto him, Art thou also of Galilee?
Search, and
see that out of Galilee ariseth no prophet.
And ‘they went every man unto his own house: but Jesus
went unto the mount of Olives. And early in the morning
he came again into the temple, and all the people came unto
him; and he sat down, and taught them. And the scribes
and the Pharisees bring a woman taken in adultery; and
having set her in the midst, they say unto him, Teacher, :this
woman hath been taken in adultery, in the very act. Now
in the law» Moses commanded us to stone such: what then
sayest-thou of her? And this they said, trying him, that
they might have whereof to accuse him. But Jesus stooped
down; and with his finger wrote on the ground. But when
they continued asking him, he lifted up himself, and said
unto them, He that is without sin among you, let him first
cast a stone at her. And again he stooped down, and with
his finger wrote on the ground. And they, when they heard
it, went out one by one, beginning from the eldest, even unto
the last: and Jesus was left alone, and the woman, where
she was, in the midst. And Jesus lifted up himself, and said
unto her, Woman, where are they? did no man condemn
And Jesus. said,
And she said, No man, Lord.
thee?
Neither do I condemn thee: go thy way; from. henceforth
na}
sin no more.
Again therefore Jesus spake unto them, saying, I am the
light of the world: he that followeth me shall not walk in
the darkness, but shall have the light of life. The Pharisees
therefore said unto him, Thou bearest witness of thyself;
thy witness is not true. Jesus answered and said unto them,
Even if I. bear-witness of myself, my witness is true; for I
know whence I came, and whither I go; but ye know not
whence I come, or whither I go. Ye judge after the flesh;
I judge no man. Yea and if I judge, my judgment is true;
for I am not alone, but I and the Father that sent me. Yea
and in your law it is written, that the witness of two men is
true: I am he that beareth witness of myself, and the Father
that sent me beareth witness of me. They said therefore
unto him, Where is thy Father? Jesus answered, Ye know
neither me, nor my Father: if ye knew me, ye would know
my Father also. These words spake he in the treasury, as he438
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
taught in the temple: and no man took him; because his
hour was not yet come.
He said therefore again unto them, I go away, and ye
shall seek me, and shall die in your sin: whither I go, ye
cannot come. The Jews therefore said, Will he kill himself,
that he saith, Whither I go, ye cannot come? And he said
unto them, Ye are from beneath; I am from above: ye are
of this world; I am not of this world. I said therefore unto
you, that ye shall die in your sins: for except ye believe that
I am he, ye shall die in your sins. ‘They said therefore unto
him, Who art thou? Jesus said unto them, Even that which
I have also spoken unto you from the beginning. ‘I have
many things to speak and to judge concerning you: howbeit
he that sent me is true; and the things which I heard from
him, these speak I unto the world. ‘They perceived not that
he spake to them of the Father. Jesus therefore said, When
ye have lifted up the Son of man, then shall ye know that I
am he, and that I do nothing of myself, but as the Father
taught me, I speak these things. And he that sent me is with
me; he hath not left me alone; for I do always the things
that are pleasing to him. As he spake these things, many
believed on him.
Jesus therefore said to those Jews that had believed him,
If ye abide in my word, then are ye truly my disciples; and
ye shall know the truth, and the truth shall make you free.
They answered unto him, We are Abraham’s seed, and have
never yet been in bondage to any man: how sayest thou, Ye
shall, be made free? Jesus answered them, Verily, verily, I
say unto you, Every one that committeth sin is the bond-
servant of sin. And the bondservant abideth not in the house
for ever: the son abideth for ever. If therefore the Son shall
make you free, ye shall be free indeed. I know that ye are
Abraham’s seed, yet ye seek to kill me, because my word hath
not free course in you. I speak the things which I have seen
with my Father: and ye also do the things which ye heard
from your father. They answered and said unto him, Our
father is Abraham. Jesus saith unto them, If ye were Abra-
ham’s children, ye would do the works of Abraham.
But
now ye seek to kill me, a man that hath told you the truth,
which I heard from God: this did not Abraham. Ye do the
works of your father. They said unto him, We were notTHE
LIFE
OF
JESUS
439
born of fornication; we have one Father, even Goa. Jesus
said unto them, If God were your Father, ye would love
me: for I came forth and am come from God; for neither
have I come of myself, but he sent me. Why do ye not un-
derstand my speech? Even because ye cannot hear my word.
Ye are of your father the devil, and the lusts of your father
it is your will to do. He was a murderer from the begin-
ning, and standeth not in the truth, because there is no truth
in him. When he speaketh a lie, he speaketh of his own:
for he is a liar, and the father thereof. But because I say
the truth, ye believe me not. Which of you convicteth me
of sin? If I say truth, why do ye not believe me? He that
is of God heareth the words of God: for this cause ye hear
them not; because ye are not of God. The Jews answered
and said unto him, Say we not well that thou art a Samari-
Jesus answered, I have not a de-
tan, and hast a demon?
mon; but I honor my Father, and ye dishonor me. But I
seek not mine own glory: there is one that seeketh and judg-
eth. Verily, verily, I say unto you, If a man keep my word,
we
he shall never see death. The Jews said unto him, Now
proph-
the
and
died,
Abraham
know that thou hast a demon.
he shall
ets; and thou sayest, If a man keep my word,
father
our
than
greater
thou
Art
never taste of death.
makest
whom
died:
prophets
the
and
died?
who
Abraham,
my glory
thou thyself? Jesus answered, If I glorify myself,
whom ye
of
me;
glorifieth
that
Father
my
is
it
is nothing:
him: but I
say, that he is your God ; and ye have not known
should be
I
not,
him
know
I
say,
should
I
if
know him; and
word.
his
keep
and
him,
like unto you, a liar: but I know
it,
saw
he
and
day;
my
see
to
rejoiced
Your father Abraham
art
Thou
him,
unto
said
and was glad. The Jews therefore
Jesus
not yet fifty years old, and hast thou seen Abraham? Abra-
before
you,
unto
said unto them, Verily, verily, I say
therefore to cast
ham was born, I am. They took up stones
of the temple.
out
at him: but Jesus hid himself, and went
his birth.
from
blind
man
a
saw
he
by,
And as he passed
who sinned, this
Rabbi,
,
saying
him,
asked
les
discip
his
And
born blind? Jesus
man, or his parents, that he should be
his parents: but
nor
answered, Neither did this man sin,
est in him. We
that the works of God should be made manif
while it is day:
me,
sent
that
him
of
works
the
must work440
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
the night cometh, when no man can work. When I am in
the world, I am the light of the world. When he had thus
spoken, he spat on the ground, and made clay of the spittle,
and anointed his eyes with the clay, and said unto him, Go,
wash in the pool of Siloam (which is by interpretation,
He went away therefore, and washed, and came
Sent).
seeing. The neighbors therefore, and they that saw him
aforetime, that he was a beggar, said; Is not this he that sat
and begged? Others said, It is he: others said, No, but he
is like him. He said, I am he. ‘They said therefore unto
him, How then were thine eyes opened? He answered, The
man that is called Jesus made clay, and anointed mine eyes,
and said unto me, Go to Siloam, and wash: so I went away
and washed, and I received sight. And they said unto him,
Where is he? He saith, I know not.
They bring to the Pharisees him that aforetime was: blind.
Now it was the sabbath on the day when Jesus made the
clay, and opened his eyes.
Again therefore. the Pharisees
also asked him how he received his sight. And he said unto
them, He put clay upon mine eyes, and I washed, and I see.
Some therefore of the Pharisees said, This man is not from
God, because he keepeth not the sabbath.
But others said,
How can a man that is a sinner do such signs? And there
was a division among them. ‘They say therefore unto .the
blind man again, What sayest thou of him, in that he opened
thine eyes? And he said, He is a prophet. The Jews there-
fore did not believe concerning him, that he had been blind,
and had received his sight, until they called the parents of
him that had received his sight, and asked them, saying, Is
this your son, who ye say was born blind? how then doth he
now see? His parents answered and said, We know that
this is our son, and that he was born blind: but how he now
seeth, we know not; or who opened his eyes, we know not:
ask him; he is of age; he shall speak for himself. ~These
_ things said his parents, because they feared the Jews: for the
Jews had agreed already, that if. any man should confess
him to be Christ, he should be put out of the synagogue.
Therefore said his parents, He if of age; ask him. So
they called'a second time the man that was blind, and said
unto him, Give glory to God: we know that this man is a
sinner. He therefore answered, Whether he is a sinner, I‘THE!
LIFE
'OF! JESUS
441
know not: one thing I know, that, whereas I was blind,
now I see. They said therefore unto him, What did he
to thee? how opened he thine eyes?
He answered them,
I told you even now, and ye did not hear; wherefore would
ye hear it again? would ye also become his disciples? And
they reviled him, and said, Thou art his disciple; but we are
disciples of Moses.
We know that God hath spoken unto.
Moses: but as for this man, we know not whence he is. “The
man answered and said unto them, Why, herein is the mar-
vel, that ye know not whence he is, and yet he opened mine
eyes. We know that God heareth not sinners: but if any
man be a worshipper of God, and do his will, him he hear-
eth. Since the world began it was never heard that any one
opened the eyes of a man born blind. If this man were not
from God, he could do nothing. They answered and said
unto him, Thou wast altogether born in sins, and dost thou
teach us? And they cast him out.
Jesus heard that they had cast him out; and finding him,
he said, Dost thou believe on the Son of God? He answered
and said, And who is he, Lord, that I may believe on him?
Jesus said unto him, Thou hast both seen him, and he it is
that speaketh with thee. And he said, Lord, I believe.. And
he worshipped him. And Jesus said, For judgment came I
into this world, that they that see not may see; and that they
that see may become blind. Those of the Pharisees who were
with him heard these things, and said unto him, Are we also
Jesus said unto them, If ye were blind, ye would
blind?
have no sin: but now ye say, We see: your sin remaineth.
Verily, verily, I say unto you, He that entereth not by the
door into the fold of the sheep, but climbeth up some other
way, the same is a thief and a robber. But he that entereth
in by the door is the shepherd of the sheep. To him the
porter openeth; and the sheep hear his voice: and he calleth
his own sheep by name, and leadeth them out. When he
hath put forth all his own, he goeth before them, and the
sheep follow him: for they know his voice. And a stranger
will they not follow, but will flee from him: for they know
not the voice of strangers. This parable spake Jesus unto
them: but they understood not what things they were which
he spake unto them.
Jesus therefore said unto them again, Verily, verily, I442
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
say unto you, I am the door of the sheep.
All that came
before me are thieves and robbers: but the sheep did not hear
them. I am the door; by me if any man enter in, he shall
be saved, and shall go in and go out, and shall find pasture.
The thief cometh not, but that he may steal, and kill, and
destroy: I came that they may have life, and may have it
I am the good shepherd: the good shepherd
abundantly.
layeth down his life for the sheep. He that is a hireling,
and not a shepherd, whose own the sheep are not, beholdeth
the wolf coming, and leaveth the sheep, and fleeth, and the
wolf snatcheth them, and scattereth them: he fleeth because
he is a hireling, and careth not for the sheep. I am the good
shepherd; and I know mine own, and mine own know me,
even as the Father knoweth me, and I know the Father; and
I lay down my life for the sheep. And other sheep I have,
which are not of this fold: them also I must bring, and they
shall hear my voice; and they shall become one flock, one
shepherd. Therefore doth the Father love me because I lay
down my life, that I may take it again. No one taketh it
away from me, but I lay it down of myself. I have power
to lay it down, and I have power to take it again. This
commandment received I from my Father.
There arose a division again among the Jews because of
these words. And many of them said, He hath a demon,
and is mad; why hear ye him? Others said, These are not
the sayings of one possessed with a demon.
Can a demon
open the eyes of the blind?
MINISTRY
IN
THE
VICINITY
OF
JERUSALEM
And the seventy returned with joy, saying, Lord, even the
demons are subject unto us in thy name. And he said unto
them, I beheld Satan fallen as lightning from heaven.
Be-
hold, I have given you authority to tread upon serpents and
scorpions, and over all the power of the enemy: and nothing
shall in any wise hurt you. Nevertheless in this rejoice not,
that the spirits are subject unto you; but rejoice that your
names are written in heaven.
And behold, a certain lawyer stood up and made trial of
him, saying, Teacher, what shall I do to inherit eternal life?
And he said unto him, What is written in the law? howTHE
LIFE OF JESUS
443
readest thou? And he answering said, Thou shalt love the
Lord thy God with all thy heart, and with all thy soul, and
with all thy strength, and with all thy mind; and thy neigh-
bor as thyself. And he said unto him, Thou hast answered
right: this do, and thou shalt live. But he, desiring to jus-
tify himself, said unto Jesus, And who is my neighbor? Jesus
made answer and said, A certain man was going down
from Jerusalem to Jericho; and he fell among robbers, who
both stripped him and beat him, and departed, leaving him
half dead. And by chance a certain priest was going down
that way: and when he saw him, he passed by on the other
side. And in like manner a Levite also, when he came to
the place, and saw him, passed by on the other side. But a
certain Samaritan, as he journeyed, came where he was: and
when he saw him, he was moved with compassion, and came
to him, and bound up his wounds, pouring on them oil and
wine; and he set him on his own beast, and brought him to
an inn, and took care of him. And on the morrow he took
out two shillings, and gave them to the host, and said, Take
care of him; and whatsoever thou spendest more, I, when I
come back again, will repay thee. Which of these three,
thinkest thou, proved neighbor unto him that fell among the
robbers? And he said, He that showed mercy on him. And
Jesus said unto him, Go, and do thou likewise.
Now as they went on their way, he entered into a certain
village: and a certain woman named Martha received him
into her house. And she had a sister called Mary, who also
But Martha
sat at the Lord’s feet, and heard his word.
was cumbered about much serving; and she came up to him,
and said, Lord, dost thou not care that my sister did leave
me to serve alone? bid her therefore that she help me. But
the Lord answered and said unto her, Martha, Martha, thou
art anxious and troubled about many things: but one thing
is needful: for Mary hath chosen the good part, which shall
not be taken away from her.
And one out of the multitude said unto him, Teacher, bid
my brother divide the inheritance with me. But he said
unto him, Man, who made me a judge or a divider over
you? And he said unto them, Take heed, and keep your-
selves from all covetousness: for a man’s life consisteth not
in the abundance of the things which he possesseth. And heTHE
444
NEW. TESTAMENT
spake a parable unto them, saying, The ground of a certain.
rich man brought forth plentifully: and he reasoned within
himself, saying, What shall I do, because I have not where
to bestow my fruits? And he said, This will I do: 1 will
pull down my barns, and build greater; and there will I
bestow all my grain and my goods. And I will say to my
soul, Soul, thou hast. much goods laid up for many years;
But God said unto
take thine ease, eat, drink, be merry.
him, Thou foolish one, this night is thy soul required of
thee; and the things which thou hast prepared, whose shall
they be? So is he that layeth up treasure for himself, and
is not rich toward God.
Let your loins be girded about, and your lamps burn-
ing; and be ye yourselves like unto men looking for their
lord, when he shall return from the marriage feast; that,
when he cometh and knocketh, they may straightway open
unto him. Blessed are those servants, whom the lord when
he cometh shall find watching: verily I say unto you, that he
shall gird himself, and make them sit downto meat, and
shall come and serve them. And if he shall come in the
second watch, and if in the third, and find them so, blessed
are those servants. But know this, that if the master of the
house had known in what hour the thief was coming, he
would have watched, and not have left his house to be
broken through. Be ye also ready: for in an hour that ye
think not the Son of man cometh.
And Peter said, Lord, speakest thou this parable unto us,
or even
unto
all?
And
the Lord
said, Who
then
is the
faithful and wise steward, whom his lord shall set over his
household, to give them their portion of food in due season?
Blessed is that servant, whom his lord when he cometh shall
find so doing. Of a truth I say unto you, that he will set
him over. all that he hath. But if that servant shall say in
his heart, My lord delayeth his coming; and shall begin to
beat the men-servants and the maid-servants, and to eat and
drink, and to be drunken; the lord of that servant shall
come in a day when he expecteth not, and in an hour when
he knoweth not, and shall cut him asunder, and appoint his
portion with the unfaithful. And that servant, who knew
his lord’s will, and made not ready, nor did according to his
will, shall be beaten with many stripes; but he that knewTHE
“LIFE!
OF
“JESUS|
445
not, and did things worthy of stripes, shall be beaten with
few stripes. And to whomsoever much is given, of him shall
much be required: and to whom they commit much, of him
will they ask the more.
Now there were some present at that very season who told
him of the Galileans, whose blood Pilate had mingled with
their sacrifices. And he answered and said unto them, Think
ye that these Galilaans were sinners above all the Galilaans,
because they have suffered these things? I tell you, Nay: but,
except ye repent, ye shall all in like manner perish. Or
those eighteen, upon whom the tower in Siloam fell, and
killed them, think ye that they were offenders above all the
men that dwell in Jerusalem? I tell you, Nay: but, except
ye repent, ye shall all likewise perish.
- And he spake this parable; A certain man had a fig-tree
planted in his vineyard; and he came seeking fruit thereon,
and found none.
And he said unto the vinedresser,’ Behold,
these three years I come seeking fruit on this fig-tree, and
find none: cut it down; why doth it also cumber the ground?
And he answering saith unto him, Lord, let it alone this
year also, till I shall dig about it, and dung it: and if it
bear fruit thenceforth, well; but if not, thou shalt cut it
down.
And he was teaching in one of the synagogues on the sab-
bath day.’ And behold, a woman that had a spirit of in-
firmity eighteen years; and she was bowed together, and
could in no wise lift herself up.. And when Jesus saw her,
he called her, and said to her, Woman, thou art loosed from
thine infirmity. And he laid his hands upon her: and im-
mediately she was made straight, and glorified God. And
the ruler of the synagogue, being moved with indignation
because Jesus had healed on the sabbath, answered and said
to the multitude, There are six days in which men ought to
work: in them therefore come and be healed, and not on the
day of the sabbath. But the Lord answered him, and said,
Ye hypocrites, doth not each one of you on the sabbath loose
his ox or his ass from the stall, and lead him away to water-
‘ing? And ought not this woman, being a daughter of Abra-
ham, whom Satan had bound, lo, these eighteen years, to
have been loosed from this bond on the day of the sabbath?
And as he said these things, all his adversaries were: put to446
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
shame: and all the multitude rejoiced for all the glorious
things that were done by him.
THE
FEAST
OF
THE DEDICATION AND
ACROSS JORDAN
THE
FLIGHT
And it was the feast of the dedication at Jerusalem: it
was winter; and Jesus was walking in the temple in Solo-
mon’s porch. The Jews therefore came round about him,
and said unto him, How long dost thou hold us in suspense?
If thou art the Christ, tell us plainly. Jesus answered them,
I told you, and ye believe not: the works that I do in my
Father’s name, these bear witness of me. But ye believe not,
because ye are not of my sheep. My sheep hear my voice, and
I know them, and they follow me: and I give unto them
eternal life; and they shall never perish, and no one shall
snatch them out of my hand. My Father, who hath given
them unto me, is greater than all; and no one is-able to
snatch them out of the Father’s hand.
I and the Father
are one. The Jews took up stones again to stone him. Jesus
answered them, Many good works have I showed you from
the Father; for which of those works do ye stone me? ‘The
Jews answered him, For a good work we stone thee not, but
for blasphemy; and because that thou, being a man, makest
thyself God. Jesus answered them, Is it not written in your
law, I said, Ye are gods? If he called them gods, unto
whom the word of God came (and the scripture cannot be
broken), say ye of him, whom the Father sanctified and sent
into the world, Thou blasphemest ; because I said, I am the
Son of God? If I do not the works of my Father, believe
me not. But if I do them, though ye believe not me, believe
the works: that ye may know and understand that the
Father is in me, and I in the Father. They sought again to
take him: and he went forth out of their hand. —
And he went away again beyond the Jordan into the place
where John was at the first baptizing; and there he abode.
And many came unto him; and they said, John indeed did no
sign: but all things whatsoever John spake of this man were
true. And many believed on him there.
And he went on his way through cities and villages, teach-
ing, and journeying on unto Jerusalem,
And one said untoTHE
LIFE
OF
JESUS
447
him, Lord, are they few that are saved? And he said unto
them, Strive to enter in by the narrow door: for many, |
say unto you, shall seek to enter in, and shall not be able.
In that very hour there came certain Pharisees, saying to
him, Get thee out, and go hence: for Herod would fain kill
thee. And he said unto them, Go and say to that fox, Be-
hold, I cast out demons and perform cures to-day and to-
morrow, and the third day I am perfected. Nevertheless I
must go on my way to-day and to-morrow and the day fol-
lowing: for it cannot be that a prophet perish out of Jeru-
salem. O Jerusalem, Jerusalem, that killeth the prophets,
and stoneth them are sent unto her! how often would I have
gathered thy children together, even as a hen gathereth her
own brood under her wings, and ye would not! Behold,
your house is left unto you desolate: and I say unto you, Ye
shall not see me, until ye shall say, Blessed is he that cometh
in the name of the Lord.
A
GROUP
OF
PARABLES
And he spake a parable unto those that were bidden, when
he marked how they chose out the chief seats; saying unto
them, When thou art bidden of any man to a marriage feast,
sit not down in the chief seat; lest haply a more honorable
man than thou be bidden of him, and he that bade thee and
him shall come and say to thee, Give this man place; and
then thou shalt begin with shame to take the lowest place.
But when thou art bidden, go and sit down in the lowest
place; that when he that hath bidden thee cometh, he may
say to thee, Friend, go up higher: then shalt thou have glory
in the presence of all that sit at meat with thee. For every
that
one that exalteth himself shall be humbled; and he
humbleth himself shall be exalted.
And he said to him also that had bidden him, When thou
nor thy —
makest a dinner or a supper, call not thy friends,
they
haply
lest
;
ors
neighb
rich
nor
,
brethren, nor thy kinsmen
But
also bid thee again, and a recompense be made thee.
the
,
maimed
the
poor,
the
bid
when thou makest a feast,
they have
because
;
blessed
be
shalt
thou
and
blind:
the
lame,
be recom-
not wherewith to recompense thee: for thou shalt
pensed in the resurrection of the just.448
THE NEW TESTAMENT
‘And when one of them that sat at meat with him heard
these things, he said unto him, Blessed is he that shall eat
bread in the kingdom of God. But he said unto him, A cer-
tain man made a great supper; and he bade many: and he
sent forth his servant at supper time to say to them that were
bidden, Come; for all things are now ready. And they all
with one consent began to make excuse. ‘The first said unto
him, I have bought a field, and I must needs go out and see
it; I pray thee have me excused. And another said, I have
bought five yoke of oxen, and I go to prove them; I pray
thee have me excused. And another said, I have married a
wife, and therefore I cannot come. And the servant came,
and told his lord these things. “Then the master of the house
being angry said to his servant, Go out quickly into the
streets and lanes of the city, and bring in hither the poor and
maimed and blind and lame. And the servant said, Lord,
what thou didst command is done, and yet there is room.
And the lord said unto the servant, Go out into the high-
ways and hedges, and constrain them to come in, that my
house may be filled.
For I say unto you, that none of those
men that were bidden shall taste of my supper.
Now there went with him great multitudes: and he
turned, and said unto them, If ‘any man cometh unto me, and
hateth not his‘own father, and mother, and wife, and chil-
dren, and brethren, and sisters, yea, and his own life also, he
cannot be my disciple. Whosoever doth not bear his own
cross, and come after me, cannot be my disciple. For which
of you, desiring to build a tower, doth not first sit down and
count the cost, whether he have wherewith to complete it?
Lest haply, when he hath laid a foundation, and is not able
to finish, all that behold begin to mock him, saying, This
man began to build, and was not able to finish. Or what
king, as he goeth to encounter another king in war, will not
sit down first and take counsel whether he is able with ten
thousand to meet him that cometh against him with twenty
thousand? Or else, while the other is yet a great way off,
he sendeth an ambassage, and asketh conditions of peace. So
therefore whosoever he be of you that renounceth’ not all
that he hath, he cannot be my disciple. He that hath ears to
hear, let him hear.
Now all the publicans and sinners were drawing near untoTHE;
him to hear him.
murmured,
LIFE:
OF
JESUS
449
And both the Pharisees and the scribes
saying, This man
receiveth
sinners, and eateth
with them,
And he spake unto them this parable, saying, What man
‘of you, having a hundred sheep, and having lost one of them,
doth not leave the ninety and nine in the wilderness, and go
after that which is lost, until he find it? And when he hath
found it, he layeth it on his shoulder, rejoicing. And when
he cometh home, he calleth together his friends and_ his
neighbors, saying unto them, Rejoice with me, for I have
found my sheep which was lost. I say unto you, that even
so there shall be joy in’heaven over one sinner. that repent-
eth, more than over ninety and nine righteous persons, who
need no repentance.
Or what woman having ten pieces of silver, if she lose one
piece, doth not light a lamp, and sweep the house,: and seek
diligently until she find it?) And when she hath, found it,
she calleth together her friends and neighbors, saying, Re-
joice with me, for I have found the piece ‘which I had lost.
Even so, I say unto you, there is joy in the presence of the
angels of God over one sinner that repenteth.
And he said, A certain man had two sons: and the younger
of them said to his father, Father, give me the portion of thy
substance that falleth to me. And he divided unto them his
living. And not many days after, the younger son gathered
all together and took his journey into a far country; and
there he wasted his substance with riotous living. And when
he had spent all, there arose a mighty famine in that country;
and he began to be in want. And he went and joined him-
self to one of the citizens of that country; and he sent him
into his fields to feed.swine. And he would fain have filled
his belly with the husks that the swine did eat: and no man
gave unto him. But when he came to himself he said, How
many hired servants of my father’s have bread enough and to
spare, and I perish here with hunger! I will arise and go to my
father, and will say unto him, Father, I have sinned against
heaven, and. in thy sight: I am no more worthy to be called
thy son: make me as one of thy hired servants. And he arose,
and came to his father. But while he was yet afar off, his
father saw him, and was moved with compassion, and ran,
and fell-on his neck, and kissed him.
And the son said unto450
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
him, Father, I have sinned against heaven, and in thy sight:
I am no more worthy to be called thy son. But the father
said to his servants, Bring forth quickly the best robe, and
put it on him; and put a ring on his hand, and shoes on his.
feet: and bring the fatted calf, and kill it, and let us eat, and
make merry: for this my son was dead, and is alive again;
he was lost, and is found. And they began to be merry. Now
his elder son was in the field: and as he came and drew nigh
to the house, he heard music and dancing. And he called to
him one of the servants, and inquired what these things
might be. And he said unto him, Thy brother is come; and
thy father hath killed the fatted calf, because he hath re-
ceived him safe and sound. But he was angry, and would
not go in: and his father came out, and entreated him. But
he answered and said to his father, Lo, these many years do
I serve thee, and I never transgressed a commandment of
thine; and yet thou never gavest me a kid, that I might make |
merry with my friends: but when this thy son came, who
hath devoured thy living with harlots, thou killedst for him
the fatted calf. And he said unto him, Son, thou art ever
with me, and all that is mine is thine. But it was meet to
make merry and be glad: for this thy brother was dead, and
is alive again; and was lost, and is found.
And he said also unto his disciples, There was a certain
rich man, who had a steward; and the same was accused
unto him that he was wasting his goods. And he called him,
and said unto him, What is this that I hear of thee? render
the account of thy stewardship; for thou canst be no longer
steward. And the steward said within himself, What shall
I do, seeing that my lord taketh away the stewardship from
me? I have not strength to dig; to beg I am ashamed. [I am
resolved what to do, that, when I am put out of the steward-
ship, they may receive me into their houses. And calling to
him each one of his lord’s debtors, he said to the first, How
much owest thou unto my lord? And he said, A hundred
-measures of oil. And he said unto him, Take thy bond, and
sit down quickly and write fifty. Then said he to another,
And how much owest thou? And he said, A hundred meas-
ures of wheat. He saith unto him, Take thy bond, and write
fourscore. And his lord commended the unrighteous steward
because he had done wisely: for the sons of this world areTHE
LIFE
OF
JESUS
451
for their own generation wiser than the sons of the light.
And I say unto you, Make to yourselves friends by means of
the mammon of unrighteousness; that, when it shall fail,
they may receive you into the eternal tabernacles. He that
is faithful in a very little is faithful also in much: and he
that is unrighteous in a very little is unrighteous also in
much.
If therefore ye have not been faithful in the un-
righteous mammon, who will commit to your trust the true
riches? And if ye have not been faithful in that which is
another’s, who will give you that which is your own?
And the Pharisees, who were lovers of money, heard all
these things; and they scoffed at him. And he said -unto
them, Ye are they that justify yourselves in the sight of men;
but God knoweth your hearts: for that which is exalted
among men is an abomination in the sight of God. The law
and the prophets were until John: from that time the gospel
of the kingdom of God is preached, and every man entereth
violently into it. But it is easier for heaven and earth to
pass away, than for one tittle of the law to fall.
Now
there was a certain rich man, and he was clothed in
purple and fine linen, faring sumptuously every day: and a
certain beggar named Lazarus was laid at his gate, full of
sores, and desiring to be fed with the crumbs that fell from
the rich man’s table; yea, even the dogs came and licked his
sores. And it came to pass, that the beggar died, and that
he was carried away by the angels into Abraham’s bosom:
and the rich man also died, and was buried. And in clades
he lifted up his eyes, being in torments, and seeth Abraham
afar off, and Lazarus in his bosom. And he cried and said,
Father Abraham, have mercy on me, and send Lazarus, that
he may dip the tip of*his finger in water, and cool my tongue;
for I am in anguish in this flame. But Abraham said, Son,
remember that thou in thy lifetime receivedst thy good
things, and Lazarus in like manner evil things: but now here
he is comforted, and thou art in anguish. And besides all
this, between us and you there is a great gulf fixed, that
they that would pass from hence to you may not be able, and
that none may cross over from thence to us. And he said,
I pray thee therefore, father, that thou wouldest send him
may
to my father’s house; for I have five brethren; that he
tor-
of
place
this
into
come
also
they
lest
them,
testify unto452
THE
NEW?
TESTAMENT
But Abraham said, They have Moses and the
ment.
And he said, Nay, father
prophets; let them hear them.
Abraham: but if one go to them from the dead, they will
repent. And he said unto him, If they hear not Moses and
the prophets, neither will they be persuaded, if one rise from
the dead.
And the apostles said unto the Lord, Increase our faith.
And the Lord said, If ye had faith as a grain of mustard
seed, ye would: say unto this sycamine tree, Be thou rooted
up, and be.thou planted in the sea; and it would obey you.
But who is there of you, having a-servant plowing or keep-
ing sheep, that will say unto him, when he is come in from
the field, Come straightway and sit down to meat; and will
not rather say unto him, Make ready wherewith I may sup,
and gird thyself, and serve me, till I have eaten and drunken;
and afterward thou shalt eat and drink? Doth he thank the
servant because he did the things that were commanded?
Even so ye also, when ye shall have done all the things that
are commanded you, say, We are unprofitable servants; we
have done that which it was our duty to do.
THE
RAISING
OF
LAZARUS
FROM
THE
DEAD
Now a certain man was sick, Lazarus of Bethany, of the
village of Mary and her sister Martha. And it was that
Mary who anointed the Lord with ointment, and wiped his
feet with her hair, whose brother Lazarus was sick. The
sisters therefore sent unto him, saying, Lord, behold, he whom
thou lovest is sick. But when Jesus heard it, he said, This
sickness it not unto death, but for the glory of God, that the
son of God may be glorified thereby.
Now Jesus loved
Martha, and her sister, and Lazarus.
When therefore he
heard that he was sick, he abode at that time two days in
the place where he was. Then after this he saith to the
disciples, Let us go into Judza again. The disciples say
unto him, Rabbi, the Jews were but now seeking to stone
thee; and goest thou thither again? Jesus answered, Are
there not twelve hours in the day? »If a man walk in the
day, he stumbleth not, because he seeth the light of this
world. But if a man walk in the night, he stumbleth, be-
cause the light is not in him. These things spake he: andTHE
LIFE
OF
JESUS
453
after this he saith unto them, Our friend Lazarus is fallen
asleep; but I go, that I may awake him out of sleep. The
disciples therefore said unto him, Lord, if he is fallen asleep,
he will recover.
Now Jesus had spoken of his death: but
they thought that he spake of taking rest in sleep. “Then
Jesus therefore said unto them plainly, Lazarus is dead. And
I am glad for your sakes that I was not there, to the intent
ye may believe; nevertheless let us go unto him. ‘Thomas
therefore, who is called Didymus, said unto his fellow-
disciples, Let us also go, that we may die with him.
So when Jesus came, he found that he had been in the
tomb four days already. Now Bethany was nigh unto Jeru-
salem, about fifteen furlongs off; and many of the Jews had
come to Martha and Mary, to console them concerning their
brother. Martha therefore, when she heard that Jesus was
coming, went and met him: but Mary still sat in the house.
Martha therefore said unto Jesus, Lord, if thou hadst been
here, my brother had not died. And even now I know that,
whatsoever thou shalt ask of God, God will give thee. Jesus
saith unto her, Thy brother shall rise again. Martha saith
unto him, I know that he shall rise again in the resurrection
at the last day.
Jesus said unto her, I am
the resurrection,
and the life: he that believeth on me, though he die, yet
shall he live; and whosoever liveth and believeth on me shall
never die. Believest thou this? She saith unto him, Yea,
Lord: I have believed that thou art the Christ, the Son of
God, even he that cometh into the world. And when she
had said this, she went away, and called Mary her sister
secretly, saying, The Teacher is here, and calleth thee. And
she, when she heard it, arose quickly, and went unto him.
(Now Jesus was not yet come into the village, but was still
in the place where Martha met him.) The Jews then who
were with her in the house, and were consoling her, when
they saw Mary, that she rose up quickly and went out, fol-
lowed her, supposing that she was going unto the tomb to
Mary therefore, when she came where Jesus
weep there.
was, and saw him, fell down at his feet, saying unto him,
Lord, if thou hadst been here, my brother had not died.
When Jesus therefore saw her weeping, and the Jews also
weeping who came with her, he groaned in the spirit, and
was troubled, and said, Where have ye laid him? ‘They say454
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
unto him, Lord, come and see. Jesus wept. The Jews
therefore said, Behold how he loved him! But some of them
said, Could not this man, who opened the eyes of him that
was blind, have caused that this man
also should not die?
Jesus therefore again groaning in himself cometh to the
tomb. Now it was a cave, and a stone lay against it. Jesus
Martha, the sister of him
saith, Take ye away the stone.
that was dead, saith unto him, Lord, by this time the body
decayeth; for he hath been dead four days. Jesus saith unto
her, Said I not ‘unto thee, that, if thou believedst, thou
shouldest see the glory of God? So they took away the stone.
And Jesus lifted up his eyes, and said, Father, I thank thee
that thou heardest me. And I knew that thou hearest me
always: but because of the multitude that standeth around
I said it, that they may believe that thou didst send me.
And when he had thus spoken, he cried with a loud voice,
Lazarus, come forth. He that was dead came forth, bound
hand and foot with grave-clothes; and his face was bound
about with a napkin. Jesus saith unto them, Loose him, and
let him go.
Many therefore of the Jews who came to Mary and be-
held that which he did, believed on him. But some of them
went away to the Pharisees, and told them the things which
Jesus had done.
The chief priests therefore and the Pharisees gathered a
council, and said, What do we? for this man doeth many
If we let him thus alone, all men will believe on
signs.
him: and the Romans will come and take away both our
place and our nation. But a certain one of them, Caiaphas,
being high priest that year, said unto them, Ye know noth-
ing at all, nor do ye take account that it is expedient for you
that one man should die for the people, and that the whole
nation perish not. Now this he said not of himself: but
being high priest that year, he prophesied that Jesus should
die for the nation; and not for the nation only, but that he
might also gather together into one the children of God that
So from that day forth they took
are scattered abroad.
counsel that they might put him to death.
Jesus therefore walked no more openly among the Jews,
but departed thence into the country near to the wilderness,THE
LIFE
into a city called Ephraim;
disciples.
THE
FINAL
JOURNEY
OF
JESUS
455
and there he tarried with the
TOWARD
JERUSALEM
And it came to pass, as they were on their way to Jeru-
salem, that he was passing along the borders of Samaria and
Galilee. And as he entered into a certain village, there met
him ten men that were lepers, who stood afar off: and they
lifted up their voices, saying, Jesus, Master, have mercy on
us. And when he saw them, he said unto them, Go and
show yourselves unto the priests. And it came to pass, as
they went, they were cleansed. And one of them, when he
saw that he was healed, turned back, with a loud voice
glorifying God; and he fell upon his face at his feet, giving
him thanks: and he was a Samaritan.
And Jesus answering
said, Were not the ten cleansed? but where are the nine?
Were there none found that returned to give glory to God,
save this stranger? And he said unto him, Arise, and go thy
way: thy faith hath made thee whole.
And being asked by the Pharisees, when the kingdom of
God cometh, he answered them and said, The kingdom of
God cometh not with observation: neither shall they say, Lo,
here! or, There! for lo, the kingdom of God is within you.
And he said unto the disciples, The days will come, when
ye shall desire to see one of the days of the Son of man, and
ye shall not see it. And they shall say to you, Lo, there!
Lo, here! go not away, nor follow after them: for as the
lightning, when it lighteneth out of the one part under the
heaven, shineth unto the other part under heaven; so shall
the Son of man be in his day. But first must he suffer many
things and be rejected of this generation.
And as it came
to pass in the days of Noah, even so shall it be also in the
days of the Son of man.
They ate, they drank, they mar-
ried, they were given in marriage, until the day that Noah
entered into the ark, and the flood came, and destroyed them
all. Likewise even as it came to pass in the days of Lot;
they ate, they drank, they bought, they sold, they planted,
they builded; but in the day that Lot went out from Sodom
it rained fire and brimstone from heaven, and destroyed
them all: after the same manner shall it be in the day that456
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
the Son of man is revealed. In that day, he that shall be
on the house-top, and his goods in the house, let him not go
down to take them away: and let him that is in the field
likewise not return back. Remember Lot’s wife. I say unto
you, In that night there shall be two men on one bed; the
one shall be taken, and the other shall be left. “There shall
be two women grinding together; the one shall be taken,
and the other shall be left. And they answering say unto
And he said unto them, Where the
him, Where, Lord?
body is, thither will:the eagles also be gathered together.
And he spake a parable unto them to the end that they
ought always to pray, and not to faint; saying, There was in
a city a judge, who feared not God, and regarded not man:
and there was a widow in that city; and she came oft unto
him, saying, Avenge me of mine adversary. And he would
not for a while: but afterward he said within himself,
Though I fear not God, nor regard man; yet because this
widow troubleth me, I will avenge her, lest she wear me out
And the Lord said, Hear what
by her continual coming.
the unrighteous judge saith. And shall not God avenge his
elect, that cry to him day and night, and yet he is longsuf-
fering over them? I say unto you, that he will avenge them
speedily. Nevertheless, when the Son of man cometh, shall
he find faith on the earth?
And he spake also this parable unto certain who trusted in
themselves that they were righteous, and set all others at
nought: Two men went up into the temple to pray; the one
a Pharisee, and the other a publican. The Pharisee stood
and prayed thus with himself, God, I thank thee, that 1 am
not as the rest of men, extortioners, unjust, adulterers, or
even as this publican. I fast twice in the week; I give tithes
of all that I get. But the publican, standing afar off, would
not lift up so much as his eyes unto heaven, but smote his
breast, saying, God, be thou mericiful to me a sinner. I say
unto you, This man went down to his house justified rather
than the other.
And he arose from thence, and cometh into the borders of
Judzea and beyond the Jordan: and multitudes come together
unto him again; and, as he was wont, he taught them again.
Then were there brought unto him little children, that he
should lay his hands on them, and pray: and the disciplesTHE
‘LIFE!
OF
‘JESUS
457
rebuked them. But Jesus said, Suffer the little children, and
forbid them not, to come unto me: for to such belongeth the
kingdom of heaven. And he laid his hands on them, and de-
parted thence.
And behold, one came to him and said, Teacher, what
good thing shall I do, that I may have eternal life? And he
said unto him, Why askest thou me concerning that which
is good? One there is who is good: but if thou wouldest
enter into life, keep the commandments.
He saith unto him,
Which?
And Jesus said, Thou shalt not kill, Thou shalt
not commit adultery, Thou shalt not steal, Thou shalt not
bear false witness, Honor thy father and thy mother; and,
Thou shalt love thy neighbor as thyself. The young man
saith unto him, All these things have I observed: what lack
I yet? Jesus said unto him, If thou wouldest be perfect, go,
sell that which thou hast, and give to the poor, and thou
shalt have treasure in heaven: and come follow me. But
when the young man heard the saying, he went away sor-
rowful; for he was one that had great possessions.
And Jesus said unto his disciples, Verily I say unto you,
It is hard for a rich man to enter into the kingdom of
heaven. And again I say unto you, It is easier for a camel to
go through a needle’s eye, than for a rich man to enter into
the kingdom of God. And when the disciples heard it, they
were astonished exceedingly, saying, Who then can be saved?
And Jesus looking upon them said to them, With men this
is impossible; but with God all things are possible. ‘Then
answered Peter and said unto him, Lo, we have left all, and
followed thee; what then shall we have? And Jesus-said
unto them, Verily I say unto you, that ye who have followed
me, in the regeneration when the Son of man shall sit on the
ineone of his glory, ye also shall sit upon twelve thrones
judging the twelve tribes of Israel. And every one that hath
left houses, or brethren, or sisters, or father, or mother,
or ciildrens or lands, fot my name’s sake, shall receive a
hundredfold, and shall inherit eternal life.
But many shall
be last that are first: and first that are last.
For the kingdom of heaven is like unto a man that was a
householder, who went out early in the morning to hire
laborers into his vineyard. And when he had agreed with
the laborers for a shilling a day, he sent them into his vine-458
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
yard. And he went out about the third hour, and saw others
standing in the marketplace idle; and to them he said, Go
ye also into the vineyard, and whatsoever is right I will give
you. And they went their way. Again he went out about
the sixth and the ninth hour, and did likewise.
And about
the eleventh hour he went out, and -found others standing;
and he saith unto them, Why stand ye here all the day idle?
They say unto him, Because no man hath hired us. He saith
unto them, Go ye also into the vineyard. And when even
was come, the lord of the vineyard saith unto his steward,
Call the laborers, and pay them their hire, beginning from
the last unto the first. And when they came that were hired
about the eleventh hour, they received every man a shilling.
And when the first came, they supposed that they would
receive more; and they likewise received every man a shilling.
And when they received it, they murmured against the house-
holder, saying, These last have spent but one hour, and thou
hast made them equal unto us, who have borne the burden
of the day and the scorching heat. But he answered and
said to one of them, Friend, I do thee no wrong: didst not
thou agree with me for a shilling? ‘Take up that which is
thine, and go thy way; it is my will to give unto this last,
even as unto thee. Is it not lawful for me to do what I will
with mine own? or is thine eye evil, because I am good? So
the last shall be first, and the first last.
And as Jesus was going up to Jerusalem, he took the
twelve disciples apart, and on the way he said unto them,
Behold, we go up to Jerusalem; and the Son of man shall
be delivered unto the chief priests and scribes; and they shall
condemn him to death, and shall deliver him unto the Gen-
tiles to mock, and to scourge, and to crucify: and the third
day he shall be raised up.
‘Then came to him the mother of the sons of Zebedee with
her sons, worshipping him, and asking a certain thing of him.
And he said unto her, What wouldest thou? She saith unto
him, Command that these my two sons may sit, one on thy
right hand, and one on thy left hand, in thy kingdom. But
Jesus answered and said, Ye know not what ye ask. Are ye
able to drink the cup that I am about to drink? They say
unto him, We are able. He saith unto them, My cup indeed
ye shall drink: but to sit on my right hand, and on my leftTHE
-LIFE,
OF
JESUS
459
hand, is not mine to give; but it is for them for whom it
hath been prepared of my Father. And when the ten heard
it, they were moved with indignation concerning the two
brethren.
But Jesus called them unto him, and said, Ye
know that the rulers of the Gentiles lord it over them, and
their great ones exercise authority over them. Not so shall
it be among you: but whosoever would become great among
you shall be your minister; and whosoever would be first
among you shall be your servant: even as the Son of man
came not to be ministered unto, but to minister, and to give
his life a ransom for many.
And as they went out from Jericho, a great multitude
followed him. ,And behold, two blind men sitting by the
way side, when they heard that Jesus was passing by, cried
out, saying, Lord, have mercy on us, thou son of David.
And the multitude rebuked them, that they should hold their
peace: but they cried out the more, saying, Lord, have mercy
on us, thou son of David. And Jesus stood still, and called
them, and said, What will ye that I should do unto you?
They say unto him, Lord, that our eyes may be opened. And
Jesus, being moved with compassion, touched their eyes;
and straightway they received their sight, and followed
him.
And he entered and was passing through Jericho. And
behold, a man called by name Zaccheus; and he was a chief
publican, and he was rich. And he sought to see Jesus who
he was; and could not for the crowd, because he was little of
stature.
And he ran on before, and climbed up into a syco-
more tree to see him: for he.was to pass that way. And
when Jesus came to the place, he looked up, and said unto
him, Zacchzus,
make
haste, and come
down;
for to-day I
must abide at thy house. And he made haste, and came
down, and received him joyfully. And when they saw it,
they all murmured, saying, He is gone in to lodge with a
the
man that is a sinner. And Zaccheus stood, and said unto
poor;
the
to
give
I
goods
my
of
half
the
Lord, Behold, Lord,
and if I have wrongfully exacted aught of any man I restore
And Jesus said unto him, To-day is salvation
fourfold.
house, forasmuch as he also is a son of Abraham.
this
to
come
was
For the Son of man came to seek and to save that which
lost.460
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
And when he had thus spoken, he went on before, going
up to Jerusalem.
Now the passover of the Jews was at hand: and many
went up to Jerusalem out of the country before the passover,
to purify themselves. They sought therefore for Jesus, and
spake one with another, as they stood in the temple, What
think ye? That he will not come to the feast? Now the
chief priests and the Pharisees had given commandment, that,
if any man knew where he was, he should show it, that they
might take him.
Jesus therefore six days before the passover came to Beth-
any, where Lazarus was, whom Jesus raised from the dead.
So they made him a supper there: and Martha served; but
Lazarus was one of them that sat at meat with him. Mary
therefore took a pound of ointment of pure nard, very pre-
cious, and anointed the feet of Jesus, and wiped his feet with
her hair: and the house was filled with the odor of the oint-
ment.
But Judas Iscariot, one of his disciples, that should
betray him, saith, Why was not this ointment sold for three
hundred shillings, and given to the poor? Now this he said,
not because he cared for the poor ;but because he was a thief,
and having the bag took away what was put therein. Jesus
therefore said, Suffer her to keep it against the day of my
burying. For the poor ye have always with you; but me ye
have not always.
The common people therefore of the Jews learned that
he was there: and they came, not for Jesus’ sake only, but
that they might see Lazarus also, whom he had raised from
the dead. But the chief priests took counsel that they might
put Lazarus also to death; because that by reason of him
many of the Jews went away, and believed on Jesus.
THE
TRIUMPHAL
ENTRY:
OPENING
PASSION WEEK
EVENTS
;
OF
And it came to pass, when he drew nigh unto Bethphage
and Bethany, at the mount that is called Olivet, he sent two
of the disciples, saying, Go your way into the village over
against you; in which as ye enter ye shall find a colt tied,
whereon no man ever yet sat: loose him, and bring him.
And if any one ask you, Why do ye loose him? thus shall yeTHE
LIFE
OF
JESUS
461
say, The Lord hath need of him.
And they that were
sent went away, and found even as he had said unto them.
And as they were loosing the colt, the owners thereof
said unto them, Why loose ye the colt? And they said,
The Lord hath need of him. And they brought him to
Jesus: and they threw their garments upon the colt, and set
Jesus thereon. And as he went, they spread their garments
in the way. And as he was now drawing nigh even at the
descent of the mount of Olives, the whole multitude of the
disciples began to rejoice and praise God with a loud voice
for all the mighty works which they had seen; saying,
Blessed is the King that cometh in the name of the Lord:
peace in heaven, and glory in the highest. And some of the
Pharisees from the multitude said unto him, Teacher, re-
buke thy disciples. And he answered and said, I tell you
that; if these shall hold their peace, the stones will cry
out.
And when he drew nigh, he saw the city and wept over it,
saying, If thou hadst known in this day, even thou, the
things which belong unto peace! but now they are hid from
thine eyes. For the days shall come upon thee, when thine
enemies shall cast up a bank
about thee, and compass
thee
round, and keep thee in on every side, and shall dash thee to
the ground, and thy children within thee; and they shall not
leave in thee one stone upon another; because thou knewest
not the time of thy visitation.
And on the morrow, when they were come out from Beth-
any, he hungered.
leaves, he came,
And seeing a fig-tree afar off having
if haply he might find anything thereon:
and when he came to it, he found nothing but leaves; for it
was not the season of figs. And he answered and said unto
it, No man eat fruit from thee henceforward for ever. And
his disciples heard it.
And the blind and the lame came to him in the temple;
But when the chief priests and the
and he healed them.
scribes saw the wonderful things that he did, and the chil-
dren that were crying in the temple and saying, Hosanna to
the son of David; they were moved with indignation, and
said unto him, Hearest thou what these are saying? And
Jesus saith unto them, Yea: did ye never read, Out of the
mouth of babes and sucklings thou hast perfected praise?462
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
,
And he left them, and went forth out of the city to Bethany
;
and lodged there.
And every evening he went forth out of the city.
And as they passed by in the morning, they saw the fig-
tree withered away from the roots. And Peter calling to
remembrance saith unto him, Rabbi, behold, the fig-tree
which thou cursedst is withered away. And Jesus answer-
ing saith unto them, Have faith in God. Verily I say unto
you, Whosoever shall say unto this mountain, Be thou taken
up and cast into the sea; and shall not doubt in his heart, but
shall believe that what he saith cometh to pass; he shall
have it.
And they come again to Jerusalem: and as he was walk-
ing in the temple, there come to him the chief priests, and
the scribes, and the elders; and they said unto him, By what
authority doest thou these things? or who gave thee this
authority to do these things? And Jesus said unto them,
I will ask of you one question, and answer me, and I will
tell you by what authority I do these things. The baptism
of John, was it from heaven, or from men? answer me.
And they reasoned with themselves, saying, If we shall say,
From heaven; he will say, Why then did ye not believe him?
But should we say, From men—they feared the people: for
all verily held John to be a prophet. And they answered
Jesus and say, We know not. And Jesus saith unto them,
Neither tell I you by what authority I do these things.
But what think ye? A man had two sons; and he came
to the first, and said, Son, go work to-day in the vineyard.
And he answered and said, I will not: but afterward he
And he came to the second,
repented himself, and went.
and said likewise. And he answered and said, I go, sir:
and went not. Which of the two did the will of his father?
They say, The first. Jesus saith unto them, Verily I say
unto you, that the publicans and the harlots go into the
kingdom of God before you. For John came unto you in
the way of righteousness, and ye believed him not; but the
publicans and the harlots believed him: and ye, when ye
saw it, did not even repent yourselves afterward, that ye
might believe him.
Hear another parable: There was a man that was a house-
holder, who planted a vineyard, and set a hedge about it, andTHE
LIFE
OF
JESUS
463
digged a winepress in it, and built a tower, and let it out to
husbandmen, and went into another country. And: when the
season of the fruits drew near, he sent his servants to the hus-
baridmen, to receive his fruits. And the husbandmen took his
servants, and beat one, and killed another, and stoned anoth-
er. Again, he sent other servants more than the first: and they
did unto them in like manner.
But afterward he sent unto
them his son, saying, They will reverence my son. But the
husbandmen, when they saw the son, said among themselves,
This is the heir; come, let us kill him, and take his inherit-
ance. And they took him, and cast him forth out of the
vineyard, and killed him. When therefore the lord of the
vineyard shall come, what will he do unto those husband-
men? They say unto him, He will miserably destroy those
miserable men, and will let out the vineyard unto other
husbandmen, who shall render him the fruits in their seasons.
Jesus saith unto them, Did ye never read in the scriptures,
The stone which the builders rejected,
The same was made the head of the corner;
This was from the Lord,
And it is marvellous in our eyes?
Therefore say I unto you, The kingdom of God shall be
taken away from you, and shall be given to a nation bring-
ing forth the fruits thereof. And he that falleth on this
stone shall be broken to pieces: but on whomsoever it shall
fall, it will scatter him as dust. And when the chief priests
and the Pharisees heard his parables, they perceived that he
spake of them. And when they sought to lay hold on him,
they feared the multitudes, because they took him for a
prophet.
And Jesus answered and spake again in parables unto
them, saying, The kingdom of heaven is likened unto a cer-
tain king, who made a marriage feast for his son, and sent
forth his servants to call them that were bidden to the mar-
riage feast: and they would not come. Again he sent forth
other servants, saying, Tell them that are bidden, Behold,
I have made ready my dinner; my oxen and my fatlings are
killed, and all things are ready: come to the marriage feast.
But they made light of it, and went their ways, one to his
own farm, another to his merchandise; and the rest laid
killed
hold on his servants, and treated them shamefully, and464
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
them. But the king was wroth; and he sent his armies, and
destroyed .those murderers, and burned their city. Then
saith he to his servants, The wedding is ready, but they that
were bidden were not worthy. Go ye therefore unto the
partings of the highways, and as many as ye shall find, bid
to the marriage feast. And those servants went out into
the highways, and gathered together all as many as they
found, both bad and good: and the wedding was filled with
guests. But when the king came in to behold the guests, he
saw there a man who had not on a wedding-garment: and he
saith unto him, Friend, how camest thou in hither not hav-
ing a wedding-garment? And he was speechless. “Then the
king said to the servants, Bind him hand and foot, and
cast him out into the outer darkness; there shall be the
weeping and the gnashing of teeth. For many are called,
but few chosen.
Then went the Pharisees, and took counsel how they
might ensnare him in his talk. And they send to him their
disciples, with the Herodians, saying, Teacher, we know
that thou art true, and teachest the way of God in truth,
and carest not for any one: for thou regardest not the
person of men. Tell us therefore, What thinkest thou? Is
it lawful to give tribute unto Cesar, or not? But Jesus per-
ceived their wickedness, and said, Why make ye trial of me, ye
hypocrites? Show me the tribute money. And they brought
unto him a denarius. And he saith unto them, Whose is this
image and superscription?
‘They say unto him, Cesar’s.
Then saith he unto them, Render therefore unto Czsar the
things that are Casar’s; and unto God the things that are
God’s. And when they heard it, they marvelled, and left
him, and went
away.
On that day there came to him Sadducees, they that say
that there is no resurrection: and they asked him, saying,
Teacher, Moses said, If a man die, having no children, his
brother shall marry his wife, and raise up seed unto his
brother. Now there were with us seven brethren: and the
first married and deceased, and having no seed left his
wife unto his brother; in like manner the second also, and
the third, unto the seventh. And after them all, the woman
died. In the resurrection therefore whose wife shall she be
of the seven? for they all had her. But Jesus answered andTHE
LIFE
OF
JESUS
465
said unto them, Ye do err, not knowing the scriptures, nor
For in the resurrection they neither
the power of God.
marry, nor are given in marriage, but are as angels in
But as touching the resurrection of the dead, have
heaven.
ye not read that which was spoken unto you by God, saying,
I am the God of Abraham, and the God of Isaac, and the
God of Jacob? God is not the God of the dead, but of the
living. And when the multitudes heard it, they were as-
tonished at his teaching.
But the Pharisees, when they heard that he had put the
And
Sadducees to silence, gathered themselves together.
one of them, a lawyer, asked him a question, trying him:
Teacher, which is the great commandment in the law? And
he said unto him, Thou shalt love the Lord thy God with
all thy heart, and with all thy soul, and with all thy mind.
And a second
This is the great and first commandment.
like unto it is this, Thou shalt love thy neighbor as thyself.
On these two commandments the whole law hangeth, and
the prophets.
Now while the Pharisees were gathered together, Jesus
asked them a question, saying, What think ye of the Christ ?
whose son is he? They say unto him, The son of David.
He saith unto them, How then doth David in the Spirit call
him Lord, saying,
The Lord said unto my Lord,
Sit thou on my right hand,
Till I put thine enemies underneath thy feet?
no
If David then calleth him Lord, how is he his son? And
man
any
durst
neither
word,
a
him
answer
to
able
one was
from that day forth ask him any more questions.
s,
Then spake Jesus to the multitudes and to his disciple
all
seat:
Moses’
on
sit
es
saying, The scribes and the Pharise
and ob-
things therefore whatsoever they bid you, these do
and do
say,
they
for
serve: but do not ye after their works;
borne,
be
to
s
grievou
and
s
burden
heavy
bind
not. Yea, they
ves will
and lay them on men’s shoulders; but they themsel
they
works
their
all
But
finger.
their
not move them with
phylacteries,
do to be seen of men: for they make broad their
and love the chief
and enlarge the borders of their garments,
ues, and the
synagog
the
in
seats
chief
the
and
feasts,
at
place
of men,
called
be
to
and
laces,
salutations in the marketp466
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
Rabbi. But be not ye called Rabbi: for one is your teacher,
and all ye are brethren. And call no man your father on
the earth: for one is your Father, even he who is in heaven.
Neither be ye called masters: for one is your master, even
the Christ. But he that is greatest among you shall be your
servant.
But woe unto you, scribes and Pharisees, hypocrites! be-
cause ye shut the kingdom of heaven against men: for ye
enter not in yourselves, neither suffer ye them that are en-
tering in to enter.
Woe unto you, scribes and Pharisees, hypocrites! for ye
compass sea and land to make one proselyte; and when he
is become so, ye make him twofold more a son of hell than
yourselves.
Woe unto you, ye blind guides, that say, Whosoever shall
swear by the temple, it is nothing; but whosoever shall
swear by the gold of the temple, he is a debtor. Ye fools
and blind: for which is greater, the gold, or the temple that
hath sanctified the gold? And, Whosoever shall swear by
the altar, it is nothing; but whosoever shall swear by the
gift that is upon it, he is a debtor. Ye blind: for which is
greater, the gift, or the altar that sanctifieth the gift? He
therefore that sweareth by the altar, sweareth by it, and
by all things thereon. And he that sweareth by the temple,
sweareth by it, and by him that dwelleth therein. And he
that sweareth by the heaven, sweareth by the throne of God,
and by him that sitteth thereon.
Woe unto you, scribes and Pharisees, hypocrites! for ye
tithe mint and anise and cummin, and have left undone the
weightier matters of the law, justice, and mercy, and faith:
but these ye ought to have done, and not to have left the
other undone.
Ye blind guides, that strain out the gnat,
and swallow the camel!
Woe unto you, scribes and Pharisees, hypocrites! for ye
cleanse the outside of the cup and of the platter, but within
they are full from extortion and excess. Thou blind Phari-
see, cleanse first the inside of the cup and of the platter,
that the outside thereof may become clean also.
;
Woe unto you, scribes and Pharisees, hypocrites! for ye
are like unto whited sepulchres, which outwardly appear
beautiful, but inwardly are full of dead men’s bones, and ofTHE
LIFE
OF
JESUS
467
Even so ye also outwardly appear right-
all uncleanness.
eous unto men, but inwardly ye are full of hypocrisy and
iniquity.
Woe unto you, scribes and Pharisees, hypocrites! for ye
build the sepulchres of the prophets, and garnish the tombs
of the righteous, and say, If we had been in the days of our
fathers, we should not have been partakers with them in
the blood of the prophets. Wherefore ye witness to your-
selves, that ye are sons of them that slew the prophets. Fill
ye up then the measure of your fathers. Ye serpents, ye
offspring of vipers, how shall ye escape the judgment of
hell? Therefore, behold, I send unto you prophets, and
wise men, and scribes: some of them shall ye kill and crucify;
and some of them shall ye scourge in your synagogues, and
persecute from city to city: that upon you may come all the
righteous blood shed on the earth, from the blood of Abel
the righteous unto the blood of Zachariah son of Barachiah,
whom ye slew between the sanctuary and the altar. Verily
I say unto you, All these things shall come upon this genera-
tion.
And he sat down over against the treasury, and beheld
how the multitude cast money into the treasury: and many
that were rich cast in much. And there came a poor widow,
and she cast in two mites, which make a farthing. And he
called unto him his disciples, and said unto them, Verily I
say unto you, This poor widow cast in more than all they
that are casting into the treasury: for they all did cast in of
their superfluity; but she of her want did cast in all that she
had, even all her living.
DISCUSSIONS
REGARDING
THE
FUTURE
Now there were certain Greeks among those that went up
who
to worship at the feast: these therefore came to Philip, Sir,
saying,
was of Bethsaida of Galilee, and asked him,
Philip cometh and telleth Andrew:
we would see Jesus.
and they tell Jesus. And Jesus
Philip,
and
cometh,
Andrew
hour is come that the Son of
The
answereth them, saying,
verily, I say unto you,
Verily,
d.
glorifie
be
should
man
earth and die, it abid-
the
into
fall
Except a grain of wheat
beareth much fruit.
it
die,
it
if
but
alone;
itself
eth by468
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
He that loveth his life loseth it; and he that hateth his life
lf any man
in this world shall keep it unto life eternal.
serve me, let him follow me; and where I am, there shall
also my servant be: if any man serve me, him will the
Father honor. Now is my soul troubled; and what shall I
say? Father, save me from this hour. But for this cause
came I unto this hour. Father, glorify thy name.
There
came therefore a voice out of heaven, saying, I have both
glorified it, and will glorify it again. The multitude there-
fore, that stood by, and heard it, said that it had thundered:
others said, An angel hath spoken to him. Jesus answered
and said, This voice hath not come for my sake, but for
your sakes. Now is the judgment of this world: now shall
the prince of this world be cast out. And I, if I be lifted
But
up from the earth, will draw all men unto myself.
this he said, signifying by what manner of death he should
die. The multitude therefore answered him, We have heard
out of the law that the Christ abideth for ever: and how
sayest thou, The Son of man must be lifted up? who is this
son of man?
Jesus therefore said unto them, Yet a little
while is the light among you. Walk while ye have the light,
’ that darkness overtake you not: and he that walketh in the
darkness knoweth not whither he goeth. While ye have the
light, believe on the light, that ye may become sons of light.
These things spake Jesus, and he departed and hid himself
from them. But though he had done so many signs before
them, yet they believed not on him: that the word of Isaiah
the prophet might be fulfilled, which he spake,
Lord, who hath believed our report?
And to whom hath the arm of the Lord been revealed?
For this cause they could not believe, for that Isaiah said
again,
He hath blinded their eyes, and he hardened their heart;
Lest they should see with their eyes, and perceive with
their heart,
And should turn,
And I should heal them.
These things said Isaiah, because he saw his giory; and
he spake of him. Nevertheless even of the rulers many be-
lieved on him; but because of the Pharisees they did not
confess it, lest they should be put out of the synagogue: forTHE
LIFE
OF JESUS
469
they loved the glory that is of men more than the glory
that is of God.
And Jesus cried and said, He that believeth on me, be-
lieveth not on me, but on him that sent me.
And he that
beholdeth me beholdeth him that sent me.
I am come a
light into the world, that whosoever believeth on me may
not abide in the darkness. And if any man hear my sayings,
and keep them not, I judge him not: for I came not to
judge the world, but to save the world.
He that rejecteth
me, and receiveth not my sayings, hath one that judgeth
him: the word that I spake, the same shall judge him in the
last day. For I spake not from myself; but the Father that
sent me, he hath given me a commandment, what I should
say, and what I should speak. And I know that his com-
mandment is life eternal; the things therefore which I speak,
even as the Father hath said unto me, so I speak.
And every day he was teaching in the temple; and every
night he went out, and lodged in the mount that is called
Olivet. And all the people came early in the morning to
him in the temple, to hear him.
And as he went forth out of the temple, one of his dis-
ciples saith unto him, Teacher, behold, what manner of
stones and what manner of buildings! And Jesus said unto
him, Seest thou these great buildings? there shall not be
‘left here one stone upon another, which shall not be thrown
down.
And as he sat on the mount of Olives over against the
temple, Peter and James and John and Andrew asked him
privately, Tell us, when shall these things be? and what
shall be the sign when these things are all about to be accom-
And Jesus began to say unto them, Take heed
plished?
lead you astray. Many shall come in my name,
man
no
that
saying, I am he; and shall lead many astray. And when
ve shall hear of wars and rumors of wars, be not troubled:
these things must
needs come
to pass; but the end is not
yet. For nation shall rise against nation, and kingdom
against kingdom; there shall be earthquakes in divers places;
there shall be famines: these things are the beginning of
travail.
But take ye heed to yourselves: for they shall deliver you
up to councils; and in synagogues shall ye be beaten; and470
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
for
before governors and kings shall ye stand for my sake,
be
first
must
gospel
the
And
a testimony unto them.
deliver
shall
brother
And
nations.
the
all
unto
d
preache
n
up brother to death, and the father his child; and childre
to
put
be
to
them
cause
and
parents,
against
up
rise
shall
death. And ye shall be hated of all men for my name’s
sake: but he that endureth to the end, the same shall be
saved.
But when ye see the abomination of desolation standing
where he ought not (let him that readeth understand),
then let them that are in Judea flee unto the mountains:
and let him that is on the house-top not go down, nor enter
in, to take anything out of his house: and let him that is in
the field not return back to take his cloak. But woe unto
them that are with child and to them that give suck in those
For
And pray ye that it be not in the winter.
days!
been
not
hath
there
as
such
on,
tribulati
be
shall
those days
the like from the beginning of the creation which God cre-
ated until now, and never shall be. And except the Lord
had shortened the days, no flesh would have been saved; but
for the elect’s sake, whom he chose, he shortened the days.
And then if any man shall say unto you, Lo, here is the
Christ; or, Lo, there; believe it not: for there shall arise
false Christs and false prophets, and shall show signs and
wonders, that they may lead astray, if possible, the elect.
But take ye heed: behold, I have told you all things before-
hand.
But in those days, after that tribulation, the sun shall be
darkened, and the moon shall not give her light, and the
stars shall be falling from heaven, and the powers that are
in the heavens shall be shaken. And then shall they see
the Son of man coming in clouds with great power and glory.
And then shall he send forth the angels, and shall gather to-
gether his elect from
the four winds,
from
the uttermost
part of the earth to the uttermost part of heaven.
Now from the fig-tree learn her parable: when her branch
is now become tender, and putteth forth its leaves, ye know
that the summer is nigh; even so ye also, when ye see these
things coming to pass, know ye that he is nigh, even at the
doors. Verily I say unto you, This generation shall not pass
away, until all these things be accomplished.
Heaven andTHE
LIFE
OF
JESUS
47)
earth shall pass away: but my words shall not pass away.
- But of that day or that hour knoweth no one, not even the
angels in heaven, neither the Son, but the Father.
Take ye heed, watch and pray: for ye know not when the
time is. It is as when a man, sojourning in another country,
having left his house, and given authority to his servants,
to each one his work, commanded also the porter to watch.
Watch therefore: for ye know not when the lord of the
house cometh, whether at even, or at midnight, or at cock-
crowing, or in the morning; lest coming suddenly he find
And what I say unto you I say unto all,
you sleeping.
Watch.
Then shall the kingdom of heaven be likened unto ten
virgins, who took their lamps, and went forth to meet the
bridegroom. And five of them were foolish, and five were
wise. For the foolish, when they took their lamps, took no
oil with them: but the wise took oil in their vessels with
Now while the bridegroom tarried, they all
their lamps.
Be-
slumbered and slept. But at midnight there is a cry,
Then
him.
meet
to
forth
ye
Come
om!
bridegro
the
hold,
the
all those virgins arose, and trimmed their lamps. And
for our
oil;
your
of
us
Give
wise,
the
unto
said
foolish
Per-
lamps are going out. But the wise answered, saying,
go ye
adventure there will not be enough for us and you:
while
rather to them that sell, and buy for yourselves. And
that
they
and
came;
om
bridegro
the
buy,
to
away
they went
and
feast:
marriage
the
to
were ready went in with him
virgins,
other
the
also
came
d
Afterwar
shut.
was
the door
and said,
saying, Lord, Lord, open to us. But he answered
,
therefore
Watch
not.
you
know
I
you,
unto
Verily I say
hour.
the
for ye know not the day nor
another country,
For it is as when a man, going into
them his goods.
unto
red
called his own servants, and delive
r two, to an-
anothe
to
,
talents
five
gave
he
And unto one
y; and he
abilit
l
severa
his
other one; to each according to
the five
ed
receiv
that
he
y
ghtwa
Strai
y.
went on his journe
five
other
made
and
talents went and traded with them,
two
the
ed
receiv
that
also
he
r
manne
In like
talents.
the one went away
gained other two. But he that received
Now
money.
lord’s
his
hid
and
earth,
and digged in the
and
,
cometh
ts
after a long time the lord of those servan472
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
maketh a reckoning with them. And he that received the
five talents came and brought other five talents, saying,
Lord, thou deliveredst unto me five talents: lo, I have gained
other five talents.
His lord said unto him, Well done,
good and faithful servant: thou hast been faithful over a few
things, I will set thee over many things; enter thou into
the joy of thy lord. And he also that received the two
talents came and said, Lord, thou deliveredst unto me two
talents: lo, I have gained other two talents. His lord said
unto him, Well done, good and faithful servant: thou hast
been faithful over a few things, I will set thee over many
things; enter thou into the joy of thy lord. And he also
that had received the one talent came and said, Lord, I
knew thee that thou art a hard man, reaping where thou
didst not sow, and gathering where thou didst not scatter;
and I was afraid, and went away and hid thy talent in the
earth: lo, thou hast thine own. But his lord answered and
said unto him, Thou wicked and slothful servant, thou
knewest that I reap where I sowed not, and gather where I
did not scatter; thou oughtest therefore to have put my
money to the bankers, and at my coming I should have rez
ceived back mine own with interest. “Take ye away there-
fore the talent from him, and give it unto him that hath
the ten talents. For unto every one that hath shall be given,
and he shall have abundance: but from him that hath not,
even that which he hath shall be taken away.
And cast ye
out the unprofitable servant into the outer darkness: there
shall be the weeping and the gnashing of teeth.
But when the Son of man shall come in his glory, and all
the angels with him, then shall he sit on the throne of his
glory: and before him shall be gathered all the nations: and
he shall separate them one from another, as the shepherd
separateth the sheep from the goats; and he shall set the
sheep on his right hand, but the goats on the left. Then shall
the King say unto them on his right hand, Come, ye blessed
of my Father, inherit the kingdom prepared for you from
the foundation of the world: for I was hungry, and ye gave
me to eat; I was thirsty, and ye gave me drink; I was a
stranger, and ye took me in; naked, and ye clothed me; I
was sick, and ye visited me; I was in prison, and ye came
_ unto me.
Then shall the righteous answer him, saying,THE LIFE OF JESUS
473
Lord, when saw we thee hungry, and fed thee? or athirst,
and gave thee drink? And when saw we thee a stranger,
and took thee in? or naked, and clothed thee? And when
saw we thee sick, or in prison, and came unto thee? And
the King shall answer and say unto them, Verily I say unto
you, Inasmuch as ye did it unto one of these my brethren,
even these least, ye did it unto me. Then shall he say also
unto them on the left hand, Depart from me, ye cursed, into
the eternal fire which is prepared for the devil and_ his
angels: for I was hungry, and ye did not give me to eat;
I was thirsty, and ye gave me no drink; I was a stranger,
and ye took me not in; naked, and ye clothed me not; sick,
and in prison, and ye visited me not. Then shall they also
answer, saying, Lord, when saw we thee hungry, or athirst,
or a stranger, or naked, or sick, or in prison, and did not
minister unto thee? Then shall he answer them, saying,
Verily I say unto you, Inasmuch as ye did it not unto one
And these shall go
of these least, ye did it not unto me.
away into eternal punishment: but the righteous into eternal
life.
And it came to pass, when Jesus had finished all these
words, he said unto his disciples, Ye know that after two
days the passover cometh, and the Son of man is delivered up
‘Then were gathered together the chief
to be crucified.
of the people, unto the court of the
elders
the
and
priests,
high priest, who was called Caiaphas; and they took counsel
together that they might take Jesus by subtlety, and kill
him. But they said, Not during the feast, lest a tumult
arise among the people.
Then one of the twelve, who was called Judas Iscariot,
went unto the chief priests, and said, What are ye willing
to give me, and I will deliver him unto you? And _ they
weighed unto him thirty pieces of silver. And from that
time he sought opportunity to deliver him unto them.
JESUS’
LAST
SUPPER
WITH
HIS
DISCIPLES
the
And the day of unleavened bread. came, on which.
John,
and
Peter
sent
he
And
ed.
sacrific
passover must be
we may
saying, Go and make ready for us the passover, that
we
that
thou
wilt
Where
him,
eat. And they said unto474
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
make ready? And he said unto them, Behold, when ye are
entered into the city, there shall meet you a man bearing a
pitcher of water;
follow him into the house whereinto
he
goeth. And ye shall say unto the master of the house, The
Teacher saith unto thee, Where is the guest-chamber, where
I shall eat the passover with my disciples? And he will
show you a large upper room furnished: there make ready.
And they went, and found as he had said unto them: and
they made ready the passover.
And when the hour was come, he sat down, and the apos-
tles with him.
And there arose also a contention among them, which of
them was accounted to be greatest. And he said unto them,
The kings of the Gentiles have lordship oyer them; and they
But
that have authority over them are called Benefactors.
let
you,
among
greater
the
is
that
he
but
so:
be
not
shall
ye
him become as the younger: and he that is chief, as he that
For which is greater, he that sitteth at meat,
doth serve.
or he that serveth? is not he that sitteth at meat? but I am
in the midst of you as he that serveth. But ye are they that
have continued with me in my temptation; and I appoint
unto you a kingdom, even as my Father appointed unto me,
that ye may eat and drink at my table in my kingdom; and
ye shall sit on thrones judging the twelve tribes of Israel.
And during supper, the devil having already put into the
heart of Judas Iscariot, Simon’s son, to betray him, Jesus,
knowing that the Father had given all things into his hands,
and that he came forth from God, and goeth unto God,
riseth from supper, and layeth aside his garments; and he
took a towel, and girded himself. Then he poureth water
into the basin, and began to wash the disciples’ feet, and to
wipe them with the towel wherewith he was girded. So he
cometh to Simon Peter.
He saith unto him, Lord, dost
thou wash my feet? Jesus answered and said unto him,
What I do thou knowest not now; but thou shalt under-
stand hereafter.
Peter saith unto him, Thou shalt never
wash my feet. Jesus answered him, If I wash thee not, thou
hast no part with me.
Simon Peter saith unto him, Lord,
not my feet only, but also my hands and my head. Jesus
saith to him, He that is bathed needeth not save to wash
his feet, but is clean every whit: and ye are clean, but notTHE
LIFE
OF JESUS
all. For he knew him that should
said he, Ye are not all clean.
So when he had washed
475
betray him; therefore
their feet, and taken his gar-
ments, and sat down again, he said unto them, Know ye
what I have done to you? Ye call me, Teacher, and, Lord:
and ye say well; for sol am. If I then, the Lord and the
Teacher, have washed your feet, ye also ought to wash one
another’s feet. For I have given you an example, that ye
also should do as I have done to you. Verily, verily, I say
unto you, A servant is not greater than his Lord; neither
one that is sent greater than he that sent him. If ye know
these things, blessed are ye if ye do them. I speak not of
you all: I know whom I have chosen: but that the scripture
may be fulfilled, He that eateth my bread lifted up his heel
against me. From henceforth I tell you before it come to
pass, that when it is come to pass, ye may believe that I
am he.
When Jesus had thus said, he was troubled in the spirit,
and testified, and said, Verily, verily, I say unto you, that
‘The disciples looked one on
one of you shall betray me.
another, doubting of whom he spake. There was at the
table reclining in Jesus’ bosom one of his disciples whom
Jesus loved. Simon Peter therefore beckoneth to him, and
saith unto him, Tell us who it is of whom he speaketh. He
leaning back, as he was, on Jesus’ breast saith unto him,
Lord, who is it? Jesus therefore answereth, He it is, for
whom I shall dip the sop, and give it him. So when he had
dipped the sop, he taketh and giveth it to Judas, the son
of Simon Iscariot. And after the sop, then entered Satan
into him. Jesus therefore saith unto him, What thou doest,
do quickly. Now no man at the table knew for what intent
he spake this unto him. For some thought, because Judas
had the bag, that Jesus said unto him, Buy what things we
have need of for the feast; or, that he should give something
He then having received the sop went out
to the poor.
straightway: and it was night.
When therefore he was gone out, Jesus saith, Now is the
Son of man glorified, and God is glorified in him; and God
shall glorify him in himself, and straightway shall he glorify
Ye
him, Little children, yet a little while I am with you.
I go,
shall seek me: and as I said unto the Jews, Whither476
THE
NEW:
TESTAMENT
ye cannot come; so now I say unto you. A new command-
ment I give unto you, that ye love one another; even as I
have loved you, that ye also love one another. By this shall
all ‘men know that ye are my disciples, if ye have love one
to another.
Simon Peter saith unto him, Lord, whither goest thou?
Jesus answered, Whither I go, thou canst not follow me
now; but thou shalt follow afterwards.
Peter saith unto
him, Lord, why cannot I follow thee even now? I will lay
down my life for thee. Jesus answereth, Wilt thou lay
down thy life for me? Verily, verily, I say unto thee, The
cock shalt not crow, till thou hast denied me thrice.
And as they were eating, Jesus took bread, and blessed,
and brake it; and he gave to the disciples, and said, Take,
eat; this is my body. And he took a cup, and gave thanks,
and gave to them, saying, Drink ye all of it; for this is my
blood of the covenant, which is poured out for many unto
remission of sins. But I say unto you, I shall not drink
henceforth of this fruit of the vine, until that day when I
drink it new with you in my Father’s kingdom.
Let not your heart be troubled: believe in God, believe
also in me. In my Father’s house are many mansions; if it
were not so, I would have told you; for I go to prepare a
place for you. And if I go and prepare a place for you,
I come again, and will receive you unto myself; that where
I am, there ye may be also. And whither I go, ye know
the way.
‘Thomas saith unto him, Lord, we know not
whither thou goest; how know we the way?
Jesus saith
unto him, I am the way, and the truth, and the life: no
one cometh unto the Father, but by me. If ye had known
me, ye would have known my Father also: from hence-
forth ye know him, and have seen him. Philip saith unto
him, Lord, show us the Father, and it sufficeth\ us. Jesus
saith unto him, Have I been so long time with you, and
dost thou not know me, Philip? he that hath seen me hath
seen the Father; how sayest thou, Show us the Father?
Believest thou not that I am in the Father, and the Father
in me? the words that I say unto you I speak not from
myself: but the Father abiding in me doeth his works. Be-
lieve me that I am in the Father, and the Father in me:
or else believe me for the very works’ sake. Verily, verily,THE
LIFE
OF
JESUS
477
I say unto you, He that believeth on me, the works that I
do shall he do also; and greater works than these shall he
do; because I go unto the Father. And whatsoever ye shall
ask in my name, that will I do, that the Father may be
glorified in the Son. If ye shall ask anything in my name,
that will I do. If ye love me, ye will keep my command-
ments. And I will pray the Father, and he shall give you
another Comforter, that he may be with you for ever, even
the Spirit of truth: whom the world cannot receive; for it
beholdeth him not, neither knoweth him: ye know him;
for he abideth with you, and shall be in you. I will not
leave you desolate: I come unto you.
Yet a little while,
and the world beholdeth me no more; but ye behold me:
because I live, ye shall live also. In that day ye shall know
that I am in my Father, and ye in me, and I in you. He
that hath my commandments, and keepeth them, he it is that
loveth me: and he that loveth me shall be loved of my
Father, and I will love him, and will manifest myself unto
him. Judas (not Iscariot) saith unto him, Lord, what is
come to pass that thou wilt manifest thyself unto us, and
Jesus answered and said unto him,
not unto the world?
If a man love me, he will keep my word: and my Father
will love him, and we will come unto him, and make our
He that loveth me not keepeth not my
abode with him.
words: and the word which ye hear is not mine, but the
Father’s who sent me.
These things have I spoken unto you, while yet abiding
with you. But the Comforter, even the Holy Spirit, whom
the Father will send in my name, he shall teach you all
things, and bring to your remembrance all that I said unto
you. Peace I leave with you; my peace I give unto you:
Let not your
not as the world giveth, give I unto you.
heart be troubled, neither let it be fearful. Ye heard how
I said to you, I go away, and I come unto you. If ye loved
me, ye would have rejoiced, because I go unto the Father:
for the Father is greater than I. And now I have told you
before it come to pass, that, when it is come to pass, ye may
I will no more speak much with you, for the
believe.
prince of the world cometh: and he hath nothing in me; but
that the world may know that I love the Father, and as478
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
the Father gave me commandment, even so I do. Arise, let
us go hence.
1 am the true vine, and my Father is the husbandman.
Every branch in me that beareth not fruit, he taketh it away:
and every branch that beareth fruit, he cleanseth it, that
it may bear more fruit. Already ye are clean because of
Abide in me,
the word which I have spoken unto you.
and I in you. As the branch cannot bear fruit of itself,
except it abide in the vine; so neither can ye, except ye abide
in me. I am the vine, ye are the branches: He that abideth
in me, and I in him, the same beareth much fruit: for apart
from me ye can do nothing. If a man abide not in me, he
is cast forth as a branch, and is withered; and they gather
them, and cast them into the fire, and they are burned. If
ye abide in me, and my words abide in you, ask whatsoever
ye will, and it shall be done unto you. Herein is my Father
glorified, that ye bear much fruit; and so shall ye be my
disciples. Even as the Father hath loved me, I also have
loved you: abide ye in my love. If ye keep my command-
ments, ye shall abide in my love; even as I have kept my
These
Father’s commandments, and abide in his love.
you,
in
be
may
joy
my
that
you,
unto
spoken
I
have
things
and that your joy may be made full. ‘This is my command-
ment, that ye love one another, even as I have loved you.
Greater love hath no man than this, that a man lay down
his life for his friends. Ye are my friends, if ye do the
No longer do I call you
things which I command you.
servants; for the servant knoweth not what his lord doeth:
but I have called you friends; for all things that I heard
from my Father I have made known
unto you.
Ye did
not choose me, but I chose you, and appointed you, that ye
should go and bear fruit, and that your fruit should abide:
that whatsoever ye shall ask of the Father in my name, he
may give it you. These things I command you, that.ye may
love one another. If the world hateth you, ye know that it
hath hated me before it hated you. If ye were of the world,
the world would love its own: but because ye are not of the
world, but I chose you out of the world, therefore the world
hateth you. Remember the word that I said unto you, A
servant is not greater than his lord. If they persecuted me,
they will also persecute you; if they kept my word, theyTHE LIFE OF JESUS
479
will keep yours also. But all these things will they do unto
that
you for my name’s sake, because they know not him
If I had not come and spoken unto them, they
sent me.
sin.
had not had sin: but now they have no excuse for their
not
had
I
If
also.
Father
my
He that hateth me hateth
they had
did,
other
none
which
works
the
them
among
done
hated both
not had sin: but now have they both seen and
the word
that
pass,
to
cometh
this
But
Father.
my
me and
hated me
They
law,
their
in
may be fulfilled that is written
whom
come,
is
ter
Comfor
the
when
But
cause.
a
‘without
of
Spirit
the
even
Father,
the
I will send unto you from
wit-
bear
shall
he
Father,
the
from
eth
proceed
truth, which
ye have been
ness of me: and ye also bear witness, because
ng.
beginni
the
with me from
should not
These things have I spoken unto you, that ye
the syna-
of
out
you
put
shall
They
e.
be caused to stumbl
h you
killet
ever
whoso
gogues: yea, the hour cometh, that
these
And
God.
unto
e
servic
th
offere
he
shall think that
,
Father
the
known
not
things will they do, because they have
when
that
you,
unto
n
spoke
I
have
things
nor me. But these
how that I told
their hour is come, ye may remember them,
from the begin-
you
unto
not
said
I
you. And these things
I go unto him
now
But
ning, because I was with you.
Whither goest
me,
asketh
you
of
that sent me; and none
unto you,
things
thou? But because I have spoken these
you the
tell
I
ss
thele
Never
heart.
sorrow hath filled your
if I go
for
away;
go
I
truth: It is expedient for you that
if I
but
you;
unto
come
not
will
not away, the Comforter
come,
is
he
when
he,
And
go, I will send him unto you.
of sin, and of righteous-
will convict the world in respect
e they believe not on
becaus
sin,
of
ent:
judgm
of
ness, and
the Father, and ye
to
go
I
e
me; of righteousness, becaus
because the prince. of this
behold me no more; of judgment,
yet many things to say
have
I
world hath been judged.
Howbeit when
now.
unto you, but ye cannot bear them
you into all
guides
shall
he
he, the Spirit of truth, is come,
but what
f;
from himsel
the truth: for he shall not speak
he shall
and
speak:
he
shall
things soever he shall hear, these
He shall
come.
to
are
that
things
the
declare unto you
mine, and shall declare it
glorify me: for he shall take of
unto you.
are mine:
All things whatsoever the Father hath480
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
therefore said I, that he taketh of mine, and shall declare it
unto you. A little while, and ye behold me no more; and
again a little while, and ye shall see me. Some of his dis-
ciples therefore said one to another, What is this that he
saith unto us, A little while, and ye behold me not; and
again a little while, and ye shall see me: and, Because I go
to the Father? ‘They said therefore, What is this that he
saith, A little while? We know not what he saith. Jesus
perceived that they were desirous to ask him, and he said
unto them, Do ye inquire among yourselves concerning this,
that I said, A little while, and ye behold me not, and again
Verily, verily, I say
a little while, and ye shall see me?
but the world
lament,
and
weep
shall
ye
that
you,
unto
shall rejoice: ye shall be sorrowful, but your sorrow shall
be turned into joy. A woman when she is in travail hath
sorrow, because her hour is come: but when she is delivered
of the child, she remembereth no more the anguish, for the
joy that a man is born into the world. And ye therefore
now have sorrow: but I will see you again, and your heart
shall rejoice, and your joy no one taketh away from you.
And in that day ye shall ask me no question. Verily, verily,
I say unto you, If ye shall ask anything of the Father, he
will give it you in my name. Hitherto have ye asked noth-
ing in my name: ask, and ye shall receive, that your joy may
be made full.
These things have I spoken unto you in dark sayings: the
hour cometh, when I shall no more speak unto you in dark
sayings, but shall tell you plainly of the Father. In that day
ye shall ask in my name: and I say not unto you, that I will
pray the Father for you; for the Father himself loveth you,
because ye have loved me, and have believed that I came
forth from the Father. I came out from the Father, and am
come into the world: again, I leave the world, and go unto
the Father. His disciples say, Lo, now speakest thou plainly,
and speakest no dark saying.
Now know we that thou
knowest all things, and needest not that any man should ask
thee: by this we believe that thou camest forth from God.
Jesus answered them, Do ye now believe? Behold, the hour
cometh, yea, is come, that ye shall be scattered, every man
to his own, and shall leave me alone: and yet I am not
alone, because the Father is with me. ‘These things have ITHE
LIFE
OF
JESUS
481
In the
spoken unto you, that in me ye may have peace.
world ye have tribulation: but be of good cheer; I have
overcome the world.
These things spake Jesus; and lifting up his eyes to heaven,
he said, Father, the hour is come; glorify thy Son, that the
Son may glorify thee: even as thou gavest him authority over
all flesh, that to all whom thou hast given him, he should
give eternal life. And this is life eternal, that they should
know thee the only true God, and him whom thou didst
send, even Jesus Christ. I glorified thee on the earth, hav-
ing accomplished the work which thou hast given me to do.
And now, Father, glorify thou me with thine own self with
I
the glory which I had with thee before the world was.
manifested thy name unto the men whom thou gavest me out
of the world: thine they were, and thou gavest them to me;
Now they know that all
and they have kept thy word.
things whatsoever thou hast given me are from thee: for
the words which thou gavest me I have given unto them;
and they received them, and knew of a truth that I came
forth from thee, and they believed that thou didst send me.
I pray for them: I pray not for the world, but. for those
whom thou hast given me; for they are thine: and all things
that
are
mine
are
thine,
and
thine
are
mine:
and
I am
glorified in them. And I am no more in the world, and
these are in the world, and I come to thee. Holy Father,
keep them in thy name which thou hast given me, that they
may be one, even as we are. While I was with them, I kept
them in thy name which thou hast given me: and I guarded
them, and not one of them perished, but the son of perdi-
come
tion; that the scripture might be fulfilled. But now I
they
that
world,
the
in
to thee; and these things I speak
given
have
I
themselves.
in
full
made
joy
my
may have
they
them thy word; and the world hated them, because
I
world.
the
of
not
am
I
as
even
world,
the
are not of
but
pray not that thou shouldest take them from the world,
are
They
one.
evil
the
from
them
keep
that thou shouldest
Sanctify
not of the world, even as I am not of the world.
send
didst
thou
As
truth.
is
word
thy
them in the truth:
And
world.
the
into
me into the world, even so I sent them
also
themselves
they
that
myself,
sanctify
for their sakes I
may be sanctified in truth.
Neither
for these only do I482
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
through their
pray, but for them also that believe on me
Father, art
thou,
as
even
one;
word; that they may all be
that the
us:
in
be
may
also
they
that
thee,
in
I
and
in me,
glory
the
And
me.
send
didst
world may believe that thou
that
them;
unto
given
have
I
me
given
hast
thou
which
in
thou
and
them,
in
I
one;
they may be one, even as we are
may
world
the
that
one;
into
ted
perfec
be
may
they
me, that
even as
know that thou didst send me, and lovedst them,
whom
also
they
that
desire
I
,
Father
me.
t
thou loveds
may
thou hast given me be with me where I am, that they
t
loveds
thou
for
me:
given
hast
thou
which
glory,
behold my
,
me before the foundation of the world. O righteous Father
the world knew thee not, but I knew thee; and these knew
that thou didst send me; and I made known unto them thy
name, and will make it known; that the love wherewith
thou lovedst me may be in them, and I in them.
THE
BETRAYAL
When Jesus had spoken these words, he went forth with
his disciples over the brook Kidron, where was a garden,
‘nto which he entered, himself and his disciples. Now Judas
also, who betrayed him, knew the place: for Jesus oft-times
resorted thither with his disciples.
Then saith Jesus unto them, All ye shall be offended in
me this night: for it is written, I will smite the shepherd,
But
and the sheep of the flock shall be scattered abroad.
after I am raised up, I will go before you into Galilee. But
Peter answered and said unto him, If all shall be offended
Jesus said unto him,
in thee, I will never be offended.
before the cock crow,
night,
this
that
thee,
Verily I say unto
thou shalt deny me thrice. Peter saith unto him, Even if I
must die with thee, yet will I: not deny thee. Likewise also
said all the disciples.
Then cometh Jesus with them unto a place called Geth-
semane, and saith unto his disciples, Sit ye here, while I go
yonder and pray. And he took with him Peter and the two
sons of Zebedee, and began to be sorrowful and sore troubled.
Then saith he unto them, My soul is exceeding sorrowful,
And
even unto death: abide ye here, and watch with me.
he went forward a little, and fell on his face, and prayed,THE
LIFE
OF
JESUS
483
saying, My Father, if it be possible, let this cup pass away
from me: nevertheless, not as I will, but as thou wilt. And
he cometh unto the disciples, and findeth them sleeping, and
saith unto Peter, What, could ye not watch with me one
hour? Watch and pray, that ye enter not into temptation:
the spirit indeed is willing, but the flesh is weak. Again a
second time he went away, and prayed, saying, My Father, if
- this cannot pass away, except I drink it, thy will be done.
And he came again and found them sleeping, for their eyes
were heavy. And he left them again, and went away, and
Then
prayed a third time, saying again the same words.
on
Sleep
them,
unto
saith
and
disciples,
the
to
he
cometh
now, and take your rest: behold, the hour is at hand, and the
Arise,
Son of man is betrayed into the hands of sinners.
let us be going: behold, he is at hand that betrayeth me.
And while he yet spake, lo, Judas, one of the twelve,
came, and with him a great multitude with swords and
staves, from the chief priests and elders of the people. Now
he that betrayed him gave them a sign, saying, Whomso-
ever I shall kiss, that is he: take him. And straightway he
came to Jesus, and said, Hail, Rabbi; and kissed him. And
art come.
Jesus said unto him, Friend, do that for which thou
him.
Then they came and laid hands on Jesus, and took
out .
stretched
Jesus
with
were
that
them
And behold, one of
of the
his hand, and drew his sword, and smote the servant
unto
high priest, and struck off his ear. Then saith Jesus
all they
him, Put up again thy sword into its place: for
Or think-
that take the sword shall perish with the sword.
he shall even
and
Father,
my
beseech
cannot
I
that
thou
est
How
angels?
now send me more than twelve legions of
it must be?
thus
that
fulfilled,
be
scriptures
the
should
then
ye come out
In that hour said Jesus to the multitudes, Are
seize me? I
to
staves
and
swords
with
robber
a
as against
took me not. But
sat daily in the temple teaching, and ye
of the prophets
scriptures
the
that
pass,
to
come
all this is
him, and fled.
left
disciples
the
might be fulfilled. Then all
JESUS
BEFORE
HIS
JUDGES
and the officers of the
So the band and the chief captain,
led him to Annas
and
him,
d
boun
and
Jews, seized Jesus484
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
high
first; for he was father-in-law to Caiaphas, who was
counsel
gave
that
he
was
s
Caiapha
Now
priest that year.
to the Jews, that it was expedient that one man should die
for the people. Annas therefore sent him bound unto Caia-
phas the high priest.
And Peter had followed him afar off, even within, into the
court of the high priests; and he was sitting with the officers,
°
and warming himself in the light of the fire. Now the chief
priests and the whole council sought witness against Jesus
For many bare
to put him to death; and found it not.
false witness against him, and their witness agreed not to-
gether. And there stood up certain, and bare false witness
against him, saying, We heard him say, I will destroy this
temple that is made with hands, and in three days I will
build another made without hands. And not even so did
their witness agree together. And the high priest stood up —
in the midst, and asked Jesus saying, Answerest thou noth-
ing? what is it which these witness against thee? But he
held his peace, and answered nothing. Again the high priest
asked him, and saith unto him, Art thou the Christ, the Son
of the Blessed? And Jesus said, I am: and ye shall see the
Son of man sitting at the right hand of Power, and coming
And the high priest rent his
with the clouds of heaven.
~ clothes, and saith, What further need have we of witnesses?
Ye have heard the blasphemy: what think ye? And they
all condemned him to be worthy of death. And some began
to spit on him, and to cover his face, and to buffet him,
and to say unto him,’ Prophesy: and the officers received
him with blows of their hands.
Now Peter was sitting without in the court: and a maid
came unto him, saying, Thou also wast with Jesus the Gali-
lean. But he denied before them all, saying, I know not
what thou sayest. And when he was gone out into the porch,
another maid saw him, and saith unto them that were there,
This man also was with Jesus of Nazareth. And again he
denied with an oath, I know not the man.
And after a little
while they that stood by came and said to Peter, Of a truth
thou also art one of them; for thy speech maketh thee known.
Then began he to curse and to swear, I know not the man.
And straightway the cock crew. And Peter remembered theTHE
LIFE
OF
JESUS
485
, word which Jesus had said, Before the cock crow, thou shalt
deny me thrice. And he went out, and wept bitterly.
They lead Jesus therefore from Caiaphas into the Pra-
_torium: and it was early; and they themselves entered not
into the Pretorium, that they might not be defiled, but
might eat the passover.
Pilate therefore went out unto
them, and saith, What accusation bring ye against this man?
They answered and said unto him, If this man were not
an evil-doer, we should not have delivered him up unto
thee. Pilate therefore said unto them, Take him yourselves,
and judge him according to your law. The Jews said unto
him, It is not lawful for us to put any man to death: that
the word of Jesus might be fulfilled, which he spake, signi-
fying by what manner of death he should die.
Then Judas, who betrayed him, when he saw that he
was condemned, repented himself, and brought back the
thirty pieces of silver to the chief priests and elders, saying,
I have sinned in that I have betrayed innocent blood. But
they said, What is that to us? see thou to it. And he cast
down the pieces of silver into the sanctuary and departed;
and he went away and hanged himself. And the chief priests
took the pieces of silver, and said, It is not lawful to put
them into the treasury, since it is the price of blood. And
they took counsel, and bought with them the potter’s field,
to bury strangers in. Wherefore the field was called, The
field of blood, unto this day. Then was fulfilled that which
‘was spoken through Jeremiah the prophet, saying, And they
took the thirty pieces of silver, the price of him that was
priced, whom certain of the children of Israel did price;
and they gave them for the potter’s field, as the Lord ap-
pointed me.
Pilate therefore entered again into the Pretorium, and
called Jesus, and said unto him, Art thou the King of the
Jews? Jesus answered, Sayest thou this of thyself, or did
others tell it thee concerning me? Pilate answered, Am I
a Jew? ‘Thine own nation and the chief priests delivered
thee unto me: what hast thou done? Jesus answered, My
kingdom is not of this world: if my kingdom were of this
world, then would my servants fight, that I should not be
delivered to the Jews: but now is my kingdom not from
hence.
Pilate therefore said unto him, Art thou a king486
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
I am a king. To
then? Jesus answered, Thou sayest that
am I come into
end
this end have I been born, and to this
truth. Every
the
unto
ss
witne
bear
d
the world, that I shoul
Pilate saith unto '
voice.
my
th
heare
truth
the
of
is
one that
him, What is truth?
again unto the
And when he had said this, he went out
But
in him.
crime
no
find
I
Jews, and saith unto them,
the people,
up
th
stirre
He
,
saying
,
urgent
more
the
they were
ning from Galilee
teaching throughout all Judza, and begin
it, he asked
heard
Pilate
when
But
place.
this
even unto
he knew
when
And
ean.
Galil
whether the man were a
him unto Herod,
that he was of Herod’s jurisdiction, he sent
days.
who himself also was at Jerusalem in these
ing glad: for
exceed
was
he
Jesus,
saw
Herod
Now when
e he had
becaus
him,
see
to
he was of a long time desirous
miracle
some
see
to
hoped
he
and
him;
ning
heard concer
but
words;
many
in
him
done by him. And he questioned
the
and
priests
chief
the
And
g.
nothin
him
he answered
with
Herod
And
him.
ng
scribes stood, vehemently accusi
and array-
his soldiers set him at nought, and mocked him,
And
Pilate.
to
back
him
ing him in gorgeous apparel sent
very
that
other
each
with
friends
became
Pilate
Herod and
lves.
themse
n
betwee
day: for before they were at enmity
unto
Now at the feast the governor was wont to release
they
And
would.
they
the multitude one prisoner, whom
there-
When
as.
Barabb
called
r,
prisone
notable
had then a
them,
fore they were gathered together, Pilate said unto
Jesus
or
as,
Barabb
you?
unto
release
I
that
ye
Whom will
had
who is called Christ? For he knew that for envy they
judg-
the
on
sitting
was
he
while
And
up.
delivered him
ment-seat, his wife sent unto him, saying, Have thou noth-
ing to do with that righteous man ; for I have suffered many
things this day in a dream because of him. Now the chief
priests and the elders persuaded the multitudes that they
should ask for Barabbas, and destroy Jesus. But the gov-
ernor answered and said unto them, Which of the two will
ye that I release unto you? And they said, Barabbas. Pilate
saith unto them, What then shall I do unto Jesus who is
And
called Christ? They all say, Let him be crucified.
cried
they
But
done?
he
hath
evil
what
he said, Why,
So when
out exceedingly, saying, Let him be crucified.‘THE’
LIFE
‘OF
JESUS
487
Pilate saw that he prevailed nothing, but rather that a
tumult was arising, he took water, and washed his. hands
before the multitude, saying, I am innocent of the blood
of this righteous man; see ye to it. And all the people an-
swered and said, His blood be on us, and on our children.
Then released he unto them Barabbas; but Jesus he scourged
and delivered to be crucified.
Then Pilate therefore took Jesus, and scourged him. And
the soldiers platted a crown of thorns, and put it on his
head, and arrayed him in a purple garment; and they came
unto him, and said, Hail, King of the Jews! and they
struck him with their hands.
And
Pilate went
out again,
and saith unto them, Behold, I bring him out to you, that
ye may know that I find no crime in him. Jesus therefore
came out, wearing the crown of thorns and the purple gar-
ment.
And Pilate saith unto them, Behold, the man!
When therefore the chief priests and the officers saw him,
they cried out, saying, Crucify him, crucify him!
Pilate
saith unto them, Take him yourselves, and crucify him: for
I find no crime in him. The Jews answered him, We have
a law, and by that law he ought to die, because he made
himself the Son of God. When Pilate therefore heard this
saying, he was the more afraid; and he entered into the
Prztorium again, and saith unto Jesus, Whence art thou?
But Jesus gave him no answer.
Pilate therefore saith unto
him, Speakest thou not unto me? knowest thou not that I
have power to release thee, and have power to crucify thee?
Jesus answered him, Thou wouldest have no power against
me, except it were given thee from above: therefore he that
delivered me unto thee hath greater sin. Upon this Pilate
sought to release him: but the Jews cried out, saying, If
thou release this man, thou art not Cesar’s friend: every
one that maketh himself a king speaketh against Cesar.
When Pilate therefore heard these words, he brought Jesus
out, and sat down on the judgment-seat at a place called
The Pavement, but in Hebrew, Gabbatha.
Now it was
the Preparation of the passover: it was about the sixth hour.
And he saith unto the Jews, Behold, your King!
They
therefore cried out, Away with him, away with him, crucify
him!
Pilate saith unto them, Shall I crucify your King?488
THE
NEW.
TESTAMENT
king but Ceasar.
The chief priests answered, We have no
to be crucified.
them
unto
Then therefore he delivered him
THE
CRUCIFIXION
off from him
And when they had mocked him, they took
they lead
And
ts.
garmen
his
him
on
put
the purple, and
him out to crucify him.
, com-
And they compel one passing by, Simon of Cyrene
and Rufus,
ing from the country, the father of Alexander
to go with them, that he might bear his cross.
the
They took Jesus therefore: and he went out unto
w
Hebre
in
called
is
which
skull,
a
of
place called The place
two
Golgotha: where they crucified him, and with him
And
others, on either side one, and Jesus in the midst.
And there
Pilate wrote a title also, and put it on the cross.
OF
KING
THE
,
RETH
NAZA
OF
was written, JESUS
Jews,
THE JEWS. This title therefore read many of the
city;
the
to
nigh
was
ed
crucifi
was
for the place where Jesus
Greek.
and it was written in Hebrew, and in Latin, and in
Write
The chief priests of the Jews therefore said to Pilate,
King
not, The King of the Jews; but, that he said, I am
have
I
n
writte
have
I
What
ed,
of the Jews. Pilate answer
written.
The soldiers therefore, when they had crucified Jesus,
a
took his garments and made four parts, to every soldier
seam,
without
was
coat
the
now
part; and also the coat:
woven from the top throughout. They said therefore one
it
to another, Let us not rend it, but cast lots for it, whose
shall be: that the scripture might be fulfilled which saith,
They parted my garments among them,
And upon my vesture did they cast lots.
These things therefore the soldiers did.
And they that
passed by railed on him, wagging their heads, and saying,
Thou that destroyest the temple, and buildest it in three
days, save thyself: if thou art the Son of God, come down
from the cross. In like manner also the chief priests mock-
ing him, with the scribes and elders, said, He saved others;
himself he cannot save. He is the King of Israel; let him
now come down from the cross, and we will believe on
him. He trusteth on God; let him deliver him now, if heTHE
LIFE
OF
JESUS
489
desireth him: for he said, I am the Son of God. But there
were standing by the cross of Jesus his mother, and_ his
mother’s sister, Mary the wife of Clopas, and Mary Mag-
dalene.
When Jesus therefore saw his mother, and the
disciple standing by whom he loved, he saith unto his mother,
Woman, behold, thy son! ‘Then saith he to the disciple,
Behold, thy mother! And from that hour the disciple took
her unto his own home.
And one of the malefactors that were hanged railed on
him, saying, Art not thou the Christ? save thyself and us.
But the other answered, and rebuking him said, Dost thou
not even fear God, seeing thou art in the same condemna-
tion? And we indeed justly; for we receive the due reward
of our deeds: but this man hath done nothing amiss. And
he said, Jesus, remember me when thou comest in thy king-
dom. And he said unto him, Verily I say unto thee, To-day
shalt thou be with me in Paradise.
And it was now about the sixth hour, and a darkness
came over the whole land until the ninth hour. And about
the ninth hour Jesus cried with a loud voice, saying, Eli, Eli,
lama sabachthani? that is, My God, my God, why hast thou
And some of them that stood there, when
forsaken me?
they heard it, said, This man calleth Elijah. And straight-
way one of them ran, and took a sponge, and filled it with
vinegar, and put it on a reed, and gave him to drink. And
the rest said, Let be; let us see whether Elijah cometh to
save him. And Jesus cried again with a loud voice, and
yielded up his spirit. And behold, the veil of the temple was
rent in two from the top to the bottom; and the earth did
quake; and the rocks were rent; and the tombs were opened ;
and many bodies of the saints that had fallen asleep were
raised ;and coming forth out of the tombs after his resurrec-
tion they entered into the holy city and appeared unto many.
Now the centurion, and they that were with him watching
Jesus, when they saw the earthquake, and the things that
were done, feared exceedingly, saying, Truly this was the
Son of God. And many women were there beholding from
afar, who had followed Jesus from Galilee, ministering unto
;
him.
The Jews therefore, because it was the Preparation, that
the bodies should not remain on the cross upon the sabbath490
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
of Pilate
(for the day of that sabbath was a high day), asked
might be
they
that
and
,
broken
be
might
legs
their
that
‘The soldiers therefore came, and brake the
taken away.
and of the other that was crucified with
first,
the
of
legs
was
him: but when they came to Jesus, and saw that he
of the
one
t
howbei
legs:
his
not
brake
they
y,
alread
dead
there
soldiers with a spear pierced his side, and straightway
hath
seen
hath
that
he
And
water.
and
blood
out
came
that
th
knowe
he
and
true:
is
borne witness, and his witness
things
these
For
.
believe
may
also
ye
that
true,
he saith
bone
came to pass, that the scripture might be fulfilled, A
ure
script
r
anothe
again
And
.
broken
be
not
shall
of him
d.
pierce
they
saith, They shall look on him whom
And after these things Joseph of Arimathza, being a dis-
ciple of Jesus, but secretly for fear of the Jews, asked of
Pilate that he might take away the body of Jesus: and Pilate
gave him leave. He came therefore, and took away his
body. And there came also Nicodemus, he who at the first
came to him by night, bringing a mixture of myrrh and aloes,
about a hundred pounds. So they took the body of Jesus,
and bound it in linen cloths with the spices, as the custom of
the Jews is to bury. Now in the place where he was cruci-
fied there was a garden; and in the garden a new tomb
wherein was never man yet laid. There then because of the
Jews’ Preparation (for the tomb was nigh at hand) they
laid Jesus.
THE
RESURRECTION
Now on the morrow, which is the day after the Prepara-
tion, the chief priests and the Pharisees were gathered to-
gether unto Pilate, saying, Sir, we remember that that de-
ceiver said while he was yet alive, After three days I will
rise again. Command therefore that the sepulchre be made
sure until the third day, lest haply his disciples come and
steal him away, and say unto the people, He is risen from
the dead: and the last error will be worse than the first.
Pilate said unto them, Ye have a guard: go, make it as sure
as ye can. So they went, and made the sepulchre sure, seal-
ing the stone, the guard being with them.
Now late on the sabbath day, as it began to dawn toward
the first day of the week, came Mary Magdalene and theTHE LIFE OF JESUS
other Mary to see the sepulchre.
491
And behold, there was a
great earthquake; for an angel of the Lord descended from
heaven, and came and rolled away the stone, and sat upon
it. His appearance was as lightning, and his raiment white
as snow: and for fear of him the watchers did quake, and
And the angel answered and said
became as dead men.
unto the women, Fear not ye; for I know that ye seek Jesus,
He is not here; for he is risen,
who hath been crucified.
even as he said. Come, see the place where the Lord lay.
And go quickly, and tell his disciples, He is risen from the
dead; and lo, he goeth before you into Galilee; there shall
ye see him: lo, I have told you. And they departed quickly
from the tomb with fear and great joy, and ran to bring his
disciples word.
Mary Magdalene runneth therefore, and cometh to Simon
Peter, and to the other disciple whom Jesus loved, and saith,
They have taken away the Lord out of the tomb, and we
know not where they have laid him. Peter therefore went
forth, and the other disciple, and they went toward the
tomb. And they ran both together: and the other disciple
outran Peter, and came first to the tomb; and stooping and
looking in, he seeth the linen cloths lying; yet entered he not
in. Simon Peter therefore also cometh, following him, and
entered into,the tomb; and he beholdeth the linen cloths
lying, and the napkin, that was upon his head, not lying with
the linen cloths, but rolled up in a place by itself. Then
entered in therefore the other disciple also, who came first
knew
to the tomb, and he saw, and believed. For as yet they
So
dead.
the
from
again
rise
must
he
that
scripture,
the
not
home.
own
their
unto
the disciples went away again
so,
But Mary was standing without at the tomb weeping:
she
and
tomb;
the
into
looked
as she wept, she stooped and
and
beholdeth two angels in white sitting, one at the head,
they
And
lain.
had
Jesus
of
one at the feet, where the body
saith unto
say unto her, Woman, why weepest thou? She
I know
and
Lord,
my
away
them, Because they have taken
she
said,
thus
had
she
When
him.
laid
have
they
not where
knew
and
g,
standin
Jesus
th
turned herself back, and beholde
Woman, why
not that it was Jesus. Jesus saith unto her,
ng him to
supposi
She,
weepest thou? whom seekest thou?
borne him
hast
thou
if
Sir,
him,
unto
saith
be the gardener,THE
492
NEW
TESTAMENT
hence, tell me where thou hast laid him, and I will take him
She turneth herself,
Jesus saith unto her, Mary.
away.
and saith unto him in Hebrew, Rabboni; which is to say,
Teacher. Jesus saith to her, Touch me not; for I am not
yet ascended unto the Father: but go unto my brethren, and
say to them, I ascend unto my Father and your Father, and
Mary Magdalene cometh and
my God and your God.
telleth the disciples, I have seen the Lord; and that he had
said these things unto her.
Now while they were going, behold, some of the guard
came into the city, and told unto the chief priests all the
things that were come to pass. And when they were as-
sembled with the elders, and had taken counsel, they gave
much money unto the soldiers, saying, Say ye, His disciples
came by night, and stole him away while we slept. And if
this come to the governor’s ears, we will persuade him, and
rid you of care. So they took the money, and did as they
were taught: and this saying was spread abroad among the
Jews, and continueth until this day.
THE
PERIOD
FROM
RESURRECTION
THE
ASCENSION
TO
THE
And behold, two of them were going that very day to a
village named Emmaus, which was threescore furlongs from
Jerusalem. And they communed with each other of all these
things which had happened. And it came to pass, while they
communed and questioned together, that Jesus himself drew
near, and went with them. But their eyes were holden that
they should not know him. And he said unto them, What
communications are these that ye have one with another, as
ye walk? And they stood still, looking sad. And one of
them, named Cleopas, answering said unto him, Dost thou
alone sojourn in Jerusalem and not know the things which
are come to pass there in these days? And he said unto them,
What things? And they said unto him, The things concern-
ing Jesus the Nazarene, who was a prophet mighty in deed
and word before God and all the people: and how the chief
priests and our rulers delivered him up to be condemned to
death, and crucified him. But we hoped that it was he who
should redeem Israel. Yea and besides all this, it is nowTHE. LIFE OF JESUS
the third day since these things came
certain women
to pass.
493
Moreover
of our company amazed us, having been early
at the tomb; and when they found not his body, they came,
saying, that they had also seen a vision of: angels, who said
that he was alive. And certain of them that were with us
went to the tomb, and found it even so as the women had
said: but him they saw not. And he said unto them, O
foolish men, and slow of heart to believe in all that the
prophets have spoken! Behooved it not the Christ to suffer
these things, and to enter into his glory?
And beginning
from Moses and from all the prophets, he interpreted to them
in all the scriptures the things concerning himself. And they
drew nigh unto the village, whither they were going: and
he made as though he would go further.
And they con-
strained him, saying, Abide with us; for it is toward evening,
and the day is now far spent. And he went in to abide with
them.
And it came to pass, when he had sat down with
them to meat, he took the bread and blessed; and breaking
it he gave to them. And their eyes were opened, and they
knew him; and he vanished out of their sight. And they said
one to another, Was not our heart burning within us, while
he spake to us in the way, while he opened to us the scrip-
tures? And they rose up that very hour, and returned to
Jerusalem, and found the eleven gathered together, and them
that were with them, saying, The Lord is risen indeed, and
hath appeared to Simon. And they rehearsed the things that
happened in the way, and how he was known of them in the
breaking of the bread.
When therefore -it was evening, on that day, the first day
of the week, and when the doors were shut where the dis-
ciples were, for fear of the Jews, Jesus came and stood in
And
the midst, and saith unto them, Peace be unto you.
and
hands
his
them
unto
showed
he
this,
said
when he had
his side. The disciples therefore were glad, when they saw
the Lord. Jesus therefore said to them again, Peace be unto
you: as the Father hath sent me, even so send I you. And
when he had said this, he breathed on them, and saith unto
them, Receive ye the Holy Spirit: whose soever sins ye for-
give, they are forgiven unto them; whose soever sins ye
retain, they are retained.
But Thomas, one of the twelve, called Didymus, was not494
THE
NEW
with them when Jesus came.
TESTAMENT
The other disciples therefore
But he said unto
said unto him, We have seen the Lord.
of the nails,
print
the
hands
his
in
see
shall
I
them, Except
and put my finger into the print of the nails, and put my
hand into his side, I will not believe.
And after eight days again his disciples were within, and
Jesus cometh, the doors being shut,
Thomas with them.
and stood in the midst, and said, Peace be unto you. Then
saith he to Thomas, Reach hither thy finger, and see my
hands; and reach hither thy hand, and put it into my side:
and be not faithless, but believing. Thomas answered and
said unto him, My Lord and my God. Jesus saith unto
him, Because thou hast seen me, thou hast believed: blessed
are they that have not seen, and yet have believed.
After these things Jesus manifested himself again to the
disciples at the sea of Tiberias; and he manifested him-
self on this wise. "There were together Simon Peter, and
Thomas called Didymus, and Nathanael of Cana in Galilee,
and the sons of Zebedee, and two other of his disciples.
Simon Peter saith unto them, I go a fishing. “They say unto
him, We also come with thee. They went forth, and en-
tered into the boat; and that night they took nothing. But
when day was now breaking, Jesus stood on the beach: yet
the disciples knew not that it was Jesus. Jesus therefore
saith unto them, Children, have ye aught to eat? “They an-
swered him, No. And he said unto them, Cast the net on
the right side of the boat, and ye shall find. They cast
therefore, and now they were not able to draw it for the
multitude
of fishes.
That
disciple therefore whom
loved saith unto Peter, It is the Lord.
Jesus
So when Simon Peter
heard that it was the Lord, he girt his coat about him (for
he was naked), and cast himself into the sea. But the other
disciples came in the little boat (for they were not far from
the land, but about two hundred cubits off), dragging the
net full of fishes. So when they got out upon the land, they
see a fire of coals there, and fish laid thereon, and bread.
Jesus saith unto them, Bring of the fish which ye have now
taken. Simon Peter therefore went up, and drew the net to
land, full of great fishes, a hundred and fifty and three: and
for all there were so many, the net was not rent. Jesus saith
unto them, Come and break your fast. And none of theTHE
LIFE
OF
JESUS
495
disciples durst inquire of him, Who art thou? knowing that
it was.the Lord. Jesus cometh, and taketh the bread, and
giveth them, and the fish likewise. ‘This is now the third
time that Jesus was manifested to the disciples, after that he
was risen from the dead.
So when they had broken their fast, Jesus saith to Simon
Peter, Simon, son of John, lovest thou me more than these?
He saith unto him, Yea, Lord; thou knowest that I love
thee. He saith unto him, Feed my lambs. He saith to him
again a second time, Simon, son of John, lovest thou me?
He saith unto him, Yea, Lord; thou knowest that I love
thee. He saith unto him, Tend my sheep. He saith unto
him the third time, Simon, son of John, lovest thou me?
Peter was grieved because he said unto him the third time,
Lovest thou me? And he said unto him, Lord, thou knowest
all things; thou knowest that I love thee. Jesus saith unto
him, Feed my sheep. Verily, verily, I say unto thee, When
thou wast young, thou girdest thyself, and walkedst whither
thou wouldest: but when thou shalt be old, thou shalt stretch
forth thy hands, and another shall gird thee, and carry thee
whither thou wouldest not. Now this he spake, signifying
by what manner of death he should glorify God. And when
Peter,
he had spoken this, he saith unto him, Follow me.
turning about, seeth the disciple whom Jesus loved follow-
ing; who also leaned back on his breast at the supper, and
said, Lord, who is he that betrayeth thee? Peter therefore
seeing him saith to Jesus, Lord, and what shall this man do?
Jesus saith unto him, If I will that he tarry till I come, what
is that to thee? follow thou me. This saying therefore went
forth among the brethren, that that disciple should not die:
yet Jesus said not unto him, that he should not die; but, If
I will that he tarry till I come, what is that to thee?
This is the disciple that beareth witness of these things,
and wrote these things: and we know that his witness is true.
But the eleven disciples went into Galilee, unto the moun-
saw
tain where Jesus had appointed them. And when they
And Jesus
him, they worshipped him; but some doubted.
ty hath
came to them and spoke unto them, saying, All authori
there-
ye
Go
earth.
on
and
heaven
in
me
unto
given
been
them
ng
baptizi
nations,
the
all
fore, and make disciples of
the Holy
into the name of the Father and of the Son and of496
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
Spirit: teaching them to observe all things whatsoever I
commanded you: and lo, I am with you always, even unto
:
the end of the world.
And he said unto them, These are my words which I
spake unto you, while I was yet with you, that all things
must needs be fulfilled, which are written in the law of
Moses, and the prophets, and the psalms, concerning me.
Then opened he their mind, that they might understand the
scriptures; and he said unto them, Thus it is written, that
the Christ should suffer, and rise again from the dead the
third day; and that repentance and remission of sins should
be preached in his name unto all the nations, beginning from
Jerusalem. Ye are witnesses of these things. And behold, I
send forth the promise of my Father upon you: but tarry ye
in the city, until ye be clothed with power from on high.
And he led them out until they were over against Bethany:
and he lifted up his hands, and blessed them. And it came to
pass, while he blessed them, he parted from them, and was
carried up into heaven. And they worshipped him, and re-
turned to Jerusalem with great joy: and were continually in
the temple, blessing God.
Many other signs therefore did Jesus in the presence of
the disciples, which are not written in this book: but these
are written, that ye may believe that Jesus is the Christ, the
Son of God; and that believing ye may have life in his name.
And there are also many other things which Jesus did, the
which if they should be written every one, I suppose that
even the world itself would not contain the books that should
be written.THE
RISE
AND
EARLY
GROWTH
CHURCH
OF
THEa
. yon
always,
m 5
even
ae
We ods, « ,
Ag
“ysTHE
RISE AND
THE
GROWTH
CHURCH
DESCENT
OF
THE
OF THE EARLY
HOLY
SPIRIT
And when the day of Pentecost was now come, they were
all together in one place. And suddenly there came from
heaven a sound as of the rushing of a mighty wind, and it
filled all the house where they were sitting. And there ap-
peared unto them tongues parting asunder, like as of fire;
and it sat upon each one of them. And they were all filled
with the Holy Spirit, and began to speak with other tongues,
as the spirit gave them utterance.
Now there were dwelling at Jerusalem Jews, devout men,
from every nation under heaven. And when this sound was
heard, the multitude came together, and were confounded,
because that every man heard them speaking in his own
language. And they were all amazed and marvelled, saying,
Behold, are not all these that speak Galilaans? And how
hear we, every man in our own language wherein we were
born? Parthians and Medes and Elamites, and the dwellers,
in Mesopotamia, in Judea and Cappadocia, in Pontus and
Asia, in Phrygia and Pamphylia, in Egypt and the parts of
Libya about Cyrene, and sojourners from Rome, both Jews
and proselytes, Cretans and Arabians, we hear them speaking
in our tongues the mighty works of God. And they were
all amazed, and were perplexed, saying one to another, What
meaneth this? But others mocking said, They are filled with
new wine.
But Peter, standing up with the eleven, lifted up his voice,
and spake forth unto them, saying, Ye men of Judza, and
and
all ye that dwell at Jerusalem, be this known unto you,
ye
as
,
drunken
not
are
these
For
give ear unto my words.
this
suppose; seeing it is but the third hour of the day; but
is that which hath been spoken through the prophet Joel:
And it shall be in the last days, saith God,
I will pour forth of my Spirit upon all flesh:
499500
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
And your sons and your daughters shall prophesy,
And your young men shall see visions,
And your old men shall dream dreams:
And it shall be, that whosoever shall call on the name of
the Lord shall be saved.
Ye men of Israel, hear these words: Jesus of Nazareth, a
man approved of God unto you by mighty works and won-
ders and signs which God did by him in the midst of you,
even as ye yourselves know; him, being delivered up by the
determinate counsel and foreknowledge of God, ye by the
hand of lawless men did crucify and slay: whom God raised
up, having loosed the pangs of death: because it was not
possible that he should be holden of it.
Now when they heard this, they were pricked in their
heart, and said unto Peter and the rest of the apostles,
Brethren, what shall we do? And Peter said unto them,
Repent ye, and be baptized every one of you in the name of
Jesus Christ unto the remission of your sins; and ye shall
receive the gift of the Holy Spirit. For to you is the prom-
ise, and to your children, and to all that are afar off, even as
many as the Lord our God shall call unto him. And with
many other words he testified, and exhorted them, saying,
Save yourselves from this crooked generation.
“They then
that received his word were baptized: and there were added
unto them in that day about three thousand souls. And they
continued stedfastly in the apostles’ teaching and fellowship,
in the breaking of bread and the prayers.
And fear came upon every soul: and many wonders and
signs were done through the apostles. And all that believed
were together, and had all things common; and they sold
their possessions and goods, and parted them to all, according
as any man had need. And day by day, continuing stedfastly
with one accord in the temple, and breaking bread at home,
they took their food with gladness and singleness: of heart,
praising God, and having favor with all the people. And
the Lord added to them day by day those that were saved.
THE
EARLY
CHURCH
IN
JERUSALEM
Now Peter and John were going up into the temple at the
hour of prayer, being the ninth hour. And a certain manTHE EARLY CHURCH
501
that was lame from his mother’s womb was carried, whom
they laid daily at the door of the temple which is called Beau-
tiful, to ask alms of them that entered into the temple; who
seeing Peter and John about to go into the temple, asked to
receive an alms. And Peter, fastening his eyes upon him,
with John, said, Look on us. And he gave heed unto them,
expecting to receive something from them. But Peter said,
Silver and gold have I none; but what I have, that give I
thee. In the name of Jesus Christ of Nazareth, walk. And
he took him by the right hand, and raised him up: and im-
mediately his feet and his ankle-bones received strength. And
leaping up, he stood, and began to walk; and he entered with
them into the temple, walking, and leaping, and praising
God. And all the people saw him walking and praising
God: and they took knowledge of him, that it was he that
sat for alms at the Beautiful Gate of the temple; and they
were filled with wonder and amazement at that which had
happened unto him.
And as he held Peter and John, all the people ran together
unto them in the porch that is called Solomon’s, greatly won-
dering. And when Peter saw it, he answered unto the peo-
ple, Ye men of Israel, why marvel ye at this man? or why
fasten ye your eyes on us, as though by our own power or
godliness we had made him to walk? The God of Abraham,
and of Isaac, and of Jacob, the God of our fathers, hath
glorified his Servant Jesus ;whom ye delivered up, and denied
before the face of Pilate, when he had determined to release
him.
“And as they spake unto the people, the priests and the
captain of the temple and the Sadducees came upon them,
being sore troubled because they taught the people, and pro-
claimed in Jesus the resurrection from the dead. And they
laid hands on them, and put them in ward unto the morrow:
for it was now eventide. But many of them that heard the
word believed; and the number of the men came to be about
five thousand.
And it came to pass on the morrow, that their rulers and
elders and scribes were gathered together in Jerusalem; and
Annas the high priest was there, and Caiaphas, and John,
the
and Alexander, and as many as were of the kindred of
they
midst,
the
in
them
set
had
high priest. And when they502
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
inquired, By what power, or in what name, have ye done
this? Then Peter, filled with the Holy Spirit, said unto
them, Ye rulers of the people, and elders, if we this day are
examined concerning a good deed done to an impotent man,
by what means this man is made whole; be it known unto
you all, and to all the people of Israel, that in the name of
Jesus Christ of Nazareth, whom ye crucified, whom God
raised from the dead, even in him doth this man stand here
before you whole. He is the stone which was set at nought
of you the builders, which was made the head of the corner.
And in none other is there salvation: for neither is there any
other name under heaven, that is given among men, wherein
we must be saved.
;
Now when they beheld the boldness of Peter and John,
and had perceived that they were unlearned and ignorant
men, they marvelled ; and they took knowledge of them, that
they had been with Jesus. And seeing the man that was
healed standing with them, they could say nothing against
it. But when they had commanded them to go aside out of
the council, they conferred among themselves, saying, What
shall we do to these men? for that indeed a notable miracle
hath been wrought through them, is manifest to all that
dwell in Jerusalem; and-we cannot deny it. But that it
spread no further among the people, let us threaten them,
that they speak henceforth to no man in this name.
And
they called them, and charged them not to speak at all nor
teach in the name of Jesus. But Peter and John answered
and said unto them, Whether it is right in the sight of God
to hearken unto you rather than unto God, judge ye: for we
cannot but speak the things which we saw and heard. And
they, when they had further threatened them, let them go,
finding nothing how they might punish them, because of the
people; for all men glorified God: for that which was done.
For the man was more than forty years old, on whom this
miracle of healing was wrought..
And the multitude of them that believed were of one heart
and soul: and not one of them said that aught of the things
which he possessed was his own; but they had all things com-
mon. And with great power gave the apostles their witness
of the resurrection of the Lord Jesus: and great grace was
upon them all. For neither was there among them any thatTHE
EARLY
CHURCH
503
lacked; for as many as were possessors of lands or houses sold
them, and brought the prices of the things that were sold,
and laid them at the apostles’ feet: and distribution was
made unto each, according as any one had need.
But a certain man named Ananias, with Sapphira his wife,
sold a possession, and kept back part of the price, his wife
also being privy to it, and brought a certain part, and laid it
at the apostles’ feet. But Peter said, Ananias, why hath
Satan filled thy heart to lie to the Holy Spirit, and to keep
back part of the price of the land? While it remained, did
it not remain thine own? and after it was sold, was it not in
thy power? How is it that thou hast conceived this thing in
thy heart? thou hast not lied unto men, but unto God. And
the
Ananias hearing these words fell down and gave up
ghost: and great fear came upon all that heard it. And the
young men arose and wrapped him round, and they carried
him out and buried him.
his
And it was about the space of three hours after, when
Peter an-
wife, not knowing what was done, came in. And
for so
land
the
sold
ye
r
whethe
swered unto her, Tell me
said unto
Peter
But
much.
so
for
Yea,
said,
she
And
much.
the Spirit
her, How is it that ye have agreed together to try
thy
buried
have
that
them
of
feet
the
behold,
Lord?
of the
thee out.
husband are at the door, and they shall carry
And
up the ghost:
she fell down immediately at his feet, and gave
and they
dead,
her
found
and
and the young men came in
great
And
d.
husban
her
by
her
buried
and
out
carried her
all that heard
fear came upon the whole church, and upon
these things.
signs and
And by the hands of the apostles were many
all with
were
they
and
:
people
the
among
ht
wonders wroug
no
durst
rest
the
of
But
one accord in Solomon’s porch.
magnified
people
the
it
howbe
them:
to
f
man join himsel
to the Lord, mul-
them; and believers were the more added
that they even
titudes both of men and women: insomuch them on beds
and laid
carried out the sick into the streets,
the least his shadow
at
by,
came
Peter
as
and couches, that,
came
there also
might overshadow some one of them. And
about Jeru-
round
cities
the
from
together the multitude
vexed with
were
that
salem, bringing sick folk, and them
one.
every
healed
were
they
unclean spirits: and504
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
But the high priest rose up, and all they that were with
him (which is the sect of the Sadducees), and they were
filled with jealousy, and laid hands on the apostles, and put
them in public ward. But an angel of the Lord by night
opened the prison doors, and brought them out, and said, Go
ye, and stand and speak in the temple to the people all the
words of this Life. And when they heard this, they entered
into the temple about daybreak, and taught. But the high
priest came, and they that were with him, and called the
council together, and all the senate of the children of Israel,
and sent to the prison-house to have them brought. But the
officers that came found them not in the prison; and they
returned, and told, saying, The prison-house we found shut
in all safety, and the keepers standing at the doors: but when
we had opened, we found no man within. Now when the
captain of the temple and the chief priests heard these words,
they were much perplexed concerning them whereunto this
would grow. And there came one and told them, Behold,
the men whom ye put in the prison are in the temple stand-
ing and teaching the people. Then went the captain with
the officers, and brought them, but without violence ; for they
feared the people, lest they should be stoned.
And when
they had brought them, they set them before the council.
And the high priest asked them, saying, We strictly charged
you not to teach in this name: and behold, ye have filled
Jerusalem with your teaching, and intend to bring this man’s
blood upon us. But Peter and the apostles answered and
said, We must obey God rather than men. The God of our
fathers raised up Jesus, whom
ye slew, hanging him on a
tree. Him did God exalt with his right hand to be a Prince
and a Saviour, to give repentance to Israel, and remission of
sins.
And we
are witnesses of these things; and so is the
Holy Spirit, whom God hath given to them that obey him.
But they, when they heard this, were cut to the heart, and
were minded to slay them. But there stood up one in the
council, a Pharisee, named Gamaliel, a doctor of the law,
had in honor of all the people, and commanded to put the
men forth a little while. And he said unto them, Ye men of
Israel, take heed to yourselves as touching these men, what
ye are about to do. For before these days rose up Theudas,
giving himself out to be somebody; to whom a number ofTHE
EARLY
CHURCH
505
men, about four hundred, joined themselves, who was slain;
and all, as many as obeyed him, were dispersed, and came to
nought. After this man rose up Judas of Galilee in the days
of the enrolment, and drew away some of the people after
him: he also perished; and all, as many as obeyed him, were
scattered abroad. And now I say unto you, Refrain from
these men, and let them alone: for if this counsel or this
work be of men, it will be overthrown: but if it is of God, ye
will not be able to overthrow them; lest haply ye be found
even to be fighting against God. And to him they agreed:
and when they had called the apostles unto them, they beat
them and charged them not to speak in the name of Jesus,
and let them go. “They therefore departed from the presence
of the council, rejoicing that they were counted worthy to
suffer dishonor for the Name. And every day, in the temple
and at home, they ceased not to teach and to preach Jesus as
the Christ.
Now in these days, when the number of the disciples was
multiplying, there arose a murmuring of the Grecian Jews
against the Hebrews, because their widows were neglected in
the daily ministration. And the twelve called the multitude
of the disciples unto
them, and said, It is not fit that we
should forsake the word of God, and serve tables. Look ye
out therefore, brethren, from among you seven men of good
report, full of the Spirit and of wisdom, whom we may
appoint over this business. But we will continue stedfastly
in prayer, and in the ministry of the word. And the saying
pleased the whole multitude: and they chose Stephen, a man
full of faith and of the Holy Spirit, and Philip, and Pro-
chorus, and Nicanor, and Timon, and Parmenas, and Nico-
laus a proselyte of Antioch; whom they set before the apos-
tles: and when they had prayed, they laid their hands upon
them.
And the word of God increased; and the number of the
disciples multiplied in Jerusalem exceedingly; and a great
company of the priests were obedient to the faith.
And Stephen, full of grace and power, wrought great
cer-
wonders and signs among the people. But there arose
with
ng
disputi
ue,
synagog
the
of
were
tain of them that
Stephen. And they were not able to withstand the wisdom
d men,
and the Spirit by which he spake. Then they suborne506
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
who said, We have heard him speak blasphemous words
against Moses, and against God. And they stirred up the
people, and the elders, and the scribes, and came upon him,
and seized him, and brought him into the council, and set up
false witnesses, who said, This man ceaseth not to speak
words against this holy place, and the law: for we have
heard him say, that this Jesus of Nazareth shall destroy this
place, and shall change the customs which Moses delivered
unto us. And all that sat in the council, fastening their
eyes on him, saw his face as it had been the face of an angel.
And the high priest said, Are these things so? And he
said, Which of the prophets did not your fathers persecute?
and they killed them that showed before of the coming of
the Righteous One; of whom ye have now become betrayers
and murderers; ye who received the law as it was ordained
by angels, and kept it not.
Now when they heard these things, they were cut to the
heart, and they gnashed on him with their teeth. But he,
being full of the Holy Spirit, looked up stedfastly into
heaven, and saw the glory of God, and Jesus standing on
the right hand of God, and said, Behold, I see the heavens
opened, and the Son of man standing on the right hand of
God. But they cried out with a loud voice, and stopped
their ears, and rushed upon him with one accord; and they
cast him out of the city, and stoned him: and the witnesses
laid down their garments at the feet of a young man named
Saul. And they stoned Stephen, calling upon the Lord, and
saying, Lord Jesus, receive my spirit. And he kneeled down,
and cried with a loud voice, Lord, lay not this sin to their
charge. And when he had said this he fell asleep.
Saul was consenting unto his death.
THE
+
FIRST
SCATTERING
OF
THE
And
CHURCH
And there arose on that day a great persecution against
the church which was in Jerusalem; and they were all scat-
tered abroad throughout the regions of Judea and Samaria,
except the apostles. And devout men buried Stephen, and
made great lamentation over him. But Saul laid waste the
church, entering into every house, and dragging men and
women committed them to prison.THE
EARLY
CHURCH
507
They therefore that were scattered abroad went about
preaching the word. And Philip went down to the city of
And the
Samaria, and proclaimed unto them the Christ.
multitudes gave heed with one accord unto the things that
were spoken by Philip, when they heard, and saw the signs
which he did. For from many of those that had unclean
spirits, they came out, crying with a loud voice: and many
that were palsied, and that were lame, were healed. And
there was much joy in that city.
But there was a certain man, Simon by name, who be-
foretime in the city used sorcery, and amazed the people of
Samaria, giving out that himself was some great one: to
whom they all gave heed, from the least to the greatest,
saying, This man is that power of God which is called Great.
And they gave heed to him, because that of long time he
But when they be-
had amazed them with his sorceries.
the kingdom
concerning
tidings
good
lieved Philip preaching
of God and the name of Jesus Christ, they were baptized,
And Simon also himself believed:
both men and women.
and being baptized, he continued with Philip; and beholding
signs and great miracles wrought, he was amazed.
Now when the apostles that were at Jerusalem heard that
Samaria had received the word of God, they sent unto them
Peter and John: who, when they were come down, prayed
for them, that they might receive the Holy Spirit: for as yet
it was fallen upon none of them: only they had been bap-
tized into the name of the Lord Jesus. Then laid they their
hands on them, and they received the Holy Spirit. Now
when Simon saw that through the laying on of the apostles’
hands the Holy Spirit was given, he offered them money,
saying, Give me also this power, that on whomsoever I lay
my hands, he may receive the Holy Spirit. But Peter said
hast
unto him, Thy silver perish with thee, because thou
hast
Thou
money.
with
God
of
gift
the
obtain
to
thought
neither part nor lot in this matter: for thy heart is not right
and
before God. Repent therefore of this thy wickedness,
be
shall
heart
thy
of
pray the Lord, if perhaps the thought
bitter-
of
gall
the
in
art
thou
that
see
I
For
forgiven thee.
and
ness and in the bond of iniquity. And Simon answered
things
the
of
none
that
Lord,
the
to
me
said, Pray ye for
which ye have spoken come upon me.THE
508
NEW
TESTAMENT
They therefore, when they had testified and spoken the
word of the Lord, returned to Jerusalem, and preached the
gospel to many villages of the Samaritans.
But an angel of the Lord spake unto Philip, saying, Arise,
and go toward the south unto the way that goeth down from
Jerusalem unto Gaza: the same is desert. And he arose and
went: and behold, a man of Ethiopia, a eunuch of great au-
thority under Candace, queen of the Ethiopians, who was
over all her treasure, who had come to Jerusalem to worship;
and he was returning and sitting in his chariot, and was read-
ing the prophet Isaiah. And the Spirit said unto Philip, Go
near, and join thyself to this chariot. And Philip ran to
him, and heard him reading Isaiah the prophet, and said,
Understandest thou what thou readest? And he said, How
And he besought
can I, except some one shall guide me?
Philip to come up and sit with him. Now the passage of the
scripture which he was reading was this,
He was led as a sheep to the slaughter ;
And as a lamb before his shearer is dumb,
So he openeth not his mouth:
In his humiliation his judgment was taken away:
His generation, who shall declare?
For his life is taken from the earth.
And the eunuch answered Philip, and said, I pray thee,
of whom speaketh the prophet this? of himself, or of some
other? And Philip opened his mouth, and beginning from
this scripture, preached unto him Jesus. And as they went
on the way, they came unto a certain water; and the eunuch
saith, Behold, here is water; what doth hinder me to be bap-
tized? And he commanded the chariot to stand still: and
they both went down into the water, both Philip and the
eunuch; and he baptized him. And when they came up out
of the water, the Spirit of the Lord caught away Philip;
and the eunuch saw him no more, for he went on his way
rejoicing.
But Philip was found at Azotus: and passing
through he preached the gospel to all the cities, till he came
' to Caesarea.
THE
CONVERSION
OF
SAUL
OF
TARSUS
But Saul, yet breathing threatening and slaughter against
the disciples of the Lord, went unto the high priest, andTHE
EARLY
CHURCH
509
asked of him letters to Damascus unto the synagogues, that
if he found any that were of the Way, whether men or
women, he might bring them bound to Jerusalem. And as
he journeyed, it came to pass that he drew nigh unto Damas-
cus: and suddenly there shone round about him a light out of
heaven: and he fell upon the earth, and heard a voice saying
unto him, Saul, Saul, why persecutest thou me? And he
said, Who art thou, Lord? And he said, | am Jesus whom
thou persecutest: but rise, and enter into the city, and it shall
be told thee what thou must do. And the men that jour-
neyed with him stood speechless, hearing the voice, but be-
holding no man. And Saul arose from the earth; and when
his eyes were opened, he saw nothing; and they led him by
And he was
the hand, and brought him into Damascus.
three days without sight, and did neither eat nor drink.
Now there was a certain disciple at Damascus, named
Ananias; and the Lord said unto him in a vision, Ananias.
And he said, Behold, I am here, Lord. And the Lord said
unto him, Arise, and go to the street which is called Straight,
and inquire in the house of Judas for one named Saul, a man
of Tarsus: for behold, he prayeth; and he hath seen a man
named Ananias coming in, and laying his hands on him, that
he might receive his sight. But Ananias answered, Lord,
I have heard from many of this man, how much evil he did
to thy saints at Jerusalem: and here he hath authority from
But
the chief priests to bind all that call upon thy name.
the Lord said unto him, Go thy way: for he is a chosen ves-
sel unto me, to bear my name before the Gentiles and kings,
and the children of Israel: for I will show him how many
things he must suffer for my name’s sake. And Ananias de-
parted, and entered into the house; and laying his hands on
him said, Brother Saul, the Lord, even Jesus, who appeared
unto thee in the way which thou camest, hath sent me, that
thou mayest receive thy sight, and be filled with the Holy
Spirit. And straightway there fell from his eyes as it were
bap-
scales, and he received his sight; and he arose and was
tized; and he took food and was strengthened.
And he was certain days with the disciples that were at
And straightway in the synagogues he pro-
Damascus.
claimed Jesus, that he is the Son of God. And all that heard
lem
him were amazed, and said, Is not this he that in Jerusa510
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
made havoc of them that called on his name? and he had
come hither for this intent, that he might bring them bound
before the chief priests. But Saul increased the more in
strength, and confounded the Jews that dwelt at Damascus,
proving that this is the Christ.
And when many days were fulfilled, the Jews took coun-
sel together to kill him: but their plot became known to
Saul. And they watched the gates also day and night that
they might kill him: but his disciples took him by night, and
let him down through the wall, lowering him in a basket.
And when he was come to Jerusalem, he assayed to join
himself to the disciples: and they were all afraid of him, not
believing that he was a disciple. But Barnabas took him,
and brought him to the apostles, and declared unto them how
he had seen the Lord in the way, and that he had spoken to
him, and how at Damascus he had preached boldly in the
name of Jesus. And he was with them going in and going
out at Jerusalem, preaching boldly in the name of the Lord:
and he spake and disputed against the Grecian Jews; but
And when the brethren
they were seeking to kill him.
knew it, they brought him down to Caesarea, and sent
forth to Tarsus.
So the church throughout all Judea and Galilee
Samaria had peace, being edified; and, walking in the
of the Lord and in the comfort of the Holy Spirit,
multiplied.
THE
MISSIONARY
ACTIVITIES
OF
him
and
fear
was
PETER
Now there was at Joppa a certain disciple named Tabitha,
which by interpretation is called Dorcas: this woman was
full of good works and almsdeeds which she did. And it
came to pass in those days, that she fell sick, and died: and
when they had washed her, they laid her in an upper cham-
ber. And as Lydda was nigh unto Joppa, the disciples,
hearing that Peter was there, sent two men unto him, en-
treating him, Delay not to come on unto us. And Peter arose
and went with them. And when he was come, they brought
him into the upper chamber: and all the widows stood by
him weeping, and showing the coats and garments which
Dorcas made, while she was with them.
But Peter putTHE
EARLY
CHURCH
511
them all forth, and kneeled down, and prayed; and turning
to the body, he said, Tabitha, arise. And she opened her
eyes 5 and when she saw Peter, she sat up. And he gave her
his hand, and raised her up; and calling the saints and wid-
ows, he presented her alive. And it became known through-
out all Joppa: and many believed on the Lord. And it came
to pass, that he abode many days in Joppa with one Simon a
tanner.
Now there was a certain man in Cesarea, Cornelius by
a de-
name, a centurion of the band called the Italian band,
who
house,
his
all
with
God
feared
that
one
and
yout man,
always.
God
to
prayed
and
gave much alms to the people,
hour of
He saw in a vision openly, as it were about the ninth
to
saying
and
him,
unto
in
the day, an angel of God coming
and
him,
upon
eyes
his
ng
fasteni
he,
And
him, Cornelius.
being affrighted, said, What is it, Lord?
And he said ‘unto
for a memorial
him, Thy prayers and thine alms are gone up
and fetch one
Joppa,
to
before God. And now send men
one Simon
with
lodgeth
he
Peter:
ed
Simon, who is surnam
And when the
a tanner, whose house is by the sea side.
called two of his
angel that spake unto him was departed, he
that waited
them
of
household-servants, and a devout soldier
unto
things
all
ed
rehears
having
and
on him continually;
them, he sent them to Joppa.
their journey, and
Now on the morrow, as they were on
the house-top
upon
up
drew nigh unto the city, Peter went
hungry, and
e
becam
he
and
hour:
to pray, about the sixth
fell into a
he
ready,
desired to eat: but while they made
a certain
and
d,
opene
n
heave
the
trance; and he beholdeth
by four
down
let
sheet,
vessel descending, as it were a great
four-
of
r
manne
all
were
in
where
corners upon the earth:
of
birds
and
earth
of the
footed beasts and creeping things
kill
Peter,
Rise,
him,
to
voice
a
came
the heaven. And there
Lord; for I have never
and eat. But Peter said, Not so,
unclean. And a voice
and
on
eaten anything that is comm
time, What God hath
came unto him again the second
this was done thrice:
And
n.
cleansed, make not thou commo
ed up into heaven.
and straightway the vessel was receiv
lexed in himself what
perp
much
Now while Peter was
mean, behold, the men
t
migh
seen
had
he
the vision which
inquiry for Simon’s
made
ng
that were sent by Cornelius, havi512
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
house, stood before the gate, and called and asked whether
Simon, who was surnamed Peter, were lodging there. And
while Peter thought on the vision, the Spirit said unto him,
Behold, three men seek thee. But arise, and get thee down,
and go with them, nothing doubting: for I have sent them.
And Peter went down to the men, and said, Behold, I am he
whom ye seek: what is the cause wherefore ye are come?
And they said, Cornelius a centurion, a righteous man and
one that feareth God, and well reported of by all the nation
of the Jews, was warned of God by a holy angel to send for
thee into his house, and to hear words from thee. So he
called them in and lodged them.
And on the morrow he arose and went forth with them,
and certain of the brethren from Joppa accompanied him.
And on the morrow they entered into Caesarea. And Cor-
nelius was waiting for them, having called together his kins-
men and his near friends. And when it came to pass that
Peter entered, Cornelius met him, and fell down at his feet,
and worshipped him.
But Peter raised him up, saying,
Stand up; I myself also am a man. And as he talked with
him, he went in, and findeth many come together: and he
said unto them, Ye yourselves know how it is an unlawful
thing for a man that is a Jew to join himself or come unto
one of another nation; and yet unto me hath God showed
that I should not call any man common or unclean: where-
fore also I came without gainsaying, when I was sent for.
I ask therefore with what intent ye sent for me. And Cor-
nelius said, Four days ago, until this hour, I was keeping the
ninth hour of prayer in my house; and behold, a man stood
before me in bright apparel, and saith, Cornelius, thy prayer
is heard, and thine alms are had in remembrance in the sight
of God. Send therefore to Joppa, and call unto thee Simon,
who is surnamed Peter; he lodgeth in the house of Simon a
tanner, by the sea side. Forthwith therefore I sent to thee;
and thou hast well done that thou art come.
Now there-
fore we are all here present in the sight of God, to hear all
things that have been commanded thee of the Lord. And
Peter opened his mouth, and said,
Of a truth I perceive that God is no respecter of persons:
but in every nation he that feareth him, and worketh right-
eousness, is acceptable to him. The word which he sentTHE
EARLY
CHURCH
513
unto the children of Israel, preaching good tidings of peace
by Jesus Christ (he’is Lord of all)—that saying ye your-
selves know, which was published throughout all Judza,
beginning from Galilee, after the baptism which John
preached; even Jesus of Nazareth, how God anointed him
with the Holy Spirit and with power: who went about doing
good, and healing all that were oppressed of the devil; for
God was with him. To him bear all the prophets witness,
that through his name every one that believeth on him shall
receive remission of sins.
While Peter yet spake these words, the Holy Spirit fell
on all them that heard the word. And they of the circum-
cision that believed were amazed, as many as came with
Peter, because that on the Gentiles also was poured out the
gift of the Holy Spirit. For they heard them speak with
tongues, and magnify God. Then answered Peter, Can any
man forbid the water, that these should not be baptized, who
have received the Holy Spirit as well as we? And he com-
manded them to be baptized in the name of Jesus Christ.
Then prayed they him to tarry certain days.
Now the apostles and the brethren that were in Judea
heard that the Gentiles also had received the word of God.
And when Peter was come up to Jerusalem, they that were
of the circumcision contended with him, saying, Thou went-
est in to men uncircumcised, and didst eat with them.
But
Peter began, and expounded the matter unto them in order.
And when they heard these things they held their peace, and
glorified God, saying, Then to the Gentiles also hath God
granted repentance unto life.
Now about that time Herod the king put forth his hands
to afflict certain of the church. And he killed James the
brother of John with the sword. And when he saw that
And
it pleased the Jews, he proceeded to seize Peter also.
had
he
when
And
bread.
ed
unleaven
of
days
those were the
four
taken him, he put him in prison, and delivered him to
the
quaternions of soldiers to guard him; intending after
Passover to bring him forth to the people. Peter therefore
of the
was kept in prison: but prayer was made earnestly
about to
church unto God for him. And when Herod was
between
bring him forth, the same night Peter was sleeping
the
two soldiers, bound with two chains: and guards before514
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
door kept the prison. And behold, an angel of the Lord
stood by him, and a light shined in the cell: and he smote
Peter on the side, and awoke him, saying, Rise up quickly.
And his chains fell off from his hands. And the angel said
unto him, Gird thyself, and bind on thy sandals. And he
did so. And he saith unto him, Cast thy garment about
thee, and follow me.
And he went out, and followed; and
he knew not that it was true which was done by the angel,
but thought he saw a vision. And when they were past the
first and the second guard, they came unto the iron gate that
leadeth into the city; which opened to them of its own
accord: and they went out, and passed on through one street;
and straightway the angel departed from him. And when
Peter was come to himself, he said, Now I know of a truth,
that the Lord hath sent forth his angel and delivered me
out of the hand of Herod, and from all the expectation of
the people of the Jews. And when he had considered the
thing, he came to the house of Mary the mother of John
whose surname was Mark; where many were gathered to-
And when he knocked at the
gether and were praying.
door of the gate, a maid came to answer, named Rhoda.
And when she knew Peter’s voice, she opened not the gate
for joy, but ran in, and told that Peter stood before the
But she
gate. And they said unto her, Thou art mad.
said,
they
And
so.
even
was
it
that
ly
affirmed
confident
It is his angel. But Peter continued knocking: and when
they had opened, they saw him, and were amazed. But he,
beckoning unto them with the hand to hold their peace,
declared unto them how the Lord had brought him forth
out of the prison. And he said, Tell these things unto
James, and to the brethren. And he departed, and went to
another place. Now as soon as it was day, there was no
small stir among the soldiers, what was become of Peter.
And when Herod had sought for him, and found him not, he
examined the guards, and commanded that they should be
put to death. And he went down from Judza to Czsarea,
and tarried there.THE
PAUL’S
EARLY
FIRST
CHURCH
MISSIONARY
615
JOURNEY
Now there were at Antioch, in the church that was
there, prophets and teachers, Barnabas, and Symeon that
was called Niger, and Lucius of Cyrene, and Manaen the
And as
foster-brother of Herod the tetrarch, and Saul.
they ministered to the Lord, and fasted, the Holy Spirit said,
Separate me Barnabas and Saul for the work whereunto I
have called them. ‘Then, when they had fasted and prayed
and laid their hands on them, they sent them away.
So they, being sent forth by the Holy Spirit, went down
to Seleucia; and from thence they sailed to Cyprus. And
when they were at Salamis, they proclaimed the word of
God in the synagogues of the Jews: and they had also John
as their attendant. And when they had gone through the
whole island unto Paphos, they found a certain sorcerer, a
false prophet, a Jew, whose name was Bar-Jesus; who was
with the proconsul, Sergius Paulus, a man of understanding.
The same called unto him Barnabas and Saul, and sought to
hear the word of God. But Elymas the sorcerer (for so is
turn
his name by interpretation) withstood them, seeking to
also
is
who
Saul,
But
aside the proconsul from the faith.
eyes
his
fastened
Spirit,
Holy
the
with
filled
called Paul,
thou
on him, and said, O full of all guile and all villany,
thou
wilt
ess,
righteousn
all
of
enemy
thou
devil,
son of the
And
Lord?
the
of
not cease to pervert the right ways
thou
and
thee,
upon
is
Lord
the
of
hand
the
now, behold,
And im-
shalt be blind, not seeing the sun for a season.
and he
darkness;
a
and
mist
a
him
on
fell
mediately there
the
Then
hand.
the
went about seeking some to lead him by
as-
being
believed,
done,
was
what
saw
he
proconsul, when
Lord.
tonished at the teaching of the
, and
Now Paul and his company set sail from Paphos
ed from them
came to Perga in Pamphylia: and John depart
through from
passing
they,
But
lem.
Jerusa
and returned to
the
went into
Perga, came to Antioch of Pisidia; and they
And after the
down.
sat
and
day,
h
synagogue on the sabbat
of the syna-
rulers
reading of the law and the prophets the
any word
have
ye
if
en,
Brethr
sading,
gogue sent unto them,
up,
of exhortation for the people, say on.
and beckoning with the hand said,
And Paul stood516
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
Men of Israel, and ye that fear God, hearken. We bring
you good tidings of the promise made unto the fathers, that
God hath fulfilled the same unto our children, in that he
raised up Jesus; as also it is written in the second psalm,
Thou art my Son, this day have I begotten thee. Be it
known unto you therefore, brethren, that through this man
is proclaimed unto you remission of sins: and by him every
one that believeth is justified from all things, from which ye
could not be justified by the law of Moses.
And as they went out, they besought that these words
might be spoken to them the next sabbath. Now when the
synagogue broke up, many of the Jews and of the devout
proselytes followed Paul and Barnabas; who, speaking to
them, urged them to continue in the grace of God.
And the next sabbath almost the whole city was gathered
together to hear the word of God. But when the Jews saw
the multitudes, they were filled with jealousy, and con-
tradicted the things which were spoken by Paul, and blas-
phemed. And Paul and Barnabas spake out boldly, and said,
It was necessary that the word of God should first be spoken
to you. Seeing ye thrust it from you, and judge yourselves
unworthy of eternal life, lo, we turn to the Gentiles.
For
so hath the Lord commanded us, saying,
I have set thee for a light of the Gentiles,
That thou shouldest be for salvation unto the uttermost
part of the earth.
And as the Gentiles heard this, they were glad, and glori-
fied the word of God: and as many as were ordained to
eternal life believed. And the word of the Lord was spread
abroad throughout all the region. But the Jews urged on the
devout women of honorable estate, and the chief men of the
city, and stirred up a persecution against Paul and Barnabas,
and cast them out of their borders. But they shook off the
dust of their feet against them, and came unto Iconium.
are the disciples were filled with joy and with the Holy
pirit.
And it came to pass in Iconium that they entered to-
gether into the synagogue of the Jews, and so spake that a
great multitude both of Jews and of Greeks believed. But
the Jews that were disobedient stirred up the souls of the
Gentiles, and made them evil affected against the brethren.c
THE
EARLY
CHURCH
517
Long time therefore they tarried there speaking boldly in the
Lord, who bare witness unto the word of his grace, granting
signs and wonders to be done by their hands. But the mul-
titude of the city was divided; and part held with the Jews,
and part with the apostles. And when there was made an
onset both of the Gentiles and of the Jews with their rulers,
to treat them shamefully and to stone them, they became
aware of it, and fied unto the cities of Lycaonia, Lystra and
Derbe, and the region round about: and there they preached
the gospel.
And at Lystra there sat a certain man, impotent in his
feet, a cripple from his mother’s womb, who never had
walked. The same heard Paul speaking: who, fastening his
eyes upon him, and seeing that he had faith to be made
whole, said with a loud voice, Stand upright on thy feet.
And he leaped up and walked. And when the multitude
saw what Paul had done, they lifted up their voice, saying
in the speech of Lycaonia, The gods are come down to us
in the likeness of men. And they called Barnabas, Jupiter;
and Paul, Mercury, because he was the chief speaker. And
the priest of Jupiter whose temple was before the city,
brought oxen and garlands unto the gates, and would have
done sacrifice with the multitudes. But when the apostles,
Barnabas and Paul, heard of it, they rent their garments,
and sprang forth among the multitude, crying out and say-
ing, Sirs, why do ye these things? We also are men of like
passions with you, and bring you good tidings, that ye should
turn from these vain things unto a living God, who made the
heaven and the earth and the sea, and all that in them 1s:
who in the generations gone by suffered all the nations to
walk in their own ways. And yet he left not himself with-
out witness, in that he did good and gave you from heaven
rains and fruitful seasons, filling your hearts with food and
gladness. And with these sayings scarce restrained they the
multitudes from doing sacrifice unto them.
But there came Jews thither from Antioch and Iconium:
and having persuaded the multitudes, they stoned Paul, and
dragged him out of the city, supposing that he was dead.
But as the disciples stood round about him, he rose up, and
entered into the city: and on the morrow he went forth
with Barnabas to Derbe. And when they had preached the518
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
®
re-
gospel to that city, and had made many disciples, they
confirm-
turned to Lystra, and to Iconium, and to Antioch,
e in
ing the souls of the disciples, exhorting them to continu
enter
must
we
tions
tribula
many
h
throug
that
and
faith,
the
for
into the kingdom of God. And when they had appointed
,
fasting
with
prayed
had
and
church,
every
in
elders
them
had
they
whom
on
Lord,
the
to
they commended them
And they passed through Pisidia, and came to
believed.
Pamphylia. And when they had spoken the word in Perga,
An-
they went down to Attalia; and thence they sailed to
grace
the
to
ted
commit
been
tioch, from whence they had
of God for the work which they had fulfilled. And when
they were come, and had gathered the church together, they
rehearsed all things that God had done with them, and
that he had opened a door of faith unto the Gentiles. And
they tarried no little time with the disciples.
THE
COUNCIL
AT
JERUSALEM
And certain men came down from Judza and taught the
brethren, saying, Except ye be circumcised after the custom
of Moses, ye cannot be saved. And when Paul and Barna-
bas had no small dissension and questioning with them, the
brethren appointed that Paul and Barnabas, and certain other
of them, should go up to Jerusalem unto the apostles and
elders about this question. They therefore, being brought
on their way by the church, passéd through both Pheenicia
and Samaria, declaring the conversion of the Gentiles: and
they caused great joy unto all the brethren. And when they
were come to Jerusalem, they were received of the church
and the apostles and the elders, and they rehearsed all things
that God had done with them. But there rose up certain
of the sect of the Pharisees who believed, saying, It is need-
ful to circumcise them, and to charge them to keep the law
of Moses.
And the apostles and the elders were gathered together
to consider of this matter. And when there had been much
questioning, Peter rose up, and said unto them,
Brethren, ye know that a good while ago God made
choice among you, that by my mouth the Gentiles should
hear the word of the gospel, and believe. And God, whoTHE
EARLY
CHURCH
519
knoweth the heart, bare them witness, giving them the Holy
Spirit, even as he did unto us; and he made no distinction
between us and them, cleansing their hearts by faith. Now
therefore why make ye trial of God, that ye should put a
yoke upon the neck of the disciples which neither our fathers
nor we were able to bear? But we believe that we shall be
“ee through the grace of the Lord Jesus, in like manner as
ey.
And all the multitude kept silence; and they hearkened
unto Barnabas and Paul rehearsing what signs and won-
ders God had wrought among the Gentiles through them.
And after they had held their peace, James answered, say-
ing,
Brethren, hearken unto me: Symeon hath rehearsed how
first God visited the Gentiles, to take out of them a people
for his name. And to this agree the words of the prophets;
as it is written,
After these things I will return,
And I will build again the tabernacle of David, which is
fallen;
And I will build again the ruins thereof,
And I will set it up:
That the residue of men may seek after the Lord,
And all the Gentiles, upon whom my name is called,
Saith the Lord, who maketh these things known from
of old.
Wherefore my judgment is, that we trouble not them that
from among the Gentiles turn to God; but that we write
unto them, that they abstain from the pollutions of idols,
and from fornication, and from what is strangled, and from
blood.
For Moses from generations of old hath in every
city them that preach him, being read in the synagogues
every sabbath.
Then it seemed good to the apostles and the elders, with
the whole church, to choose men out of their company, and
send them to Antioch with Paul and Barnabas; namely,
Judas called Barsabbas, and Silas, chief men among the
brethren: and they wrote thus by them, The apostles and
the elders, brethren, unto the brethren who are of the Gen-
tiles in Antioch and Syria and Cilicia, greeting: Forasmuch
as we have heard that certain who went out from us have520
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
to whom
troubled you with words, subverting your souls;
having
us,
to
good
seemed
it
t;
ndmen
we gave no comma
send them unto
come to one accord, to choose out men and
that have
you with our beloved Barnabas and Paul, men
Jesus Christ.
hazarded their lives for the name of our Lord
lves also
We have sent therefore Judas and Silas, who themse For it
mouth.
of
word
by
things
same
the
you
tell
shall
upon you
seemed good to the Holy Spirit, and to us, to lay
ye abstain
that
:
things
ary
necess
these
than
burden
r
greate
no
and from
from things sacrificed to idols, and from blood,
if ye
which
from
ation;
fornic
from
and
led,
strang
things
well.
ye
Fare
you.
with
well
be
keep yourselves, it shall
Antioch ;:
So they, when they were dismissed, came down to
delivered
they
r,
togethe
ude
and having gathered the multit
d for
rejoice
they
it,
read
had
they
when
And
the epistle.
also
lves
themse
being
Silas,
and
the consolation. And Judas
con-
and
words,
many
with
en
brethr
the
ed
exhort
prophets,
there,
firmed them. And after they had spent some time
those
unto
en
brethr
the
from
peace
in
ed
dismiss
they were
tarried
as
Barnab
and
Paul
that had sent them forth. But
Lord,
in Antioch, teaching and preaching the word of the
with many others also.
PAUL’S
SECOND
MISSIONARY
JOURNEY
And after some days Paul said unto Barnabas, Let us
we
return now and visit the brethren in every city wherein
fare.
they
how
see
and
proclaimed the word of the Lord,
And Barnabas was minded to take with them John also, who
was called Mark. But Paul thought not good to take with
and
them him who withdrew from them from Pamphylia,
went not with them to the work. And there arose a sharp
contention, so that they parted asunder one from the other,
and Barnabas took Mark with him, and sailed away unto
Cyprus: but Paul chose Silas, and went forth, being com-
mended by the brethren to the grace of the Lord. And he
went through Syria and Cilicia, confirming the churches. -
And he came also to Derbe and to Lystra: and behold, a
certain disciple was there, named Timothy, the son of a
Jewess that believed ;but his father was a Greek. The same
was well reported of by the brethren that were at LystraTHE
EARLY
CHURCH
521
and Iconium. Him would Paul have to go forth with him;
and he took and circumcised him because of the Jews that
were in those parts: for they all knew that his father was a
Greek. And as they went on their way through the cities,
they delivered them the decrees to keep which had been or-
dained of the apostles and elders that were at Jerusalem.
So the churches were strengthened in the faith, and increased
in number daily.
And they went through the region of Phrygia and Ga-
latia, having been forbidden of the Holy Spirit to speak
the word in Asia; and when they were come over against
Mysia, they assayed to go into Bithynia; and the Spirit of
Jesus suffered them not; and passing by Mysia, they came
down to Troas. And a vision appeared to Paul in the night:
There was a man of Macedonia standing, beseeching him,
and saying, Come over into Macedonia, and help us. And
when he had seen the vision, straightway we sought to go
forth into Macedonia, concluding that God had called us
to preach the gospel unto them.
Setting sail therefore from Troas, we made a straight
course to Samothrace, and the day following to Neapolis;
and from thence to Philippi, which is a city of Macedonia,
the first of the district, a Roman colony: and we were in
this city tarrying certain days. And on the sabbath day we
went forth without the gate by a river side, where we sup-
posed there was a place of prayer; and we sat down, and
spake unto the women that were come together. And a
certain woman named Lydia, a seller of purple, of the city
of Thyatira, one that worshipped God, heard us: whose
heart the Lord opened to give heed unto the things which
were spoken by Paul. And when she was baptized, and
her household, she besought us, saying, If ye have judged
me to be faithful to the Lord, come into my house, and abide
there. And she constrained us.
And it came to pass, as we were going to the place of
prayer, that a certain maid having a spirit of divination met
us, who brought her masters much gain by soothsaying. The
same following after Paul and us cried out, saying, These
men are servants of the Most High God, who proclaim unto
you the way of salvation. And this she did for many days.
But Paul, being sore troubled, turned and said to the spirit,52d,
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
t to come out of:
I charge thee in the name of Jesus Chris
hour.
very
that
out
her. And it came
gain was
But when her masters saw that the hope of their ed them
dragg
and
Silas,
and
Paul
on
gone, they laid hold
when they had
into the marketplace before the rulers, and
These men,
said,
they
rates,
magist
the
brought them unto
set forth
being Jews, do exceedingly trouble our city, and
to ob-
or
e,
receiv
to
us
for
l
lawfu
not
customs which it is
together
serve, being Romans. And the multitude rose up
nts off
against them: and the magistrates rent their garme
And when
them, and commanded to beat them with rods.
into
they had laid many stripes upon them, they cast them
hav-
prison, charging the jailor to keep them safely: who,
prison,
ing received such a charge, cast them into the inner
ght
and made their feet fast in the stocks. But about midni
God,
unto
hymns
g
singin
and
ng
prayi
Paul and Silas were
and the prisoners were listening to them; and suddenly there
-
was a great earthquake, so that the foundations of the prison
house were shaken: and immediately all the doors were
opened; and every one’s bands were loosed. And the jailor,
being roused out of sleep and seeing the prison doors open,
drew his sword and was about to kill himself, supposing
that the prisoners had escaped. But Paul cried with a loud
voice, saying, Do thyself no harm: for we are all here.
And he called for lights and sprang in, and, trembling for
fear, fell down before Paul and Silas, and brought them out
and said, Sirs, what must I do to be saved? And they said,
Believe on the Lord Jesus, and thou shalt be saved, thou
and thy house. And they spake the word of the Lord unto
him, with all that were in his house. And he took them
the same hour of the night, and washed their stripes; and
And he brought
was baptized, he and all his, immediately.
them up into his house, and set food before them, and re-
joiced greatly, with all his house, having believed in God.
But when it was day, the magistrates sent the serjeants,
saying, Let those men go. And the jailor reported the words
to Paul, saying, The magistrates have sent to let you go:
now therefore come forth, and go in peace.
But Paul said
unto them, They have beaten us publicly, uncondemned,
men that are Romans, and have cast us into prison; and
do they now cast us out privily? nay verily; but let themTHE
EARLY
CHURCH
323
come themselves and bring us out. And the serjeants
re-
ported these werds unto the magistrates: and they feared
when they heard that they were Romans ; and they came
and
besought them; and when they had brought them out,
they
asked them to go away from the city. And they went out of
the prison, and entered into the house of Lydia: and when
they had seen the brethren, they comforted them, and
de-
parted.
Now when they had passed through Amphipolis and
Apollonia, they came to Thessalonica, where was a synagogue
of the Jews: and Paul, as his custom was, went in unto them,
and for three sabbath days reasoned with them from the
scriptures, opening and alleging that it behooved the Christ
to suffer, and to rise again from the dead; and that this
Jesus, whom, said he, I proclaim unto you, is the Christ.
And some of them were persuaded, and consorted with
Paul and Silas; and of the devout Greeks a great multitude,
and of the chief women not a few. But the Jews, being
moved with jealousy, took unto them certain vile fellows of
the rabble, and gathering a crowd, set the city on an uproar ;
and assaulting the house of Jason, they sought to bring them
forth to the people. And when they found them not, they
dragged Jason and certain brethren before the rulers of the
city, crying, These that have turned the world upside down
are come hither also; whom
Jason hath received: and these
all act contrary to the decrees of Casar, saying that there
is another king, one Jesus. And they troubled the multitude
and the rulers of the city, when they heard these things.
And when they had taken security from Jason and the rest,
they let them go.
And the brethren immediately sent away Paul and Silas
by night unto Bercea: who when they were come thither
went into the synagogue of the Jews. Now these were more
noble than those in Thessalonica, in that they received the
word with all readiness of mind, examining the scriptures
daily, whether these things were so. Many of them there-
fore believed; also of the Greek women of honorable estate,
and of men, not a few. But when the Jews of Thessalonica
had knowledge that the word of God was proclaimed of Paul
at Bercea also, they came thither likewise, stirring up and
troubling the multitudes. And then immediately the breth-224
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
and
ren sent forth Paul to go as far as to the sea: and Silas
Paul
ted
conduc
that
they
But
Timothy abode there still.
d-
brought him as far as Athens: and receiving a comman
him
to
come
should
they
that
ment unto Silas and Timothy
for
with all speed, they departed. Now when Paul waited
he
as
him
within
ed
them at Athens, his spirit was provok
syna-
the
in
d
reasone
he
So
idols.
of
full
city
beheld the
gogue with the Jews and the devout persons, and in the
marketplace every day with them that met him. And cer-
tain also of the Epicurean and Stoic philosophers encount-
ered him. And some said, What would this babbler say?
others, He seemeth to be a setter forth of strange gods:
because he preached Jesus and the resurrection. And they
took hold of him, and brought him unto the Areopagus,
saying, May we know’ what this new teaching is, which is
spoken by thee? For thou bringest certain strange things
to our ears: we would know therefore what these things
(Now all the Athenians and the strangers sojourn-
mean.
ing there spent their time in nothing else, but either to tell
or to hear some new thing.) And Paul stood in the midst
of the Areopagus, and said,
Ye men of Athens, in all things I perceive that ye are
For as I passed along, and observed the
very religious.
objects of your worship, I found also an altar with this in-
What therefore
scription, TO AN UNKNOWN GOD.
ye worship in ignorance, this I set forth unto you. The
God that made the world and all things therein, he, being
Lord of heaven and earth, dwelleth not in temples made
with hands; neither is he served by men’s hands, as though
he needed anything, seeing he himself giveth to all life, and
breath, and all things; and he made of one every nation of
men to dwell on all the face of the earth, having determined
their appointed seasons, and the bounds of their habitationx
that they should seek God, if haply they might feel after him
and find him, though he is not far from each one of us: for
in him we live, and move, and have our being; as certain
even of your own poets have said. .
For we are also his offspring.
Being then the offspring of God, we ought not to think
that the Godhead is like unto gold, or silver, or stone,
graven by art and device of man. The times of ignoranceTHE
EARLY
CHURCH
525
therefore God overlooked; but now he commandeth men
that they should all everywhere repent: inasmuch as he
hath appointed a day in which he will judge the world in
righteousness by the man whom he hath ordained; whereof
he hath given assurance unto all men, in that he hath raised
him from the dead.
Now when they heard of the resurrection of the dead,
some mocked; but others said, We will hear thee concerning
this yet again. Thus Paul went out from among them. But
certain men clave unto him, and believed: among whom
also was Dionysius the Areopagite, and a woman named
Damaris, and others with them.
After these things he departed from Athens, and came to
Corinth.
And he found a certain Jew named Aquila, a
man of Pontus by race, lately come from Italy, with his
wife Priscilla, because Claudius had commanded all the
Jews to depart from Rome: and he came unto them; and
because he was of the same trade, he abode with them, and
they wrought; for by their trade they were tentmakers.
And he reasoned in the synagogue every sabbath, and per-
suaded Jews and Greeks.
But when Silas and Timothy came down from Mace-
donia, Paul was constrained by the word, testifying to the
Jews that Jesus was the Christ. And when they opposed
themselves and blasphemed, he shook out his raiment and
said unto them, Your blood be upon your own heads; I
am clean: from henceforth I will go unto the Gentiles. And
he departed thence, and went into the house of a certain man
named Titus Justus, one that worshipped God, whose house
joined hard to the synagogue. And Crispus, the ruler of the
synagogue believed in the Lord with all his house; and many
of the Corinthians hearing believed, and were baptized. And
the Lord said unto Paul in the night by a vision, Be not
afraid, but speak and hold not thy peace: for I am with
thee, and no man shall set on thee to harm thee: for I have
much people in this city. And he dwelt there a year and
six months, teaching the word of God among them.
But when Gallio was proconsul of Achaia, the Jews with
one accord rose up against Paul and brought him before the
judgment-seat, saying, This man persuadeth men to wor-
ship God contrary to the law. But when Paul was about526
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
to open his mouth, Gallio said unto the Jews, If indeed
it were a matter of wrong or of wicked villany, O ye Jews,
reason would that I should bear with you: but if they are
questions about words and names and your own law, look
to it yourselves; I am
not minded
to be a judge of these
matters. And he drove them from the judgment-seat. And
they all laid hold on Sosthenes, the ruler of the synagogue,
and beat him before the judgment-seat. And Gallio cared
for none of these things.
And Paul, having tarried after this yet many days, took
his leave of the brethren, and sailed thence. And when he
had landed at Czsarea, he went up and saluted the church,
and went down to Antioch.
PAUL’S
THIRD
MISSIONARY
JOURNEY
And having spent some time there, he departed, and went
through the region of Galatia, and Phrygia in order, estab-
:
lishing all the disciples.
Now a certain Jew named Apollos, an Alexandrian by
race, an eloquent man, came to Ephesus; and he was mighty
in the scriptures. "This man had been instructed in the way
of the Lord; and being fervent in spirit, he spake and taught
accurately the things concerning Jesus, knowing only the
baptism of John: and he began to speak boldly in the
synagogue. But when Priscilla and Aquila heard him, they
took him unto them, and expounded unto him the way of
God more accurately. And when he was minded to pass
over into Achaia, the brethren encouraged him, and wrote
to the disciples to receive him: and when he was come, he
helped them much that had believed through grace; for he
powerfully confuted the Jews, and that publicly, showing
by the scriptures that Jesus was the Christ.
And it came to pass, that, while Apollos was at Corinth,
Paul having passed’ through the upper country came to
Ephesus, and found certain disciples: and he said unto them,
Did ye receive the Holy Spirit when ye believed? And they
said unto him, Nay, we did not so much as hear whether the
Holy Spirit was given. And he said, Into what then were
ye baptized? And they said, Into John’s baptism. And
Paul said, John baptized with the baptism of repentance,THE
EARLY
CHURCH
527
saying unto the people that they should believe on him that
should come after him, that is, on Jesus. And when they
heard this, they were baptized into the name of the Lord
Jesus. And when Paul had laid his hands upon them, the
Holy Spirit came on them; and they spake with tongues,
and prophesied. And they were in all about twelve men.
And he entered into the synagogue, and spake boldly for
the space of three months, reasoning and persuading as to
the things concerning the kingdom of God. But when some
were hardened and disobedient, speaking evil of the Way
before the multitude, he departed from them, and separated
‘the disciples, reasoning daily in the school of Tyrannus. And
this continued for the space of two years; so that all they
that dwelt in Asia heard the word of the Lord, both Jews
And God wrought special miracles by the
and Greeks.
hands of Paul: insomuch that unto the sick were carried
away from his body handkerchiefs or aprons, and the dis-
eases departed from them, and the evil spirits went out.
But certain also of the strolling Jews, exorcists, took upon
them to name over them that had the evil spirits the name of
the Lord Jesus, saying, I adjure you by Jesus whom Paul
preacheth. And there were seven sons of one Sceva, a Jew,
a chief priest, who did this. And the evil spirit answered
and said unto them, Jesus I know, and-Paul I know; but
who are ye? And the man in whom the evil spirit was
leaped ori them, and mastered both of them, and prevailed
against them, so that they fled out of that house naked
And this became known to all, both Jews
and wounded.
and Greeks, that dwelt at Ephesus; and fear fell upon them
all, and the name of the Lord Jesus was magnified. Many
also of them that had believed came, confessing, and de-
claring their deeds. And not a few of them that practised
magical arts brought their books together and burned them
in the sight of all; and they counted the price of them, and
found it fifty thousand pieces of silver.
So mightily grew
the word of the Lord and prevailed.
Now after these things were ended, Paul purposed in the
spirit, when he had passed through Macedonia and Achaia,
to go to Jerusalem, saying, After I have been there, I must
also see Rome. And having sent into Macedonia two ofTHE
528
them
that ministered
NEW
TESTAMENT
unto him, Timothy
and Erastus, he
himself stayed in Asia for a while.
And about that time there arose no small stir concerning
For a certain man named Demetrius, a silver-
the Way.
smith, who made silver shrines of Diana, brought no little
business unto the craftsmen; whom he gathered together,
with the workmen of like occupation, and said, Sirs, ye
know that by this business we have our wealth. And ye see
and hear, that not alone at Ephesus, but almost throughout
all Asia, this Paul hath persuaded and turned away much
people, saying that they are no gods, that are made with
hands: and not only is there danger that this our trade
come into disrepute; but also that the temple of the great
goddess Diana be made of no account, and that she should
even be deposed from her magnificence whom all Asia and
the world worshippeth.
And when they heard this they
were filled with wrath, and cried out, saying, Great is Diana
of the Ephesians. And the city was filled with the confusion:
and they rushed with one accord into the theatre, having
seized Gaius and Aristarchus, men of Macedonia, Paul’s
companions in travel. And when Paul was minded to enter
in unto the people, the disciples suffered him not.
And
certain also of the Asiarchs, being his friends, sent unto him
and besought him not to adventure himself into the theatre.
Some therefore cried one thing, and some another: for the
assembly was in confusion; and the more part knew not
wherefore they were come together.
And they brought
Alexander out of the multitude, the Jews putting him for-
ward. And Alexander beckoned with the hand, and would
have made a defence unto the people. But when they per-
ceived that he was a Jew, all with one voice about the space
of two hours cried out, Great is Diana of the Ephesians.
And when the town-clerk had quieted the multitude, he
saith, Ye men
of Ephesus, what man
is there who knoweth
not that the city of the Ephesians is temple-keeper of the
great Diana, and of the image which fell down from Jupi-
ter? Seeing then that these things cannot be gainsaid, ye
ought to be quiet, and to do nothing rash. For ye have
brought hither these men, who are neither robbers of tem-
ples nor blasphemers of our goddess.
If therefore Deme-
trius, and the craftsmen that are with him, have a matterTHE
EARLY
CHURCH
3!
against any man, the courts are open, and there are pro-
consuls: let them accuse one another.
But if ye seek any-
thing about other matters, it shall be settled in the regular
assembly. For indeed we are in danger to be accused con-
cerning this day’s riot, there being no cause for it: and as
touching it we shall not be able to give account of this con-
course. And when he had thus spoken, ‘he dismissed the
assembly.
And after the uproar ceased, Paul having sent for the
disciples and exhorted them, took leave of them, and de-
parted to go into Macedonia.
And when he had gone
through those parts, and had given them much exhortation,
he came into Greece. And when he had spent three months
there, and a plot was laid against him by the Jews as he was
about to set sail for Syria, he determined to return through
Macedonia.
For Paul had determined to sail past Ephesus,
that he might not have to spend time in Asia; for he was
hastening, if it were possible for him, to be at Jerusalem the
day of Pentecost.
And from Miletus he sent to Ephesus, and called to him
the elders of the church. And when they were come to him,
he said unto them,
Ye yourselves know, from the first day that I set foot in
Asia, after what manner I was with you ail the time, serv-
ing the Lord with all lowliness of mind, and with tears,
and with trials which befell me by the plots of the Jews;
how I shrank not from declaring unto you anything that
was profitable, and teaching you publicly, and from house
to house, testifying both to Jews and to Greeks repentance
toward God, and faith toward our Lord Jesus Christ. And
now, behold, I go bound in the spirit unto Jerusalem, not
knowing the things that shall befall me there: save that the
Holy Spirit testifieth unto me in every city, saying that
bonds and afflictions abide me. But I hold not my life of
any account as dear unto myself, so that I may accomplish
my course, and the ministry which I received from the Lord
Jesus, to testify the gospel of the grace of God. And now,
behold, I know that ye all, among whom I went about
preaching the kingdom, shall see my face no more. Where-
fore I testify unto you this day, that I am pure from the
blood of all men.
For J shrank not from declaring unto you530
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
lves, and
the whole counsel of God. Take heed unto yourse
you
made
hath
Spirit
Holy
the
which
to all the flock, in
he purchased
bishops, to feed the church of the Lord which
ing griev-
with his own blood. I know that after my depart
g the flock;
sparin
not
you,
among
in
enter
shall
wolves
ous
speaking
and from among your own selves shall men arise,
after them.
es
discipl
the
away
draw
to
things,
se
perver
of three
Wherefore watch ye, remembering that by the space
day with
and
night
one
every
sh
admoni
to
not
ceased
I
years
tears.
And now I commend you to God, and to the word
give you
of his grace, which is able to build you up, and to
I cov-
ied.
sanctif
are
that
the inheritance among all them
lves
yourse
Ye
l.
appare
or
gold,
or
silver,
man’s
no
eted
and
ties,
necessi
my
unto
ered
know that these hands minist
an
you
gave
I
things
all
In
me.
with
were
that
to them
to
and
weak,
the
help
to
ought
example, that so laboring ye
f said,
himsel
he
that
Jesus,
Lord
the
of
words
the
ber
remem
It is more blessedto give than to receive.
And when he had thus spoken, he kneeled down and
fell on
prayed with them all. And they all wept sore, and
the
for
all
of
most
ng
sorrowi
him,
Paul’s neck and kissed
face
his
behold
should
they
that
spoken,
had
he
which
word
ship.
no more. And they brought him on his way unto the
we ar-
Tyre,
from
voyage
the
d
finishe
had
we
And when
abode
and
n,
brethre
rived at Ptolemais; and we saluted the
and
ed,
depart
we
w
morro
the
on
with them one day. And
Philip
of
house
the
into
ng
enteri
and
a:
Cesare
unto
came
with
the evangelist, who was one of the seven, we abode
pro-
who
ers,
daught
virgin
four
had
man
this
him. Now
phesied. And as we tarried there some days, there came
down from Judza a certain prophet, named Agabus. And
coming to us, and taking Paul’s girdle, he bound his feet
and hands, and said, Thus saith the Holy Spirit, So shall
the Jews at Jerusalem bind the man that owneth this girdle,
and shall deliver him into the hands of the Gentiles. And
when we heard these things, both we and they of that place
Then Paul an-
besought him not to go up to Jerusalem.
my heart? for
ng
breaki
and
g
swered, What do ye, weepin
I am ready not to be bound only, but also to die at Jeru-
salem for the name of the Lord Jesus. And when he wouldTHE
EARLY
CHURCH
531
not be persuaded, we ceased, saying, The will of the Lord
be done.
PAUL
ARRESTED
AND
ON
TRIAL
And when we were come to Jerusalem, the brethren re-
ceived us gladly. And the day following Paul went in with
us unto James; and all the elders were present.
And when
he had saluted them, he rehearsed one by one the things
which God had wrought among the Gentiles through his
ministry. And they, when they heard it, glorified God;
and they said unto him, Thou seest, brother, how many
thousands there are among the Jews of them that have be-
lieved; and they are all zealous for the law: and they have
been informed concerning thee, that thou teachest all the
Jews who are among the Gentiles to forsake Moses, telling.
them not to circumcise their children, neither to walk after
the customs. What is it therefore? they will certainly hear
that thou art come. Do therefore this that we say to thee:
We have four men that have a vow on them; these take,
and purify thyself with them, and be at charges for them,
that they may shave their heads: and all shall know that
there is no truth in the things whereof they have been in-
formed concerning thee; but that thou thyself also walkest
orderly, keeping the law. Then Paul took the men, and
the next day purifying himself with them went into the
temple, declaring the fulfilment of the days of purification,
until the offering was offered for every one of them.
And when the seven days were almost completed, the
Jews from Asia, when they saw him in the temple, stirred
up all the multitude and laid hands on him, crying out,
Men of Israel, help: This isthe man that teacheth all men
averywhere against the people, and the law, and this place;
and moreover he brought Greeks also into the temple, and
hath defiled this holy place. For they had before seen with
him in the city Trophimus the Ephesian, whom they sup-
posed that Paul had brought into the temple. And all the
city was moved, and the people ran together; and they laid
hold on Paul, and dragged him out of the temple: and
straightway the doors were shut. And as they were seeking
to kill him, tidings came up to the chief captain of the band,
And forthwith he
that all Jerusalem was in confusion.582
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
them: and
took soldiers and centurions, and ran down upon
s, left
soldier
the
and
n
captai
chief
the
saw
they
they, when
and
near,
came
n
captai
chief
off beating Paul. Then the
with
bound
be
to
him
nded
comma
and
him,
on
laid hold
he had
two chains; and inquired who he was, and what
among
r,
anothe
some
thing,
one
d
shoute
some
done. And
nty for
the crowd: and when he could not know the certai
the
the uproar, he commanded him to be brought into
that
was
it
so
stairs,
the
castle. And when he came upon
;
he was borne of the soldiers for the violence of the crowd
for the multitude of the people followed after, crying out,
Away with him.
And when they had tied him up with the thongs, Paul
said unto the centurion that stood by, Is it lawful for you
to scourge a man that is a Roman, and uncondemned? And
when the centurion heard it, he went to the chief captain
and told him, saying, What art thou about to do? for this
man is a Roman. And the chief captain came and said unto
And he said, Yea. And
him, Tell me, art thou a Roman?
great sum obtained I
a
With
d,
answere
the chief captain
this citizenship. And Paul said, But I am a Roman born.
They then that were about to examine him straightway
departed from him: and the chief captain also was afraid
when he knew that he was a Roman, and because he had
bound him.
But on the morrow, desiring to know the certainty where-
fore he was accused of the Jews, he loosed him, and com-
manded the chief priests and all the council to come to-
gether, and brought Paul down and set him before them.
‘And Paul, looking stedfastly on the council, said, Breth-
ren, I have lived before God in all good conscience until
this day. And the high priest Ananias commanded them
that stood by him to smite him on the mouth. Then said
Paul unto him, God shall smite thee, thou whited wall: and
sittest thou to judge me according to the law, and command-
est me to be smitten contrary to the law? And they that
stood by said, Revilest thou God’s high priest? And Paul
said, I knew not, brethren, that he was high priest: for it
is written, Thou shalt not speak evil of a ruler of thy people.
But when Paul perceived that the one part were Sadducees
and the other Pharisees, he cried out in the council, Breth-THE
EARLY
CHURCH
533
ren, I am a Pharisee, a son of Pharisees: touching the hope
and resurrection of the dead, F am called in question. And
when he had so said, there arose a dissension between the
Pharisees and Sadducees; and the assembly was divided. For
the Sadducees say that there is no resurrection, neither angel,
nor spirit; but the Pharisees confess both. And there arose
a great clamor: and some of the scribes of the Pharisees’
part stood up, and strove, saying, We find no evil in this
man: and what if a spirit hath spoken to him, or an angel?
And when there arose a great dissension, the chief captain,
fearing lest Paul should be torn in pieces by them, com-
manded the soldiers to go down and take him by force from
among them, and bring him into the castle.
And the night following the Lord stood by him, and’said,
Be of good cheer: for as thou hast testified concerning me
at Jerusalem, so must thou bear witness also at Rome.
And when it was day, the Jews banded together, and
bound themselves under a curse, saying that they would
neither eat nor drink till they had killed Paul. But Paul’s
sister’s son heard of their lying in wait, and he came and
And Paul called
entered into the castle and told Paul.
Bring this young
said,
and
,
centurions
the
of
one
unto him
man unto the chief captain; for he hath something to tell
him.
And the chief captain took him by the hand, and going
aside asked him privately, What is it that thou hast to tell
me? And he said, The Jews have agreed to ask thee to
bring down Paul to-morrow unto the council, as though thou
him.
wouldest inquire somewhat more exactly concerning
in
lie
there
for
them:
unto
yield
e
Do not thou therefor
bound
wait for him of them more than forty men, who have
themselves under a curse,
neither
to eat nor to drink till
for
they have slain him: and now are they ready, looking
young
the
let
captain
chief
the
So
the promise from thee.
signified
man go, charging him, Tell no man that thou hast
the cen-
of
two
him
unto
called
he
these things to me. And
to go
soldiers
hundred
two
ready
Make
said,
and
turions,
and
ten,
and
re
threesco
n
horseme
as far as Czsarea, and
night: and
the
of
hour
third
the
at
hundred,
two
n
spearme
set Paul there-
he bade them provide beasts, that they might
.
governor
the
Felix
unto
safe
him
bring
on, and534
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
So the soldiers, as it was commanded them, took Pau!
_and brought him by night to’Antipatris. But on the mor-
row they left the horsemen to go with him, and returned tc
the castle: and they, when they came to Cesarea and de-
livered the letter to the governor, presented Paul also be-
fore him. And when he had read it, he asked of what prov:
ince he was; and when he understood that he was of Cilicia,
I will hear thee fully, said he, when thine accusers also are
come: and he commanded him to be kept in Herod’s palace.
And after five days the high priest Ananias came down
with certain elders, and with an orator, one Tertullus; and
they informed the governor against Paul. And when he was
called, Tertullus began to accuse him, saying,
Seeing that by thee we enjoy much peace, and that by thy
providence evils are corrected for this nation, we accept it
in all ways and in all places, most excellent Felix, with all
thankfulness.
But, that I be not further tedious unto thee,
I entreat thee to hear us of thy clemency a few words. For
we have found this man a pestilent fellow, and a mover of
insurrections among all the Jews throughout the world, and
a ringleader of the sect of the Nazarenes: who moreover
assayed to profane the temple: on whom also we laid hold:
from whom thou wilt be able, by examining him thyself, to
take ‘knowledge of all these things whereof we accuse him.
And the Jews also joined in the charge, affirming that these
things were so.
And when the governor had beckoned unto him to speak,
Paul answered,
Forasmuch as I know that thou hast been of many years
a judge unto this nation, I cheerfully make my defence:
seeing that thou canst take knowledge that it is not more
than twelve days since I went up to worship at Jerusalem:
and neither in the temple did they find me disputing with
any man or stirring up a crowd, nor in the synagogues, nor
in the city. Neither can they prove to thee the things where-
of they now accuse me. But this I confess unto thee, that
after the Way which they call a sect, so serve I the God
of our fathers, believing all things which are according to
the law, and which are written in the prophets; having hope
toward God, which these also themselves look for, that there
shall be a resurrection both of the just and unjust. Herein"THE
EARLY
CHURCH
535
I also ‘exercise myself. to have a conscience void of offence
toward God and men always. Now after some years I came
to bring alms to my nation, and offerings: amidst which
they found me purified in the temple, with no crowd, nor
yet with tumult: but there were certain Jews from Asia—
who ought to have been here before thee, and to make accu-
sation, if they had aught against me. Or else let these men
themselves say what wrong-doing they found when I stood
before the council, except it be for this one voice, that I
cried standing among them, Touching the resurrection of
the dead I am called in question before you this day.
But Felix, having more exact knowledge concerning the
Way, deferred them, saying, When Lysias the chief captain
And he
shall come down, I will determine your matter.
gave order to the centurion that he should be kept in charge,
and should have indulgence; and not to forbid any of his
friends to minister unto him.
But after certain days, Felix came with Drusilla, his
wife, who was a Jewess, and sent for Paul, and heard him
concerning the faith in Christ Jesus. And as he reasoned
of righteousness, and self-control, and the judgment to come,
Felix was terrified, and answered, Go thy way for this
time; and when I have a convenient season, I will call thee
He hoped withal that money would be given
unto me.
him of Paul: wherefore also he sent for him the oftener, and
communed with him. But when two years were fulfilled,
Felix was succeeded by Porcius Festus; and desiring to gain
favor with the Jews, Felix left Paul in bonds.
Festus therefore, having come into the province, after
And the
three days went up to Jerusalem from Cesarea.
chief priests and the principal men of the Jews informed him
against Paul; and they besought him, asking a favor against
him, that he would send for him to Jerusalem; laying a
plot to kill him on the way. Howbeit Festus answered, that
Paul was kept in charge at Caesarea, and that he himself
was about to depart thither shortly. Let them therefore,
saith he, that are of power among you go down with me,
and if there is anything amiss in the man, let them accuse
him.
And when he had tarried among them not more than
on the
eight or ten days, he went down unto Cesarea; and536
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
morrow he sat on the judgment-seat, and commanded Paul
to be brought.
And when he was come, the Jews that had
come down from Jerusalem stood round about him, bring-
ing against him many and grievous charges which they could
not prove; while Paul said in his defence, Neither against
the law of the Jews, nor against the temple, nor against
Cesar, have I sinned at all. But Festus, desiring to gain
favor with the Jews, answered Paul and said, Wilt thou go
up to Jerusalem, and there be judged of these things before
me? But Paul said; I am standing before Czsar’s judg-
ment-seat, where I ought to be judged: to the Jews have
I done no wrong, as thou also very well knowest.
If then
I am a wrong-doer, and have committed anything worthy
of death, I refuse not to die; but if none of those things is
true whereof these accuse me, no man can give me up unto
them. I appeal unto Cesar. Then Festus, when he had
conferred with the council, answered, Thou hast appealed
unto Cesar: unto Cesar shalt thou go.
Now when certain days were passed, Agrippa the king
and Bernice arrived at Cesarea, and saluted Festus.
And
as they tarried there many days, Festus laid Paul’s case
before the king. And Agrippa said unto Festus, I also
could wish to hear the man myself. To-morrow, saith he,
thou shalt hear him.
So on the morrow, when Agrippa was come, and Bernice,
with great pomp, and they were entered into the place of
hearing with the chief captains and the principal men of
the city, at the command of Festus Paul was brought in.
And Festus saith, King Agrippa, and all men who are here -
present with us, ye behold this man, about whom all the
multitude of the Jews made suit to me, both at Jerusalem
and here, crying that he ought not to live any longer. But
I found that he had committed nothing worthy of death:
and as he himself appealed to the emperor I determined to
send him. Of whom I have no certain thing to write unto
my lord. Wherefore I have brought him forth before you,
and specially before thee, King Agrippa, that, after exami-
nation had, I may have somewhat to write. For it seemeth
to me unreasonable, in sending a prisoner, not withal to
signify the charges against him.
And Agrippa said unto Paul, Thou art permitted to speakTHE
EARLY
CHURCH
537
for thyself. Then Paul stretched forth his hand, and made
his defence.
And as he thus made his defence, Festus saith with a
loud voice, Paul, thou art mad; thy much learning is turn-
ing thee mad. But Paul saith, I am not mad, most excellent
Festus; but speak forth words of truth and soberness.
For
the king knoweth of these things, unto whom also I speak
freely: for I am persuaded that none of these things is
hidden from him; for this hath not been done in a corner.
I know that ,
King Agrippa, believest thou the prophets?
And Agrippa said unto Paul, With but
thou believest.
little persuasion thou wouldest fain make me a Christian.
And Paul said, I would to God, that whether with little or
with much, not thou only, but also all that hear me this
day, might become such as I am, except these bonds.
And the king rose up, and the governor, and Bernice,
and they that sat with them: and when they had withdrawn,
they spake one to another, saying, This man doeth nothing
And Agrippa said unto
worthy of death or of bonds.
Festus, This man might have been set at liberty, if he had
not appealed unto Czsar.
THE
JOURNEY
TO
ROME
And when it was determined that we should sail for Italy,
they delivered Paul and certain other prisioners to a cen-
turion named Julius, of the Augustan band. And embark-
ing in a ship of Adramyttium, which was about to sail unto
the places on the coast of Asia, we put to sea, Aristarchus,
a Macedonian of Thessalonica, being with us. And the
next day we touched at Sidon: and Julius treated Paul
kindly, and gave him leave to go unto his friends and refresh
himself. And putting to sea from thence, we sailed under
the lee of Cyprus, because the winds were contrary. And
when we had sailed across the sea which is off Cilicia and
Pamphylia, we came to Myra, a city of Lycia. And there
the centurion found a ship of Alexandria sailing for Italy;
and he put us therein. And when we had sailed slowly
many days, and were come with difficulty over against Cni-
the
dus, the wind not further suffering us, we sailed under
coast-
lee of Crete, over against Salmone; and with difficulty538
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
ing along it we came unto a certain place called Fair Ha-
vens; nigh whereunto was the city of Lasea.
And when much time was spent, and the voyage was now
dangerous, because the Fast was now already gone by, Paul
admonished them, and said unto them, Sirs, I perceive that
the voyage will be with injury and much loss, not only of the
lading and the ship, but also of our lives. But the centu-
rion gave more heed to the master and to the owner of the
ship, than to those things which were spoken by Paul. And
because the haven was not commodious to winter in, the
more part advised to put to sea from thence, if by any means
they could reach Phoenix, and winter there; which is a haven
of Crete, looking north-east and south-east. And when the
south wind blew softly, supposing that they had obtained
their purpose, they weighed anchor and sailed along Crete,
close in shore. But after no long time there beat down from
it a tempestuous wind, which is called Euraquilo: and when
the ship was caught, and could not face the wind, we gave
way to it, and were driven. And running under the lee of
a small island called Cauda, we were able, with difficulty, to
secure the boat: and when they had hoisted it up, they used .
helps, under-girding the ship; and, fearing lest they should
be cast upon the Syrtis, they lowered the gear, and so were
driven. And as we labored exceedingly with the storm, the
next day they began to throw the freight overboard; and
the third day they cast out with their own hands the tack-
ling of the ship. And when neither sun nor stars shone upon
us for many days, and no small tempest lay on us, all hope
that we should be saved was now taken away. And when
they had been long without food, then Paul stood forth in
the midst of them, and said, Sirs, ye should have hearkened
unto me, and not have set sail from Crete, and have gotten
this injury and loss. And now I exhort you to be of good
cheer; for there shall be no loss of life among you, but only
of the ship. For there stood by me this night an angel of
the God whose I am, whom also I serve, saying, Fear not,
Paul; thou must stand before Casar: and lo, God hath
granted thee all them that sail with thee. Wherefore, sirs,
be of good cheer: for I believe God, that it shall be even
so as it hath been spoken unto me. But we must be cast
upon a certain island.‘THE*
EARLY '/CHURCH
539
But when the fourteenth night was come, as we were
driven to and fro in the sea of Adria, about midnight the
sailors surmised that they were drawing near to some coun-
try: and they sounded, and found twenty fathoms; and
after a little space, they sounded again, and found fifteen
fathoms. And fearing lest haply we should be cast’ ashore
on rocky ground, they let go four anchors from the stern,
and wished for the day. And as the sailors were seeking
to flee out of the ship, and had lowered the boat into the
sea, under color as though they would lay out anchors
from the foreship, Paul said to the centurion and to the
soldiers, Except these abide in the ship, ye cannot be saved.
Then the soldiers cut away the ropes of the boat, and let her
fall off. And while the day was coming on, Paul besought
them all to take some food, saying, This day is the four-
teenth day that ye wait and continue fasting, having taken
nothing. Wherefore I beseech you to take some food: for
this is for your safety: for there shall not a hair perish from
the head of any of you. And when he had said this, and
had taken bread, he gave thanks to God in the presence of
all; and he brake it, and began to eat. Then were they all
of good cheer, and themselves also took food. And we were
in all in the ship two hundred threescore and sixteen souls.
And when they had eaten enough, they lightened the ship,
throwing out the wheat into the sea. And when it was day,
they knew not the land: but they perceived a certain bay
with a beach, and they took counsel whether they could drive
the ship upon it. And casting off the anchors, they left
them in the sea, at the same time loosing the bands of the
rudders; and hoisting up the foresail to the wind, they made
But lighting upon a place where two seas
for the beach.
met, they ran the vessel aground; and the foreship struck
and remained unmovable, but the stern began to break
up by the violence of the waves. And the soldiers’ counsel
was to kill the prisoners, lest any of them should swim out,
and escape. But the centurion, desiring to save Paul, stayed
them from their purpose; and commanded that they who
could swim should cast themselves overboard, and get first to
the land; and the rest, some on planks, and some on other
things from the ship. And so it came to pass, that they all
escaped safe to the land.540
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
And when we were escaped, then we knew that the island
was called Melita. And the barbarians showed us no com-
mon kindness: for they kindled a fire, and received us all,
because of the present rain, and because of the cold. But
when Paul had gathered a bundle of sticks and laid them on
the fire, a viper came out by reason of the heat, and fastened
on his hand. And when the barbarians saw the venomous
creature hanging from his hand, they said one to another,
No doubt this man is a murderer, whom, though he hath
escaped from the sea, yet Justice hath not suffered to live.
Howbeit he shook off the creature into the fire, and took no
harm. But they expected that he would have swollen, or
fallen down dead suddenly: but when they were long in
expectation and beheld nothing amiss come to him, they
changed their minds, and said that he was a god.
Now in the neighborhood of that place were lands be-
longing to the chief man of the island, named Publius; who
received us, and entertained us three days courteously. And
it was so, that the father of Publius lay sick of fever and
dysentery: unto whom Paul entered in, and prayed, and lay-
ing his hands on him healed him. And when this was done,
the rest also that had diseases in the island came, and were
cured: who also honored us with many honors; and when
we sailed, they put on board such things as we needed.
And after three months we set sail in a ship of Alexandria
which had wintered:in the island, whose sign was The Twin
Brothers, and so we came to Rome. And when we entered
into Rome, Paul was suffered to abide by himself with the
soldier that guarded him.
And it came to pass, that after three days he called to-
gether those that were the chief of the Jews: and when
they were come together, he said unto them, I, brethren,
though I had done nothing against the people, or the cus-
toms of our fathers, yet was delivered prisoner from Jeru-
salem into the hands of the Romans: who, when they had
examined me, desired to set me at liberty, because there was
no cause of death in me. But when the Jews spake against
it, I was constrained to appeal unto Cesar; not that I had
aught whereof to accuse my nation. For this cause therefore
did I entreat you to see and to speak with me: for because
of the hope of Israel I am bound with this chain. And theyTHE
EARLY
CHURCH
541
said unto him, We neither received letters from Judza con-
cerning thee, nor did any of the brethren come hither and
report or speak any harm of thee. But we desire to hear of
thee what thou thinkest: for as concerning this sect, it is
known to us that everywhere it is spoken against.
And when they had appointed him a day, they came to
him into his lodging in great number; to whom he ex-
pounded the matter, testifying the kingdom of God, and
persuading them concerning Jesus, both from the law of
Moses and from the prophets, from morning till evening.
And some believed the things which were spoken, and some
disbelieved.
And he abode two whole years in his own hired dwelling,
and received all that went in unto him, preaching the king-
dom of God, and teaching the things concerning the Lord
Jesus Christ with all boldness, none forbidding him.;
Rivsmtal snot: ionpllalaiterst aes
i
sonal “ssate cvtilgagd: alt. dorco pee
fo ae
40 ¥
pool
or. siienb, opal
ecnotlt te”ae
_ dow
‘*
als RATIONED, 22.gh tf
saad—_‘9
roa4pwomad-
eeed
ppdane a TF 39) ooee
of suis) bogniaggiy be
yods mia
ean oth oder a qredeaun: sexe pak gerbel gul aimdeanite
bas, bot). to. mobgaid “esl |gauxtigzns angeroie hee
je. wel artenoth, dod ,.enalsLenereene oe
agniey ohhh golsrotn enigitt _2iedgerg)-sdd.
smi0% ‘bas anna ara. doiden eqausls, anit)vom
st
.
sting -chrat hye.
;
.
bad. ;
nave
pm aeey vee, etchct preseeledia.owt.sbederet) iba ja 2
-gagidvodle gaidawsrg:ccud nyere snow. tes ths. boyipar a:
. Hie, svaiaeineeae ganit,
Stee
petits
is
bie ahi wet ries
nad
wl
eoghoeved
.Hd <6
a *)demers: ty
fsticee
wna
Ge
aeaad ¢ wite
ole
of
Pabinis
iay
4
yrit “use
lsa
7frvee
cock
"
Sah
Poul ereete e:25, one prayed, und LAW
d bien,“Add when
us withstare
this
wes BES
hangecd
Noekrrs
A‘,*
:
> acd, Sore =.
Wee tanta, Ces git sar Doar persthangs 4F wr nonfinhy)
s
ga
4
*
ral vAney
a
nana
(0 ted alisesscs In the johtiad ‘cniue.-ond wey
Ais, ie rate alan,
lt
inh 2 mo,
ceb)ervained om etree: dave i
che
w+, ROSE
ort the
i tng his ends ge: Tim —
x
oft,aridoges. bagi..bor) to mo
ith gnibbidrel, elites) apoltind Le data. s2i
ts
,
Leet pangitite: Wwe setsailon aabep of Alrvandita “i
ih tach Ned ence
in the Piand. whore sgn was The Peis
‘| Msttheeyg: and wwe ceote t y Rune.
And when 9 i
Anas Race, ‘Powb, +
fered to ubide by himself ‘with he +
ila
a cat. guar “08 tien,
ard
ee
oeeeae
eeiting
}—
*, Qatar
bt poe,
“vat atter
three daw
be cabhed wo
hens tet, Ppove the cliet af the Jews: and when
‘Ties Wr. ees together, he ssid imap when, ©, pirdsreny.
hte
{ hed Special
“Bee bf ae
Fre
b
eS
* natin
Ghee
opainesithe: pengile.-or the
oct Was adel ewwed: qrhoricy fron: Doe
r,
the Gams ot rhe. Koatamiewtio, when’ they diaesag
pees ip,
abehibed Fo wok wre Re Aberey, bearguse there
"thade ~ Certh eee,
Sut wheacthe Jews spake agpine
ae:ahat| S
a &) * cen) crane te epgeeah ety peer aot
dughs aSarent te accyes hy shalions
oPor thie coupe th
hi ar
beeueet ri
eas eae ue5
|
ia Orton 4 betaesfegrnece | hn . if
SPATS
he
mY
m
<——-?
+
‘ie
raeLETTERS TO THE EARLY
CHRISTIANS\
ore
‘
>
aaetyaie
eeta
Ai
Peay
a
™, ys
,
v)
Tf
7
’
ie
ad
4
al
_
4
-
oe
:
>
5
7
a
-
ae
. =
ai,
YQHAd AHT OT enaTTaLD ~
toate©
@MAITAIAHD
‘
2
*
iFROM THE
OF PAUL
SELECTIONS
TO
THE
EPISTLES
ROMANS
Paul, a servant of Jesus Christ, called to be an apostle,
separated unto the gospel of God, to all that are in Rome,
beloved of God, called to be saints: Grace to you and peace
from God our Father and the Lord Jesus Christ.
First, I thank my God through Jesus Christ for you all,
that your faith is proclaimed throughout the whole world.
For God is my witness, whom I serve in my spirit in the
gospel of his Son, how unceasingly I make mention of you,
always in my prayers making request, if by any means now
at length I may be prospered by the will of God to come
unto you. For I long to see you, that I may impart unto
you some spiritual gift, to the end ye may be established;
that is, that I with you may be comforted in you, each of us
by the other’s faith, both yours and mine. And I would not
have you ignorant, brethren, that oftentimes I purposed to
come unto you (and was hindered hitherto), that I might
have some fruit in you also, even as in the rest of the Gen-
tiles. I am debtor both to Greeks and to Barbarians, both
to the wise and to the foolish. So, as much as in me is, I am
ready to preach the gospel to you also that are in Rome.
For I am not ashamed of the gospel: for it is the power
the
of God unto salvation to every one that believeth; to
a
revealed
is
therein
For
Greek.
the
Jew first, and also to
written,
is
it
as
faith:
unto
faith
from
God
of
sness
righteou
But the righteous shall live by faith.
all
For the wrath of God is revealed from heaven against
the
hinder
who
men,
of
ess
ungodliness and unrighteousn
is known of
truth in unrighteousness; because that which
it unto them.
God is manifest in them; for God manifested
n of the
creatio
the
since
him
of
things
le
For the invisib
h the things
world are clearly seen, being perceived throug
y; that
divinit
and
power
ting
everlas
his
even
that are made,
545546
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
they may be without excuse: because that, knowing God,
they glorified him not as God, neither gave thanks; but be-
came vain in their reasonings, and their senseless heart was
Professing themselves to be wise, they became
darkened.
fools, and changed the glory of the incorruptible God for
the likeness of an image of corruptible man, and of birds,
and four-footed beasts, and creeping things.
And even as they refused to have God in their knowledge,
God gave them up unto a reprobate mind, to do those things
which are not fitting; being filled with all unrighteousness,
wickedness, covetousness, maliciousness; full of envy, murder,
strife, deceit, malignity; whisperers, backbiters, hateful to
God, insolent, haughty, boastful, inventors of evil things, dis-
obedient to parents, without understanding, covenant-break-
ers, without natural affection, unmerciful: who, knowing the
ordinance of God, that they that practise such things are
worthy of death, not only do the same, but also consent with
‘them that practise them.
Wherefore thou art without excuse, O man, whosoever
thou art that judgest: for wherein thou judgest another,
thou condemnest thyself; for thou that judgest dost practise
the same things. And we know that the judgment of God
is according to truth against them that practise such things.
And reckonest thou this, O man, who judgest them that
practise such things, and doest the same, that thou shalt
escape the judgment of God? Or despisest thou the riches
of his goodness and forbearance and longsuffering, not know- .
ing that the goodness of God leadeth thee to repentance?
but after thy hardness and impenitent heart treasurest up for
thyself wrath in the day of wrath and revelation of the
righteous judgment of God: who will render to every man
according to his works: to them that by patience in well-
doing seek for glory and honor and incorruption, eternal
life: but unto them that are factious, and obey not.the truth,
but obey unrighteousness, shall be wrath and indignation,
tribulation and anguish, upon every soul of man that work-
eth evil, of the Jew first, and also of the Greek; but glory
and honor and peace to every man that worketh good, to the
Jew first, and also to the Greek; for there is no respect of
persons with God.
What advantage then hath the Jew? or what is the profitLETTERS
TO
EARLY
CHRISTIANS
547
of circumcision?
Much every way: first of all, that they
were intrusted with the oracles of God.
For what if some
were without faith? shall their want of faith make of none
effect the faithfulness of God? God forbid: yea, let God
be found true, but every man a liar.
Now we know that what things soever the law saith, it
speaketh to them that are under the law; that every mouth
may be stopped, and all the world may be brought under the
judgment of God: because by the works of the law shall no
flesh be justified in his sight; for through the law cometh the
knowledge of sin.
But now apart from the law a righteousness of God hath
been manifested, being witnessed by the law and the proph-
ets; even the righteousness of God through faith in Jesus
Christ unto all them that believe; for there is no distinction ;
for all have sinned, and fall short of the glory of God; being
justified freely by his grace through the redemption that is
in Christ Jesus: whom God set forth to be a propitiation,
through faith, in his blood, to show his righteousness because
of the passing over of the sins done aforetime, in the forbear-
ance of God; for the showing, I say, of his righteousness at
this present season: that he might himself. be just, and the
justifier of him that hath faith in Jesus. Where then is the
glorying?
It is excluded.
By what manner of law? of
works? Nay: but by a law of faith. We reckon therefore
that a man is justified by faith apart from the works of the
law. Or is God the God of Jews only? is he not the God
of Gentiles also? Yea, of Gentiles also: if so be that God
is one, and he shall justify the circumcision by faith, and the
uncircumcision through faith.
Do we then make the law of none effect through faith?
God forbid: nay, we establish the law.
Being therefore justified by faith, we have peace with God
through our Lord Jesus Christ; through whom also we have
had our access by faith into this grace wherein we stand;
and we rejoice in hope of the glory of God. And not only
so, but we also rejoice in our tribulations: knowing that
tribulation worketh stedfastness; and stedfastness, approved-
ness; and approvedness, hope: and hope putteth not to
shame; because the love of God hath been shed abroad in our
hearts through the Holy Spirit which was given unto us.548
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
For while we were yet weak, in due season Christ died for
the ungodly. For scarcely for a righteous man will one die:
for peradventure for the good man some one would even
dare to die. But God commendeth his own love toward us,
in that, while we were yet sinners, Christ died for us. Much
more then, being now justified by his blood, shall we be
saved from the wrath of God through him. For if, while
we were enemies, we were reconciled to God through the
death of his Son, much more, being reconciled, shall we be
saved by his life; arid not only so, but we also rejoice in God
through our Lord Jesus Christ, through whom we have now
received the reconciliation.
What shall we say then? Shall we continue in sin, that
grace may abound? God forbid. We who died to sin, how
shall we any longer live therein? Or are ye ignorant that
all we who were baptized into Christ Jesus were baptized
into his death? We were buried therefore with him through
baptism into death: that like as Christ was raised from the
dead through the glory of the Father, so we also might walk
in newness of life. For if we have become united with him
in the likeness of his death, we shall be also in the likeness
of his resurrection ;knowing this, that our old man was cru-
cified with him, that the body of sin might be done away,
that so we should no longer be in bondage to sin; for he that
hath died is justified from sin. But if we died with Christ,
we believe that we shall also live with lim; knowing that
Christ being raised from the dead dieth no more; death no
more hath dominion over him. For the death that he died,
he died unto sin once: but the life that he liveth, he liveth
unto.God.
Even so reckon ye also yourselves to be dead
unto sin, but alive unto God in Christ Jesus.
Let not sin therefore reign in your mortal body, that ye
should obey the lusts thereof: neither present your members
unto sin as instruments of unrighteousness ;but present your-
selves unto God, as alive from the dead, and your members
as instruments of righteousness unto God. For sin shall not
have dominion over you: for ye are not under law, but under
grace. For the wages of sin is death; but the free gift of
God is eternal life in Christ Jesus our Lord.
What shall we say then? Is the law sin? God forbid.
Howbeit, I had not known sin, except through the law. DidLETTERS
TO
EARLY
CHRISTIANS
549
then that which is good become death unto me? God forbid.
But sin, that it might be shown to be sin, by working death
to me through that which is good ;—that through the com-
mandment sin might become exceeding sinful. For we know
that the law is spiritual: but I am carnal, sold under sin.
For that which I do I know not: for not what I would,
that do I practise; but what I hate, that I do. But if what
I would not, that I do, I consent unto the law that jt is
good. So now it is no more I that do it, but sin which
dwelleth in me. For I know that in me, that is, in my flesh,
dwelleth no good thing: for to will is present with me, but
to do that which is good is not. For the good which I would
I do not: but the evil which I would not, that I practise.
But if what I would not, that I do, it is no more I that do.
it, but sin which dwelleth in me. I find then the law, that,
to me who would do good, evil is present. For I delight in
the law of God after the inward man: but I see a different
law in my members, warring against the law of my mind,
and bringing me into captivity under the law of sin which is
in my members. Wretched man that I am! who shall de-
liver me out of the body of this death?
I thank God
through Jesus Christ our Lord. So then I of myself with
the mind, indeed, serve the law of God; but with the flesh
the law of sin.
There is therefore now no condemnation to them that are
in Christ Jesus. For the law of the Spirit of life in Christ
Jesus made me free from the law of sin and of death. For
what the law could not do, in that it was weak through the
flesh, God, sending his own Son in the likeness of sinful flesh
and for sin, condemned sin in the flesh: that the ordinance
of the law might be fulfilled in us, who walk not after the
flesh, but after the Spirit. For they that are after the flesh
mind the things of the flesh; but they that are after the
Spirit the things of the Spirit. For the mind of the flesh is
death; but the mind of the Spirit is life and peace: because
the mind of the flesh is enmity against God; for it is not
subject to the law of God, neither indeed can it be: and they
But ye are not in
that are in the flesh cannot please God.
the flesh but in the Spirit, if so be that the Spirit of God
dwelleth in you. But if any man hath not the Spirit of
Christ, he is none of his. And if Christ is in you, the body is550
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
dead because of sin; but the spirit is life because of righteous-
ness. But if the Spirit of him that raised up Jesus from the
dead dwelleth in you, he that raised up Christ Jesus from —
the dead shall give life also to your mortal bodies through
his Spirit that dwelleth in you.
So then, brethren, we are debtors, not to the flesh, to live
after the flesh: for if ye live after the flesh, ye must die; but
if by the Spirit ye put to death the deeds of the body, ye shall
live. For as many as are led by the Spirit of God, these are
sons of God. For ye received not the spirit of bondage again
unto fear; but ye received the spirit of adoption, whereby we
cry, Abba, Father. The Spirit himself beareth witness with
our spirit, that we are children of God: and if children, then
heirs; heirs of God, and joint-heirs with Christ; if so be
that we suffer with him, that we may be also glorified with
him.
For I reckon that the sufferings of this present time are
not worthy to be compared with the glory which shall be
revealed to us-ward. For the earnest expectation of the crea-
tion waiteth for the revealing of the sons of God. For we
know that the whole creation groaneth and travaileth in
And not only so, but ourselves
pain together until now.
also, who have the firstfruits of the Spirit, even we ourselves
groan within ourselves, waiting for our adoption, to wit, the
redemption of our body. For in hope were we saved: but
hope that is seen is not hope; for who hopeth for that which
he seeth? But if we hope for that which we see not, then do
we with patience wait for it.
And in like manner the Spirit also helpeth our infirmity:
for we know not how to pray as we ought; but the Spirit
himself maketh intercession for us with groanings which can-
not be uttered; and he that searcheth the hearts knoweth
what is the mind- of the Spirit, because he maketh inter-
cession for the saints according to the will of God. And we
know that to them that love God all things work together
for good, even to them that are called according to his pur-
pose. For whom he foreknew, he also foreordained to be
conformed to the image of his Son, that he might be the first-
born among many brethren: and whom he foreordained,
them he also called: and whom he called, them he also justi-
fied: and whom he justified, them he also glorified.LETTERS
TO
EARLY
CHRISTIANS
551
What then shall we say to these things? If God is for us,
who is against us? He that spared not his own Son, but de-
livered him up for us all, how shall he not also with him
freely give us all things? Who shall lay anything to the
charge of God’s elect? It is God that justifieth; who is he
that condemneth?
It is Christ Jesus that died, yea rather,
that was raised from the dead, who is at the right hand of
God, who also maketh intercession for us. Who shall sepa-
rate us from the love of Christ? shall tribulation, or anguish,
or persecution, or famine, or nakedness, or peril, or sword?
Nay, in all these things we are more than conquerors through
him that loved us. For I am persuaded, that neither death,
nor life, nor angels, nor principalities, nor things present, nor
things to come, nor powers, nor height, nor depth, nor any
other creature, shall be able to separate us from the love of
God, which is in Christ Jesus our Lord.
I say the truth in Christ, I lie not, my conscience bearing
witness with me in the Holy Spirit, that I have great sorrow
and unceasing pain in my heart. For I could wish’ that I
myself were anathema from Christ for my brethren’s sake,
my kinsmen acording to the flesh: who are Israelites; whose
is the adoption, and the glory, and the covenants, and the
giving of the law, and the service of God, and the promises;
whose are the fathers, and of whom is Christ as concerning
the flesh, who is over all, God blessed for ever.
Brethren, my heart’s desire and my supplication to God
is for them, that they may be saved.
For I bear them wit-
ness that they have a zeal for God, but not according to
knowledge. For being ignorant of God’s righteousness, and
seeking to establish their own, they did not subject them-
selves to the righteousness of God. For Christ is the end of
the law unto righteousness to every one that believeth. For
Moses writeth that the man that doeth the righteousness
which is of the law shall live thereby. But the righteousness
which is of faith saith thus, Say not in thy heart, Who shall
ascend into heaven? (that is, to bring Christ down:) or,
Who shall descend into the abyss? (that is, to bring Christ
up from the dead.)
But what saith it?
The word is nigh
thee, in thy mouth, and in thy heart: that is, the word of
faith, which we preach: because if thou shalt confess with
thy mouth Jesus as Lord, and shalt believe in thy heart that552
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
for with
God raised him from the dead, thou shalt be saved:
the
with
and
;
s
ousnes
righte
unto
th
believe
man
heart
the
re
scriptu
the
For
on.
salvati
unto
mouth confession is made
shame.
to
put
be
not
shall
him
on
th
believe
ver
Whosoe
saith,
For there is no distinction between Jew and Greek: for the
upon
same Lord is Lord of all, and is rich unto all that call
Lord
the
of
name
the
upon
him: for, Whosoever shall call
How then shall they call on him in whom
shall be saved.
they have not believed? and how shall they believe in him
whom they have not heard? and how shall they hear without
a preacher? and how shall they preach, except they be sent?
even as it is written, How beautiful are the feet of them
that bring glad tidings of good things!
For I would not, brethren, have you ignorant of this mys-
tery, lest ye be wise in your own conceits, that a hardening
in part hath befallen Israel, until the fulness of the Gentiles
be come in; and so all Israel shall be saved. As touching the
gospel, they are enemies for your sake: but as touching the
For the
election, they are beloved for the fathers’ sake.
gifts and the calling of God are not repented of. For as ye
in time past were disobedient to God, but now have obtained
mercy by their disobedience, even so have these also now been
disobedient, that by the mercy shown to you they also may
For God hath shut up all unto dis-
now obtain mercy.
obedience, that he might have mercy upon all.
O the depth of the riches both of the wisdom and the
knowledge of God! how unsearchable are his judgments, and
his ways past tracing out! For who hath known the mind
of the Lord? or who hath been his counsellor? or who hath
first given to him, and it shall be recompensed unto him
again? For of him, and through him, and unto him, are all
things. To him be the glory for ever. Amen.
I bessech you therefore, brethren, by the mercies of God,
to present your bodies a living sacrifice, holy, acceptable to
God, which is your spiritual service. And be not fashioned
according to this world: but be ye transformed by the re-
newing of your mind, that ye may prove what is the good
and acceptable and perfect will of God.
For I say, through the grace that was given me, to every
man that is among you, not to think of himself more highlyLETTERS
TO
EARLY
CHRISTIANS
553
than he ought to think; but so to think
as to think soberly,
according as God hath dealt to each man
a measure of faith.
For even as we have many members in one
body, and all the
members have not the same office: so we,
who are many, are
one body in Christ, and severally members
one of another.
And having gifts differing according to the
grace that was
-given to us, whether prophecy, let us proph
esy according to
the proportion of our faith: or ministry, let
us give ourselves
to our ministry; or he that teacheth, to his
teaching; or he
that exhorteth, to his exhorting: he that giveth
, let him do
it with liberality; he that tuleth, with dilige
nce; he that
showeth mercy, with cheerfulness,
Let love be without hypocrisy. Abhor that which
is evil .
cleave to that which is good. In love of the
brethren be
tenderly affectioned one to another; in honor preferring
one
another ; in diligence not slothful; fervent in spirit;
serving
the Lord; rejoicing in hope; patient in tribulation;
continu-
ing stedfastly in prayer; communicating to the necessi
ties of
the saints; given to hospitality.
Bless them that persecute
you; bless, and curse not. Rejoice with them that rejoic
e;
weep with them that weep. Be of the same mind one
toward
another. Set not your mind on high things, but condes
cend
to things that are lowly. Be not wise in your own conceit
s.
Render to no man evil for evil. Take thought for things
honorable in the sight of all men. If it be possible, as much
as in you lieth, be at peace with all men. Avenge not your-
selves, beloved, but give place unto the wrath of God: for
it is written, Vengeance belongeth unto me; I will recom-
pense, saith the Lord. But if thine enemy hunger, feed him;
if he thirst, give him to drink: for in so doing thou shalt
heap coals of fire upon his head. Be not overcome of evil,
but overcome evil with good.
Owe no man anything, save to love one another: for he
that loveth his neighbor hath fulfilled the law. For this,
Thou shalt not commit adultery, Thou shalt not kill, Thou
shalt not steal, Thou shalt not covet, and if there be any
other commandment, it is summed up in this word, namely,
Thou shalt love thy neighbor as thyself. Love worketh no
ill to his neighbor: love therefore is the fulfilment of the law.
And this, knowing the season, that already it is time for
you to awake out of sleep: for now is salvation nearer to us554
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
than when we first believed. The night is far spent, and the
day is at hand: let us therefore cast off the works of dark-
ness, and let us put on the armor of light. Let us walk be-
comingly, as in the day; not in revelling and drunkenness,
not in chambering and wantonness, not in strife and jealousy.
But put ye on the Lord Jesus Christ, and make not provision
for the flesh, to fulfil the lusts thereof.
But him that is weak in faith receive ye, yet not for de-
cision of scruples. One man hath faith to eat all things: but
he that is weak eateth herbs. Let not him that eateth set at
nought him that eateth not; and let not him that eateth not
judge him that eateth: for God hath received him. Who art
thou that judgest the servant of another? to his own lord he
standeth or falleth. Yea, he shall be made to stand; for the
Lord hath power to make him stand. One man esteemeth
one day above another: another esteemeth every day alike.
Let each man’ be fully assured in his own mind. He that
regardeth the day, regardeth it unto the Lord: and he that
eateth, eateth unto the Lord, for he giveth God thanks; and
he that eateth not, unto the Lord he eateth not, and giveth
For none of us liveth to himself, and none
God thanks.
For whether we live, we live unto the
dieth to himself.
die, we die unto the Lord: whether
we
Lord; or whether
we live therefore, or die, we are the Lord’s. So then each
one of us shall give account of himself to God.
_ Let us not therefore judge one another any more: but
judge ye this rather, that no man put a stumblingblock in his
brother’s way, or an occasion of falling. I know, and am
persuaded in the Lord Jesus, that nothing is unclean of itself:
save that to him who accounteth anything to be unclean, to
For if because of meat thy brother is
him it is unclean.
grieved, thou walkest no longer in love. Destroy not with
thy meat him for whom Christ died. Let not then your good
be evil spoken of: for the kingdom of God is not eating and
drinking, but righteousness and peace and joy in the Holy
;
Spirit.
of
infirmities
the
bear
to
ought
strong
are
Now we that
the weak, and not to please ourselves. Let each one of us
please his neighbor for that which is good, unto edifying.
For Christ also pleased not himself; but, as it is written,
The reproaches of them that reproached thee fell upon me.LETTERS
TO
EARLY
CHRISTIANS
555
Now the God of hope fill you with all joy and peace in be-
lieving, that ye may abound in hope, in the power of the
Holy Spirit.
TO
THE
CORINTHIANS
Paul, called to be an apostle of Jesus Christ through the
will of God, and Sosthenes our brother, unto the church of
God which is at Corinth, even them that are sanctified in
Christ Jesus, called to be saints, with all that call upon the
name of our Lord Jesus Christ in every place, their Lord
and ours: Grace to you and peace from God our Father and
the Lord Jesus Christ.
I thank my God always concerning you, for the grace of
God which was given you in Christ Jesus; that in every-
thing ye were.enriched in him, in all utterance and all knowl-
edge; even as the testimony of Christ was confirmed in you:
so that ye come behind in no gift; waiting for the revelation
of our Lord Jesus Christ; who shall also confirm you unto
the end, that ye be unreprovable in the day of our Lord
Jesus Christ. God is faithful, through whom ye were called
into the fellowship of his Son Jesus Christ our Lord.
Now I beseech you, brethren, through the name of our
Lord Jesus Christ, that ye all speak the same thing, and that
there be no divisions among you; but that ye be perfected
together in the same mind and in the same judgment. For
it hath been signified unto me concerning you, my brethren,
by them that are of the household of Chloe, that there are
contentions among you. Now this I mean, that each one of
you saith, I am of Paul; and I of Apollos; and I of Cephas;
and I of Christ. Is Christ divided? was Paul crucified for
you? or were ye baptized into the name of Paul? I thank
God that I baptized none of you, save Crispus and Gaius;
lest any man should say that ye were baptized into my name.
And I baptized also the household of Stephanas: besides, I
- know not whether I baptized any other. For Christ sent me
not to baptize, but to preach the gospel: not in wisdom of
words, lest the cross of Christ should be made void.
For the word of the cross is to them that perish foolish-
ness; but unto us who are saved it is the power of God.
For seeing that in the wisdom of God the world through its
wisdom knew not God, it was God’s good pleasure through556
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
the foolishness of the preaching to save them that believe.
Seeing that Jews ask for signs, and Greeks seek after wis-
dom: but we preach Christ crucified, unto Jews a stumbling-
block, and unto Gentiles foolishness; but unto them that are
called, both Jews and Greeks, Christ the power of God, and
the wisdom of God. Because the foolishness of God is wiser
than men; and the weakness of God is stronger than men.
For behold your calling, brethren, that not many wise
after the flesh, not many mighty, not many noble, are called:
but God chose the foolish things of the world, that he might
put to shame them that are wise; and God chose the weak
things of the world, that he might put to shame the things
that are strong; and the base things of the world, and the
things that are despised, did God choose, yea and the things
that are not, that he might bring to nought the things that
are: that no flesh should glory before God. But of him are
ye in Christ Jesus, who was made unto us wisdom from God,
and righteousness and sanctification, and redemption: that,
according as it is written, He that glorieth, let him glory in
the Lord.
And I, brethren, when I came unto you, came not with
excellency of speech or of wisdom, proclaiming to you the
testimony of God. For I determined not to know anything
among you, save Jesus Christ, and him crucified.
And I
was with you in weakness, and in fear, and in much trem-
bling. And my speech and my preaching were not in per-
suasive words of wisdom, but in demonstration of the Spirit
and of power: that your faith should not stand in the wis-
dom of men, but in the power of God.
And I, brethren, could not speak unto you as unto spirit-
ual, but as unto carnal, as unto babes in Christ. I fed you
with milk, not with meat; for ye were not yet able to bear
it: nay, not even now are ye able; for ye are yet carnal: for
whereas there is among you jealousy and strife, ate ye not
carnal, and do ye not walk after the manner of men?
For
when one saith, I am of Paul; and another, I am of Apollos;
are ye not men? What then is Apollos? and what is Paul?
Ministers through whom ye believed; and each as the Lord
gave to him. I planted, Apollos watered; but God gave the
increase.
So then neither is he that planteth anything,
neither he that watereth; but God that giveth the increase.LETTERS
TO
EARLY
CHRISTIANS
557
Now he that planteth and he that watereth are one: but each
shall receive his own reward according to his own labor.
For we are God’s fellow-workers: ye are God’s husbandry,
God’s building.
According to the grace of God which was given unto me,
as a wise masterbuilder I laid a foundation; and another
buildeth thereon. But let each man take heed how he buijld-
eth thereon. For other foundation can no man lay than that
which is laid, which is Jesus Christ. But if any man buildeth
on the foundation gold, silver, costly stones, wood, hay,
stubble; each man’s work shall be made manifest: for the
day shall declare it, because it is revealed in fire; and the
fire itself shall prove each man’s work of what sort it is. If
any man’s work shall abide which he: built thereon, he shall
receive a reward.
If any man’s work shall be burned, he
shall suffer loss: but he himself shall be saved; yet so as
through fire.
Know ye not that ye are a temple of God, and that the
Spirit.of God dwelleth in you? If any man destroyeth the
temple of God, him shall God destroy; for the temple of
God is holy, and such are ye.
Dare any of you, having a matter against his neighbor, go
to law before the unrighteous, and not before the saints?
Nay, already it is altogether a defect in you, that ye have
lawsuits one with another. Why not rather take wrong?
Nay, but ye yourselves do
why not rather be defrauded?
wrong, and defraud, and that your brethren. Or know ye
not that the unrighteous shall not inherit the kingdom of
God?
Be not deceived: neither fornicators, nor idolaters,
nor adulterers, nor effeminate, nor abusers of themselves with
men, nor thieves, nor covetous, nor drunkards, nor revilers,
And
nor extortioners, shall inherit the kingdom of God.
such were some of you: but ye were washed, but ye were
sanctified, but ye were justified in the name of the Lord
Jesus Christ, and in the Spirit of our God.
Am I not free? am I not an apostle? have I not seen Jesus
our Lord? are not ye my work in the Lord? If to others I
am not an apostle, yet at least I am to you; for the seal of
mine apostleship are ye in the Lord. Know ye not that they
that minister about sacréd things eat of the things of the
temple, and they that wait upon the altar have their portion558
-
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
with the altar? Even so did the Lord ordain that they that
proclaim the gospel should live of the gospel. But I have
used none of these things and I write not these things that
it may be so done in my case; for it were good for me rather
to die, than that any man should make my glorying void.
For if I preach the gospel, I have nothing to glory of; for
necessity is laid upon me; for woe is unto me, if I preach not
the gospel. For if I do this of mine own will, I have a re-
ward: but if not of mine own will, I have a stewardship
That, when
intrusted to me. -What then is my reward?
I preach the gospel, I may make the gospel without charge,
For
so as not to use to the full my right in the gospel.
though I was free from all men, I brought myself under
bondage to all, that I might gain the more. And to the Jews
I became as a Jew, that I might gain Jews; to them that are
under the law, as under the law, not being myself under the
law, that I might gain them that are under the law; to them
that are without law, as without law, not being without
law to God, but under law to Christ, that I might gain them
that are without law. To the weak I became weak, that I
might gain the weak: I am become all things to all men, that
I may by all means save some. And I do all things for the
gospel’s sake, that I may be a joint partaker thereof. Know
ye not that they that run in a race run all, but one receiveth
the prize? Even so run; that ye may attain. And every
man that striveth in the games exerciseth self-control in all
things. Now they do it to receive a corruptible crown; but
we an incorruptible. I therefore so run, as not uncertainly;
so fight I, as not beating the air: but I buffet my body, and
bring it into bondage: lest by any means, after that I have
preached to others, I myself should be rejected.
For I would not, brethren, have you ignorant, that our
fathers were all under the cloud, and all passed through the
sea; and were all baptized unto Moses in the cloud and in
the sea; and did all eat the same spiritual food; and did all
drink the same spiritual drink: for they drank of a spiritual
rock that followed them: and the rock was Christ. How-
beit with most of them God was not well pleased: for they
were overthrown in the wilderness. Now these things were
our examples, to the intent we should not lust after evil
things, as they also lusted. Neither be ye idolaters, as wereLETTERS
TO
EARLY
CHRISTIANS
559
some of them; as it is written, The people sat down to eat
and drink, and rose up to play. Neither let us commit for-
nication, as some of them committed, and fell in one day
three and twenty thousand.
Neither let us make trial of
the Lord, as some of them made trial, and perished by the
serpents. Neither murmur ye, as some of them murmured,
and perished by the destroyer. Now these things happened
unto them by way of example; and they were written for
our admonition, upon whom the ends of the ages are come.
Wherefore let him that thinketh he standeth take heed lest
he fall. There hath no temptation taken you but such as
man can bear: but God is faithful, who will not suffer you
to be tempted above that ye are able; but will with the temp-
tation make also the way of escape, that ye may be able to
endure it.
All things are lawful; but not all things are expedient.
All things are lawful; but not all things edify. Let no man
seek his own, but each his neighbor’s good. Whatsoever is
sold in the shambles, eat, asking no question for conscience’
sake; for the earth is the Lord’s, and the fulness thereof. If
one of them that believe not biddeth you to a feast, and ye
are disposed to go; whatsoever is set before you, eat, asking
no question for conscience’ sake. But if any man say unto
you, This hath been offered in sacrifice, eat not, for his sake
that showed it, and for conscience’ sake: conscience, I say,
not thine own, but the other’s; for why is my liberty judged
by another conscience? If I partake with thankfulness, why
am I evil spoken of for that for which I give thanks?
Whether therefore ye eat, or drink, or whatsoever ye do, do
all to the glory of God.
Give no occasion of stumbling,
either to Jews, or to Greeks, or to the church of God.
Now there are diversities of gifts, but the same Spirit.
And there are diversities of ministrations, and the same Lord.
And there are diversities of workings, but the same God,
who worketh all things in all. But to each one is given the
manifestation of the Spirit to profit withal. For to one is
given through the Spirit the word of wisdom; and to another
the word of knowledge, according to the same Spirit: to an-
other faith, in the same Spirit; and to another gifts of heal-
ings, in the one Spirit; and to another workings of miracles;
and
to another
prophecy;
and
to another
discernings
of560
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
spirits: to another divers kinds of tongues; and to another
the interpretation of tongues: but all these worketh the one
and the same Spirit, dividing to each one severally even as he
will.
For as the body is one, and hath many members, and all
the members of the body, being many, are one body; so also
is Christ. For in one Spirit were we all baptized into one
body, whether Jews or Greeks, whether bond or free; and
were all made to drink of one Spirit. For the body is not
one member, but many. If the foot shall say, Because I am
not the hand, I am not of the body; it is not therefore not of
the body. And if the ear shall say, Because I am not the eye,
I am not of the body; it is not therefore not of the body. If
the whole body were an eye, where were the hearing? If the
whole were hearing, where were the smelling? But now hath
God set the members each one of them in the body, even as it
pleased him. And if they were all one member, where were
the body? But now they are many members, but one body.
And the eye cannot say to the hand, I have no need of thee:
or again the head to the feet, I have no need of you. And
whether one member suffereth, all the members suffer with
it; or one member is honored, all the members rejoice with
it. Now ye are the body of Christ, and severally members
thereof. And God hath set some in the church, first apostles,
secondly prophets, thirdly teachers, then miracles, then gifts
of healings, helps, governments, divers kinds of tongues.
Are all apostles? are all prophets? are all teachers? are all
workers of miracles? have all gifts of healings? do all speak
But desire earnestly the
with tongues? do all interpret?
greater gifts. And moreover a most excellent way show I
unto you.
If I speak with the tongues of men and of angels, but have
not love, I am become sounding brass, or a clanging cymbal.
And if I have the gift of prophecy, and know all mysteries
and all knowledge; and if I have all faith, so as to remove
mountains, but have not love, I am nothing. And if I be-
stow all my goods to feed the poor, and if I give my body to
be burned, but have not love, it profiteth me nothing. Love
suffereth long, and is kind; love envieth not; love vaunteth
not itself, is not puffed up, doth not behave itself unseemly,
seeketh not its own, is not provoked, taketh not account ofLETTERS
TO
EARLY
CHRISTIANS
561
evil; rejoiceth not in unrighteousness, but rejoiceth with the
truth; beareth all things, believeth all things, hopeth all
things, endureth all things. Love never faileth: but whether
there be prophecies, they shall be done away; whether there
be tongues, they shall cease; whether there be knowledge,
it shall be done away. For we know in part, and we proph-
esy in part; but when that which is perfect is come, that
which is in part shall be done away. When I was a child,
I spake as a child, I felt as a child, I thought as a child: now
that I am become a man, I have put away childish things.
For now we see in a mirror, darkly; but then face to face:
now I know in part; but then shall I know fully even as
also I was fully known. But now abideth faith, hope, love, ‘
these three; and the greatest of these is love.
Now if Christ is preached that he hath been raised from
the dead, how say some among you that there is no resurec-
tion of the dead?
But if there is no resurrection of the
dead, neither hath Christ been raised: and if Christ hath
not been raised, then is our preaching vain, your faith also
is vain.
Yea, and we are found false witnesses of God;
because we witnessed of God that he raised up Christ: whom
he raised not up, if so be that the dead are not raised. For
if the dead are not raised, neither hath Christ been raised:
and if Christ hath not been raised, your faith is vain; ye are
yet in your sins. Then they also that are fallen asleep in
Christ have perished. If we have only hoped in Christ in
this life, we are of all men most pitiable.
But now hath Christ been raised from the dead, the first-
fruits of them that are asleep. For since by man came death,
by ‘man came also the resurrection of the dead. For as in -
Adam all die, so also in Christ shall all be made alive.
But some one will say, How are the dead raised? and with
what manner of body do they come? Thou foolish one, that
which thou thyself sowest is not quickened except it die: and
that which thou sowest, thou sowest not the body that shall
be, but a bare grain, it may chance of wheat, or of some
other kind; but God giveth it a body even as it pleased him,
and to each seed a body of its own. All flesh is not the same
flesh: but there is one flesh of men, and another flesh of
beasts, and another flesh of birds, and another of fishes.
There are also celestial bodies, and bodies terrestrial: but the562
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
°
glory of the celestial is one, and the glory of the terrestrial is
another. ‘There is one glory of the sun, and another glory
of the moon, and another glory of the stars; for one star
differeth from another star in glory. So also is the resurrec-
It is sown in corruption; it is raised in
tion of the dead.
in dishonor; it is raised in glory: it
sown
is
it
ion:
incorrupt
is sown in weakness; it is raised in power: it is sown a natural
body; it is raised a spiritual body. If there is a natural body,
there is also a spiritual body. So also it is written, The first
man Adam became’a living soul. The last Adam became a
life-giving spirit. Howbeit that is not first which is spiritual,
but that which is natural; then that which is spiritual. The
first man is of the earth, earthy: the second man is of heaven.
As is the earthy, such are they also that are earthy: and as is
the heavenly, such are they also that are heavenly. And as
we have borne the image of the earthy, we shall also bear
the image of the heavenly.
Now this I say, brethren, that flesh and blood cannot in-
herit the kingdom of God; neither doth corruption inherit
incorruption. Behold, I tell you a mystery: We all shall
not sleep, but we shall all be changed, in a moment, in the
twinkling of an eye, at the last trump: for the trumpet shall
sound, and the dead shall be raised incorruptible, and we
For this corruptible must put on incor-
shall be changed.
But
ruption, and this mortal must put on immortality.
when this corruptible shall have put on incorruption, and
this mortal shall have put on immortality, then shall come to
pass the saying that is written, Death is swallowed up in
victory. O death, where is thy victory? O death, where
is thy sting? The sting of death is sin; and the power of
sin is the law: but thanks be to God, who giveth us the
Wherefore, my
victory through our Lord Jesus Christ.
beloved brethren, be ye stedfast, unmovable, always abound-
ing in the work of the Lord, forasmuch as ye know-that your
labor is not vain in the Lord.
Paul, an apostle of Christ Jesus through the will of God,
and Timothy our brother, unto the church of God which is
at Corinth, with all the saints that are in the whole of
Achaia: Grace to you and peace from God our Father and
the Lord Jesus Christ.LETTERS,
"TO
EARLY,
CHRISTIANS
563
Blessed be the God and Father of our Lord Jesus Christ,
the Father of mercies and God of all comfort; who com-
forteth us in ail our affliction, that we may be able to com-
fort them that are in any affliction, through the comfort
wherewith we ourselves are comforted of God. For as the
sufferings of Christ abound unto us, even so our comfort also
aboundeth through Christ. But whether we are afflicted, it
is for your comfort and salvation; or whether we are com-
forted, it is for your comfort, which worketh in the patient
enduring of the same sufferings which we also suffer: and
our hope for you is stedfast; knowing that, as ye are par-
takers of the sufferings, so also are ye of the comfort. For
we would not have you ignorant, brethren, concerning our
affliction which befell us in Asia, that we were weighed down
exceedingly, beyond our power, insomuch that we despaired
even of life: yea, we ourselves have had the sentence of death
within ourselves, that we should not trust in ourselves, but
in God who raiseth the dead: who delivered us out of so
great a death, and will deliver: on whom we have set our
hope thathe will also still deliver us; ye also helping to-
gether on our behalf by your supplication; that, for the gift
bestowed upon us by means of many, thanks may be given
by many persons on our behalf.
But thanks be unto God, who always leadeth us in tri-
umph in Christ, and maketh manifest through us the savor
of his knowledge in every place. For we are a sweet savor
of Christ unto God, in them that are saved, and in them that
perish; to the one a savor from death unto death; to the
other a savor from life unto life. And who is sufficient for
these things? For we are not as the many, corrupting the
word of God: but as of sincerity, but as of God, in the sight
of God, speak we in Christ.
Are we beginning again to commend ourselves? or need
we, as do some, epistles of commendation to you or from
you? Ye are our epistle, written in our hearts, known and
read of all men; being made manifest that ye are an epistle
of Christ, ministered by us, written not with ink, but with
the Spirit of the living God; not in tables of stone, but in
tables that are hearts of flesh. And such confidence have we
through Christ to God-ward: not that we are sufficient of
ourselves, to account anything as from ourselves; but our564
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
sufficiency is from God; who also made us sufficient as minis-
ters of a new covenant; not of the letter, but of the spirit:
for the letter killeth, but the spirit giveth life.
Therefore seeing we have this ministry, even as we ob-
tained mercy, we faint not. For we preach not ourselves,
but Christ Jesus as Lord, and ourselves as your servants for
Jesus’ sake. Seeing it is God, that said, Light shall shine out
of darkness, who shined in our hearts, to give the light of
the knowledge of the glory of God in the face of Jesus
Christ.
/
But we have this treasure in earthen vessels, that the ex-
ceeding greatness of the power may be of God, and not
from ourselves; we are pressed on every side, yet not strait-
ened; perplexed, yet not unto despair; pursued, yet not for-
saken; smitten down, yet not destroyed; always bearing
about in the body the dying of Jesus, that the life also of
Jesus may be manifested in our body. For we who live are
always delivered unto death for Jesus’ sake, that the life
also of Jesus may be manifested in our mortal flesh. So then
death worketh in us, but life in you. But having the same
spirit of faith, according to that which is written, I believed,
and therefore
did I speak; we
also believe,
and
therefore
also we speak ;knowing that he that raised up the Lord Jesus
shall raise up us also with Jesus, and shall present us with
you. For all things are for your sakes, that the grace, being
multiplied through the many, may cause the thanksgiving to
abound unto the glory of God.
Wherefore we faint not; but though our outward man
is
decaying, yet our inward man is renewed day by day. For
our light affliction, which is for the moment, worketh for us
more and more exceedingly an eternal weight of glory; while
we look not at the things which are seen, but at the things
which are not seen: for the things which are seen are tem-
poral; but the things which are not seen are eternal.
For we know that if the earthly house of our tabernacle
be dissolved, we have a building from God, a house not made
with hands, eternal, in the heavens. Being therefore always
of good courage, and knowing that, whilst we are at home
in the body, we are absent from the Lord (for we walk by
faith, not by sight) ; we are of good courage, I say, and are
willing rather to be absent from the body, and to be atLETTERS’
TO
EARLY
CHRISTIANS
565
home with the Lord. Wherefore also we make it our aim,
whether at home or absent, to be well-pleasing unto him.
For we must all be made manifest before the judgment-seat
of Christ; that each one may receive the things done in the
body, according to what he hath done, whether it be good
or bad.
Knowing therefore the fear of the Lord, we persuade men,
but we are made manifest unto God; and I hope that we are
made manifest also in your consciences.
For the love of
Christ constraineth us; because we thus judge, that one died
for all, therefore all died; and he died for all, that they that
live should no longer live unto themselves, but unto him who
for their sakes died and rose again. Wherefore we hence-
forth know no man after the flesh: even though we have
known Christ after the flesh, yet now we know him so no
more. Wherefore if any man is in Christ, he is a new crea-
ture: the old things are passed away; behold, they are be-
come new. But all things are of God, who reconciled us to
himself through Christ, and gave unto us the ministry of
reconciliation ;to wit, that God was in Christ reconciling the
world unto himself, not reckoning unto them their tres-
passes, and having committed unto us the word of recon-
ciliation.
We are ambassadors therefore on behalf of Christ, as
though God were entreating by us: we beseech you on be-
half of Christ, be ye reconciled to God. Him who knew no
sin he made to be sin on our behalf; that we might become
the righteousness of God in him. And working together
with him we entreat also that ye receive not the grace of God
in vain (for he saith,
At an acceptable time I hearkened unto thee,
And in a day of salvation did I succor thee:
behold, now is the acceptable time; behold, now is the day
of salvation): giving no occasion of stumbling in anything,
that our ministration be not blamed; but in everything
commending ourselves, as ministers of God, in much pa-
tience, in afflictions, in necessities, in distresses, in stripes, in
imprisonments, in tumults, in labors, in watchings, in fast-
ings; in pureness, in knowledge, in longsuffering, in kindness,
in the Holy Spirit, in love unfeigned, in the word of truth,
in the power of God; by the armor of righteousness on the566
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
right hand and on the left, by glory and dishonor, by evil
report and good report; as deceivers, and yet true; as un-
known, and yet well known; as dying, and behold, we live;
as chastened, and not killed; as sorrowful, yet always re-
joicing; as poor, yet making many rich; as having nothing,
and yet possessing all things.
Our mouth is open unto you, O Corinthians, our heart is
enlarged. Great is my boldness of speech toward you, great
is my glorying on your behalf: I am filled with comfort, I
overflow with joy in all our affliction.
For even when we were come into Macedonia our flesh
had no relief, but we were afflicted on every side; without
were fightings, within were fears.
Nevertheless he that
comforteth the lowly, even God, comforted us by the coming
of Titus; and not by his coming only, but also by the com-
fort wherewith he was comforted in you, while he told us
your longing, your mourning, your zeal for me; so that I
rejoiced yet more. For though I made you sorry with my
epistle, I do not regret it: though I did regret it (for I see
that that epistle made you sorry, though but for a season),
I now rejoice, not that ye were made sorry, but that ye were
made sorry unto repentance; for ye were made sorry after
a godly sort, that ye might suffer loss by us in nothing. For
godly sorrow worketh repentance unto salvation, a repent-
ance which bringeth no regret: but the sorrow of the world
worketh death.
For behold, this selfsame thing, that ye
were made sorry after a godly sort, what earnest care it
wrought in you, yea what clearing of yourselves, yea what
indignation, yea what fear, yea what longing, yea what zeal,
yea what avenging!
In everything ye approved yourselves
to be pure in the matter. So although I wrote unto you, I
wrote not for his cause that did the wrong, nor for his
cause that suffered the wrong, but that your earnest care for
us might be made manifest unto you in the sight of God.
Therefore we have been comforted: and in our comfort we
joyed the more exceedingly for the joy of Titus, because his
spirit hath been refreshed by you all. For if in anything I
have gloried to him on your behalf, I was not put to shame;
but as we spake all things to you in truth, so our glorying
also which I made before Titus was found to be truth. And
his affection is more abundantly toward you, while he re-LETTERS
TO
EARLY
CHRISTIANS
= 567
mempereth the obedience of you all, how with fear and
trembling ye received him. I rejoice that in everything I am
of good courage concerning you.
For as touching the ministering to the saints, it is super-
fluous for me to write to you: for I know your readiness, of
which I glory on your behalf.
But this I say, He that soweth sparingly shall reap also
sparingly; and he that soweth bountifully shall reap also
bountifully.
Let each man do according as he hath pur-
posed in his heart: not grudgingly, or of necessity: for God
loveth a cheerful giver. And God is able to make all grace
abound unto you; that ye, having always all sufficiency in
everything, may abound unto every good work.
Would that ye could bear with me in a little foolishness:
but indeed ye do bear with me. For I am jealous over you
with a godly jealousy: for I espoused you to_one husband,
that I might present you as a pure virgin to Christ. But I
fear, lest by any means, as the serpent beguiled Eve in his
craftiness, your minds should be corrupted from the sim-
plicity and the purity that is toward Christ.
I say again, Let no man think me foolish; but if ye do,
yet as foolish receive me, that I also may glory a little. That
which I speak, I speak not after the Lord, but as in foolish-
ness, in this confidence of glorying. Yet whereinsoever any
is bold (I speak in foolishness), I am bold also. Are they
Hebrews? so am I. Are they Israelites? so am I. Are they
the seed of Abraham? so am I. Are they ministers of
Christ? (I speak as one beside himself) I more; in labors
more abundantly, in prisons more abundantly, in stripes
above measure, in deaths oft. Of the Jews five times re-
with
ceived I forty stripes save one. “Thrice was I beaten
night
rods, once was I stoned, thrice I suffered shipwreck, a
in
and a day have I been in the deep; in journeyings often,
coun-
perils of rivers, in perils of robbers, in perils from my
city, in
trymen, in perils from the Gentiles, in perils in the
among
perils
in
sea,
the
in
perils
in
wilderness,
the
in
perils
often, in
false brethren; in labor and travail, in watchings
nakedness.
and
cold
in
often,
fastings
in
thirst,
and
hunger
which
Besides those things that are without, there is that
Who
churches.
the
all
for
anxiety
daily,
me
upon
presseth
and I
is weak, and I am not weak? who is caused to stumble,568
' THE
NEW
“TESTAMENT
burn not? If I must needs glory, I will glory of the things
that concern my weakness.
The God and Father of the
Lord Jesus, he who is blessed for evermore knoweth that I
lie not. In Damascus the governor under Aretas the king
guarded the city of the Damascenes in order to take me: and
through a window was I let down in a basket by the wall,
and escaped his hands.
I must needs glory, though it is not expedient; but I will
come to visions and revelations of the Lord. I know a man
in Christ, fourteen years ago (whether in the body, I know
not; or whether out of the body, I know not; God knoweth),
such a one caught up even to the third heaven. And I know
such a man (whether in the body, or apart from the body,
I know not; God knoweth), how that he was caught up into
Paradise, and heard unspeakable words, which it is not law-
ful for a man to utter. On behalf of such a one will I glory:
but on mine own behalf I will not glory, save in my weak-
nesses. For if I should desire to glory, I shall not be foolish;
for I shall speak the truth: but I forbear, lest any man
should account of me above that which he seeth me to
be, or heareth from me. And by reason of the exceeding
greatness
of the revelations,
that I should
not
be exalted
overmuch, there was given to me a thorn in the flesh, a mes-
senger of Satan to buffet me, that I should not be exalted
overmuch. Concerning this thing I besought the Lord thrice,
that it might depart from me. And he hath said unto me,
My grace is sufficient for thee: for my power is made per-
fect In weakness. Most gladly therefore will I rather glory
in my weaknesses, that the power of Christ may rest upon
me. Wherefore I take pleasure in weaknesses, in injuries,
in necessities, in persecutions, in distresses, for Christ’s sake:
for when I am weak, then am I strong.
Ye think all this time that we are excusing ourselves unto
you.
In the sight of God speak we in Christ.
But all
things, beloved, are for your edifying. For I fear, lest by
any means, when I come, I should find you not such as I
would, and should myself be found of you such as ye would
not; lest by any means there should be strife, jealousy,
wraths, factions, backbitings, whisperings, swellings, tu-
mults; lest again when I come my God should humble meLETTERS
TO
EARLY
CHRISTIANS
569
before you, and I should mourn for many of them that have
sinned heretofore, and repented not.
For this cause I write these things while absent, that |
may not when present deal sharply, according to the author-
ity which the Lord gave me for building up, and not for
casting down.
Finally, brethren, farewell. Be perfected; be comforted;
be of the same mind; live in peace: and the God of love
and peace shall be with you.
Salute one another with a
holy kiss.
All the saints salute you.
TO
THE
GALATIANS
Paul, an apostle (not from men, neither through man,
but through Jesus Christ, and God the Father, who raised
him from the dead), and all the brethren that are with me,
unto the churches of Galatia.
I marvel that ye are so quickly removing from him that
called you in the grace of Christ unto a different gospel;
which is not another gospel: only there are some that trouble
you, and would pervert the gospel of Christ. But though
we, or an angel from heaven, should preach unto you any
gospel other than that which we preached unto you, let him
For am I now seeking the favor of men, or
be anathema.
if I were still
of God? or am I striving to please men?
pleasing men, I should not be a servant of Christ.
For I make known to you, brethren, as touching the gos-
pel which was preached by. me, that it is not after man.
For neither did I receive it from man, nor was I taught it,
but it came to me through revelation of Jesus Christ.
For I through the law died unto the law, that I might
live unto God.
I have been crucified with Christ; and it is
no longer I that live, but Christ liveth in me: and that life
which I now live in the flesh I live in faith, the faith which
for
is in the Son of God, who loved me, and gave himself up
me. I do not make void the grace of God: for if right-
eousness is through the law, then Christ died for nought.
whose
O foolish Galatians, who did bewitch you, before
only
This
ed?
crucifi
forth
set
openly
was
eyes Jesus Christ
the
would I learn from you, Received ye the Spirit byead
570
THE NEW TESTAMENT
works of the law, or by the hearing of faith? Are ye so
foolish? having begun in the Spirit, are ye now perfected in
the flesh? Did ye suffer so many things in vain? if it be
indeed in vain. He therefore that supplieth to you the Spirit,
works
and worketh miracles among you, doeth he it by the
of the law, or by the hearing of faith? Even as Abraham
believed God, and it was reckoned unto him for righteous-
ness. Know therefore that they that are of faith, the same
are sons of Abraham.
But before faith came, we were kept in ward under the
law, shut up unto the faith which should afterwards be
revealed. So that the law is become our tutor to bring us
unto Christ, that we might be justified by faith. But now
that faith is come, we are no longer under a tutor. For ye
are all sons of God, through faith, in Christ Jesus. For as
many of you as were baptized into Christ did put on Christ.
There can be neither Jew nor Greek,
there can be neither
bond nor free, there can be no male and female; for ye all
are one man in Christ Jesus. And if ye are Christ’s, then
are ye Abraham’s seed, heirs according to promise.
Howbeit at that time, not knowing Go4, ye were in bond-
age to them that by nature are no gods: but now that ye
have come to know God, or rather to be known by God, how
turn ye back again to the weak and beggarly rudiments,
whereunto ye desire to be in bondage over again? Ye ob-
serve days, and months, and seasons, and years. I am afraid
of you, lest by any means I have bestowed labor upon you
in vain.
I beseech you, brethren, become as I am, for I also am
become as ye are. Ye did me no wrong: but ye know that
because of an infirmity of the flesh I preached the gospel
unto you the first time: and that which was a temptation to
you in my flesh ye despised not, nor rejected ; but ye received
me as an angel of God, even as Christ Jesus. Where then
is that gratulation of yourselves? for I bear you witness,
that, if possible, ye would have plucked out your eyes and
given them to me. So then am I become your enemy, by
telling you the truth? They zealously seek you in no good
way; nay, they desire to shut you out, that ye may seek them.
But it is good to be zealously sought in a good matter at all
times, and not only when I am present with you.
My littleLETTERS
TO
EARLY
CHRISTIANS . 571
children, of whom I am again in travail until Christ be
formed in you—-but I could wish to be present with you now,
and to change my tone; for I am perplexed about you.
For freedom did Christ set us free: stand fast therefore,
and be not entangled again in a yoke of bondage.
Behold, I Paul say unto you, that, if ye receive circum-
cision, Christ will profit you nothing. Yea, I testify again
to every man that receiveth circumcision, that he is a debtor
to do the whole law. Ye are severed from Christ, ye who
would be justified by the law; ye are fallen away from grace.
For we through the Spirit by faith wait for the hope of
righteousness. For in Christ Jesus neither circumcision avyail-
eth anything, nor uncircumcision; but faith working through
love. Ye were running well; who hindered you that ye
should not obey the truth? ‘This persuasion came not of him
that calleth you. A little leaven leaveneth the whole lump.
I have confidence to you-ward in the Lord, that ye will be
none otherwise minded: but he that troubleth you shall bear
his judgment, whosoever he be.
For ye, brethren, were called for freedom; only use not
your freedom for an occasion to the flesh, but through love
be servants one to another. For the whole law is fulfilled in
one word, even in this: Thou shalt love thy neighbor as
thyself. But if ye bite and devour one another, take heed
that ye be not consumed one of another.
But I say, Walk by the Spirit, and ye shall not fulfil the
lust of the flesh. For the flesh lusteth against the Spirit, and
the Spirit against the flesh; for these are contrary the one to
the other; that ye may not do the things that ye would. But
if ye are led by the Spirit, ye are not under the law. Now
the works of the flesh are manifest, which are these: forni-
cation, uncleanness, lasciviousness, idolatry, sorcery, enmities,
strife, jealousies, wraths, factions, divisions, parties, envyings,
drunkenness, revellings, and such like; of which I forewarn
you, even as I did forewarn you, that they who practise such
things shall not inherit the kingdom of God. But the fruit
of the Spirit is love, joy, peace, longsuffering, kindness, good-
ness, faithfulness, meekness, self-control; against such there
is no law. And they that are of Christ Jesus have crucified
the flesh with the passions and the lusts thereof.
If we live by the Spirit, by the Spirit let us also walk.572
NEW
THE
TESTAMENT
Let us not become vainglorious, provoking one another, en-
vying one another.
Brethren, even if a man be overtaken in any trespass, ye
who are spiritual, restore such a one in a spirit of gentleness;
Bear ye one
looking to thyself, lest thou also be tempted.
For if a
Christ.
of
law
the
fulfil
so
and
burdens,
another’s
man thinketh himself to be something when he is nothing, he
deceiveth himself. But let each man prove his own work,
and then shall he have his glorying in regard of himself
alone, and not of his neighbor. For each man shall bear his
own burden.
But let him that is taught in the word communicate unto
him that teacheth in all good things. Be not deceived; God
is not mocked: for whatsoever a man soweth, that shall he
also reap. For he that soweth unto his own flesh shall of
the flesh reap corruption; but he that soweth unto the Spirit
shall of the Spirit reap eternal life. And let us not be weary
in well-doing: for in due season we shall reap, if we faint
So then, as we have opportunity, let us work that
not.
which is good toward all men, and especially toward them
that are of the household of the faith.
TO
THE
EPHESIANS
Paul, an apostle of Christ Jesus through the will of God,
to the saints that are at Ephesus, and the faithful in Christ
Jesus: Grace to you and peace from God our Father and
the Lord Jesus Christ.
Blessed be the God and Father of our Lord Jesus Christ,
who hath blessed us with every spiritual blessing in the heav-
enly places in Christ.
For this cause I also, having heard of the faith in the Lord
Jesus which is among you, and the love which ye show to-
ward all the saints, cease not to give thanks for you, making
mention of you in my prayers; that the God of our Lord
Jesus Christ, the Father of glory, may give unto you a spirit
of wisdom and revelation in the knowledge of him; having
the eyes of your heart enlightened, that ye may know what
is the hope of his calling, what the riches of the glory of his
inheritance in the saints, and what the exceeding greatness
of his power to us-ward who believe, according to that work-LETTERS
TO
EARLY
CHRISTIANS
573
‘ing of the strength of his might which he wrought in Christ,
when he raised him from the dead, and made him to sit at
his right hand in the heavenly places, far above all rule, and
authority, and power, and dominion, and every name that is
named, not only in this world, but also in that which is to
come: and he put all things in subjection under his feet, and
gave him to be head over all things to the church, which is
his body, the fulness of Aim that filleth all in all.
And you did he make alive, when ye were dead through
your trespasses and sins, wherein ye once walked according
to the course of this world, according to the prince of the
powers of the air, of the spirit that now worketh in the sons
of disobedience; among whom we also all once lived in the
lusts of our flesh, doing the desires of the flesh and of the
mind, and were by nature children of wrath, even as the rest:
—but God, being rich in mercy, for his great love wherewith
he loved us, even when we were dead through our trespasses,
made us alive together with Christ (by grace have ye been
with
saved), and raised us up with him, and made us to sit
ages
the
in
that
Jesus:
Christ
in
places,
heavenly
the
in
him
in
grace
his
of
riches
exceeding
the
to come he might show
ye been
have
grace
by
for
Jesus:
Christ
in
us
toward
kindness
gift
saved through faith; and that not of yourselves, it is the we
For
glory.
should
man
no
that
works,
of
not
of God;
works,
are his workmanship, created in Christ Jesus for good
in them.
walk
should
we
that
prepared
afore
God
which
but ye
So then ye are no more strangers and sojourners,
old of
househ
the
of
and
saints,
the
with
ens
-citiz
are fellow
apostles and
God, being built upon the foundation of the
stone;
corner
chief
the
being
f
himsel
Jesus
Christ
prophets,
grow-
er,
togeth
framed
fitly
in whom each several building,
are
also
ye
whom
in
Lord;
the
in
temple
holy
eth into a
Spirit.
the
in
God
of
builded together for a habitation
Father, from
For this cause I bow my knees unto the
, that he
named
is
earth
on
whom every family in heaven and
that ye
glory,
his
of
riches
the
to
ing
accord
would grant you,
in the
Spirit
his
gh
throu
may be strengthened with power
gh
throu
hearts
your
in
dwell
may
Christ
inward man; that
love,
in
ded
groun
and
faith; to the end that ye, being rooted
saints what is the
may be strong to apprehend with all the
the
and to know
breadth and length and height and depth,574
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
love of Christ which passeth knowledge, that ye may be filled -
unto all the fulness of God.
Now unto him that is able to do exceeding abundantly
above all that we ask or think, according to the power that
worketh in us, unto him be the glory in the church and in
Christ Jesus unto all generations for ever and ever. Amen.
I therefore, the prisoner in the Lord, beseech you to walk
worthily of the calling wherewith ye were called, with all
lowliness and meekness, with longsuffering, forbearing one
another in love; giving diligence to keep the unity of the
Spirit in the bond of peace.
“There is one body, and one
Spirit, even as also ye were called in one hope of your call-
ing; one Lord, one faith, one baptism, one God and Father of
all, who is over all, and through all, and in all. But unto each
one of us was the grace given according to the measure of
the gift of Christ. And he gave some to be apostles; and
some, prophets; and some, evangelists; and some, pastors and
teachers; for the perfecting of the saints, unto the work of
ministering, unto the building up of the body of Christ: till
we all attain unto the unity of the faith, and of the knowl-
edge of the Son of God, unto a fullgrown man, unto the
measure of the stature of the fulness of Christ: that we may
be no longer children, tossed to and fro and carried about
with every wind of doctrine, by the sleight of men, in crafti-
ness, after the wiles of error; but speaking truth in love,
may grow up in all things into him, who is the head, even
Christ; from whom all the body fitly framed and knit to-
gether through that which every joint supplieth, according
to the working in due measure of each several part, maketh
the increase of the body unto the building up of itself in love.
Wherefore, putting away falsehood, speak ye truth each
one with his neighbor: for we are members one of another.
Be ye angry, and sin not: let not the sun go down upon your
wrath: neither give place to the devil. Let him that stole
steal no more: but rather let him labor, working with his
hands the thing that is good, that he may have whereof to
give to him that hath need. Let no corrupt speech proceed
out of your mouth, but such as is good for edifying as the
need may be, that it may give grace to them that hear. And
grieve not the Holy Spirit of God, in whom ye were sealed
unto the day of redemption, Let all bitterness, and wrath,TO
LETTERS
EARLY
CHRISTIANS
575
and anger, and clamor, and railing, be put away from you,
with all malice: and be ye kind one to another, tenderhearted,
forgiving each other, even as God also in Christ forgave you.
Be ye therefore imitators of God, as beloved children; and
walk in love, even as Christ also loved you, and gave himself
up for us, an offering and a sacrifice to God for an odor of a
sweet smell,
Finally, be strong in the Lord, and in the strength of his
might. Put on the whole armor of God, that ye may be
able to stand against the wiles of the devil. For our wrest-
ling is not against flesh and blood, but against the principali-
ties, against the powers, against the world-rulers of this dark-
ness, against the spiritual hosts of wickedness in the heavenly
places. Wherefore take up the whole armor of God, that ye
may be able to withstand in the evil day, and having done
all, to stand. Stand therefore, having girded your loins with
truth, and having put on the breastplate of righteousness,
and having shod your feet with the preparation of the gospel
of peace; withal taking up the shield of faith, wherewith ye
shall be able to quench all the fiery darts of the evil one. And
Spirit,
take the helmet of salvation, and the sword of the
n
supplicatio
and
prayer
all
with
which is the word of God:
thereunto
watching
and
Spirit,
the
in
seasons
all
at
praying
and on
in all perseverance and supplication for all the saints,
opening
in
me
unto
given
be
may
utterance
that
my behalf,
of the
my mouth, to make known with boldness the mystery
that in it I
chains;
in
ambassador
an
am
I
which
for
gospel,
may speak boldly, as I ought to speak.
TO
THE
PHILIPPIANS
to all the
Paul and Timothy, servants of Christ Jesus,
the bishops
with
pi,
Philip
at
are
that
Jesus
saints in Christ
God our Father
and deacons: Grace to you and peace from
.
Christ
Jesus
and the Lord
of you, always
I thank my God upon all my remembrance
all making my
you
of
f
behal
on
mine
of
on
icati
in every suppl
furtherance of
in
wship
fello
supplication with joy, for your
confident of
being
now;
until
day
first
the
the gospel from
in you will
work
good
a
this very thing, that he who began
it 1s right
as
even
t:
Chris
Jesus
of
day
the
perfect it until576
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
for me to be thus minded on behalf of you all, because I have
you in my heart, inasmuch as, both in my bonds and in the
defence and confirmation of the gospel, ye all are partakers
with me of grace. For God is my witness, how I long after
you all in the tender mercies of Christ Jesus. And this I
pray, that your love may abound yet more and more in
knowledge and all discernment; so that ye may approve the
things that are excellent; that ye may be sincere and void of
offence unto the day of Christ; being filled with the fruits
of righteousness, which are through Jesus Christ, unto the
glory and praise of God.
Now I would have you know, brethren, that the things
which happened unto me have fallen out rather unto the
progress of the gospel; so that my bonds became manifest in
Christ throughout the whole pretorian guard, and to all the
rest; and that most of the brethren in the Lord, being confi-
dent through my bonds, are more abundantly bold to speak
the word of God without fear. Some indeed preach Christ
even of envy and strife; and some also of good will: the one
do it of love, knowing that I am set for the defence of the
gospel; but the other proclaim Christ of faction, not sin-
cerely, thinking to raise up affliction for me in my bonds.
What then? only that in every way, whether in pretence or
in truth, Christ is proclaimed; and therein I rejoice, yea, and
will rejoice. For I know that this shall turn out to my sal-
vation, through your supplication and the supply of the Spirit
of Jesus Christ, according to my earnest expectation and
hope, that in nothing shall I be put to shame, but that with
all boldness, as always, so now also Christ shall be magni-
fied in my body, whether by life, or by death. For to me to
live is Christ, and to die is gain. But if to live in the flesh,
—if this shall bring fruit from my work, then what I shall
choose I know not. But I am in a strait betwixt the two,
having the desire to depart and be with Christ; for it is very
far better: yet to abide in the flesh is more needful for your
sake. And having this confidence, I know that I shall abide,
yea, and abide with you all, for your progress and joy in the
faith; that your glorying may abound in Christ Jesus in me
through my presence with you again. Only let your man-
ner of life be worthy of the gospel of Christ: that, whether
I come and see you or be absent, I may hear of your state,LETTERS
TO
EARLY
CHRISTIANS
= 577
that ye stand fast in one spirit, with one soul striving for the
faith of the gospel; and in nothing affrighted by the adver-
saries: which is for them an evident token of perdition, but
of your salvation, and that from God ; because to you it hath
been granted in the behalf of Christ, not only to believe on
him, but also to suffer in his behalf: having the same conflict
which ye saw in me, and now hear to be in me.
If there is therefore any exhortation in Christ, if any con-
solation of love, if any fellowship of the Spirit, if any tender
mercies and compassions, make full my joy, that ye be of the
same mind, having the same love, being of one accord, of one
mind; doing nothing through faction or through vainglory,
but in lowliness of mind each counting other better than
himself; not looking each of you to his own things, but each
of you also to the things of others. Have this mind in you,
which was also in Christ Jesus: who, existing in the form of
God, counted not the being on an equality with God a thing
to be grasped, but emptied himself, taking the form of a
servant, being made in the likeness of men; and being found
in fashion as a man, he humbled himself, becoming obedient
even unto death, yea, the death of the cross. Wherefore also
God highly exalted him, and gave unto him the name which
is above every name; that in the name of Jesus every knee
should bow, of things in heaven and things on earth and
things under the earth, and that every tongue should confess
that Jesus Christ is Lord, to the glory of God the Father.
So then, my beloved, even as ye have always obeyed, not as
in my presence only, but now much more in my absence,
work out your own salvation with fear and trembling; for it
s God who worketh in you both to will and to work, for
his good pleasure. Do all things without murmurings and
questionings: that ye may become blameless and harmless,
children of God without blemish in the midst of a crooked
and perverse generation, among whom ye are seen as lights
in the world, holding forth the word of life; that I may have
whereof to glory in the day of Christ, that I did not run in
vain neither labor in vain. Yea, and if I am offered upon
with
the sacrifice and service of your faith, I joy, and rejoice
rejoice
and
joy,
also
ye
do
you all: and in the same manner
]
with me.
If any other man
thinketh to have confidence in the flesh,578
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
I yet more: circumcised the eighth day, of the stock of Israel,
of the tribe of Benjamin, a Hebrew of Hebrews; as touching
the law, a Pharisee ; as touching zeal, persecuting the church;
as touching the righteousness which is in the law, found
blameless. Howbeit what things were gain to me, these have
I counted loss for Christ. Yea verily, and I count all things
to be loss for the excellency of the knowledge of Christ Jesus
my Lord: for whom I suffered the loss of all things, and do
count them but refuse, that I may gain Christ, and be found
in him, not having a righteousness of mine own, even that
which is of the law, but that which is through faith in Christ,
the righteousness which is from God by faith: that I may
know him, and the power of his resurrection, and the fellow-
ship of his sufferings, becoming conformed unto his death;
if by any means I may attain unto the resurrection from the
dead. Not that I have already obtained, or am already made
perfect: but I press on, if so be that I may lay hold on that
for which also I was laid hold on .by Christ Jesus. Breth-
ren, I count not myself yet to have laid hold: but one thing
I do, forgetting the things which are behind, and stretching
forward to the things which are before, I press on toward
the goal unto the prize of the high calling of God in Christ
Jesus. Let us therefore, as many as are perfect, be thus
minded: and if in anything ye are otherwise minded, this also
shall God reveal unto you: only, whereunto we have at-
tained, by that same rule let us walk.
Rejoice in the Lord always: again I will say, Rejoice.
Let your forbearance be known unto all men. The Lord is
at hand. In nothing be anxious; but in everything by prayer
and supplication with thanksgiving let your requests be made
known unto God. And the peace of God, which passeth all
understanding, shall guard your hearts and your thoughts in
Christ Jesus.
Finally, brethren, whatsoever things are true, whatsoever
things are honorable, whatsoever things are just, whatsoever
things are pure, whatsoever things are lovely, whatsoever
things are of good report; if there be any virtue, and if there
be any praise, think on these things. ‘The things which ye
both learned and received and heard and saw in me, these
things do: and the God of peace shall be with you.
But I rejoice in the Lord greatly, that now at length yeLETTERS
TO
EARLY
CHRISTIANS
579
have revived your thought for me; wherein ye did indeed
take thought, but ye lacked opportunity. Not that I speak
in respect of want: for I have learned, in whatsoever state I
am, therein to be content. I know how to be abased, and I
know also how to abound: in everything and in all things
have I learned the secret both to be filled and to be hungry,
both to abound and to be in want.
I can do all things in
him that strengtheneth me.
TO
THE
COLOSSIANS
Paul, an apostle of Christ Jesus through the will of God,
and Timothy our brother, to the saints and faithful brethren
in Christ that are at Colosse: Grace to you and peace from
God our Father.
We give thanks to God the Father of our Lord Jesus
Christ, praying always for you, having heard of your faith
in Christ Jesus, and of the love which ye have toward all
the saints, because of the hope which is laid up for you in the
heavens, whereof ye heard before in the word of the truth
of the gospel, which is come unto you; even as it is also in
all the world bearing fruit and increasing, as it doth in you
also, since the day we heard and knew the grace of God in
truth.
As therefore ye received Christ Jesus the Lord, so walk
in him, rooted and builded up in him, and established in
your faith, even as ye were taught abounding in thanksgiving.
Take heed lest there shall be any one that maketh spoil of
you through his philosophy and vain deceit, after the tradi-
tion of men, after the rudiments of the world, and not after
Christ: for in him dwelleth all the fulness of the Godhead
bodily, and in him ye are made full, who is the head of all
principality and power.
If then ye were raised together with Christ, seek the things
that are above, where Christ is, seated on the right hand of
God. Set your mind on the things that are above, not on the
things that are upon the earth. For ye died, and your life is
hid with Christ in God. When Christ, who is our life, shall
be manifested, then shall ye also with him be manifested in
glory.
Put to death therefore your members which are upon the580
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
earth: fornication, uncleanness, passion, evil desire, and coy-
etousness, which is idolatry; for which things’ sake cometh
the wrath of God upon the sons of disobedience: wherein ye
also once walked, when ye lived in these things; but now do
ye also put them all away: anger, wrath, malice, railing,
shameful speaking out of your mouth: lie not one to another;
seeing that ye have put off the old man with his doings, and
have put on the new man, that is being renewed unto knowl-
edge after the image of him that created him: where there
cannot be Greek and Jew, circumcision and uncircumcision,
barbarian, Scythian, bondman, freeman; but Christ is all,
and in all.
- Put on therefore, as God’s elect, holy and beloved, a heart
of compassion, kindness, lowliness, meekness, longsuffering;
forbearing one another, and forgiving each other, if any man
have a complaint against any; even as the Lord forgave you,
so also do ye: and above all these things put on love, which is
the bond of perfectness. And let the peace of Christ rule in
your hearts, to the which also ye were called in one body;
and be ye thankful. Let the word of Christ dwell in you
richly; in all wisdom teaching and admonishing one another
with psalms and hymns and spiritual songs, singing with
grace in your hearts unto God. And whatsoever ye do, in
word or in deed, do all in the name of the Lord Jesus, giv-
ing thanks to God the Father through him.
Wives, be in subjection to your husbands, as is fitting in
the Lord.
Husbands, love your wives, and be not bitter
against them. Children, obey your parents in all things, for
this is well-pleasing in the Lord. Fathers, provoke not your
children, that they be not discouraged. Servants, obey in all
things them that are your masters according to the flesh; not
with eye-service, as men-pleasers, but in singleness of heart,
fearing the Lord: whatsoever ye do, work heartily, as unto
the Lord, and not unto men; knowing that from the Lord ye
shall receive the recompense of the inheritance: ye serve the
Lord Christ. For he that doeth wrong shall receive again
for the wrong that he hath done: and there is no respect of
persons. Masters, render unto your servants that which is
just and equal; knowing that ye also have a Master in
heaven.
Continue stedfastly in prayer, watching therein withLETTERS
TO
EARLY;
CHRISTIANS
581
thanksgiving; withal praying for us also, that God may open
unto us a door for the word, to speak the mystery of Christ,
for which I am also in bonds; that I may make it manifest, as
I ought to speak. Walk in wisdom toward them that are
without, redeeming the time. Let your speech be always
with grace, seasoned with salt, that ye may know how ye
ought to answer each one.
TO
THE
THESSALONIANS
Paul, and Silvanus, and Timothy, unto the church of the
Thessalonians in God the Father and the Lord Jesus Christ:
Grace to you and peace.
We give thanks to God always for you all, making men-
tion of you in our prayers; remembering without ceasing
your work of faith and labor of love and patience of hope in
our Lord Jesus Christ, before our God and Father. For
this cause, brethren, we were comforted over you in all our
distress and affliction through your faith: for now we live, if
ye stand fast in the Lord. For what thanksgiving can we
render again unto God for you, for all the joy wherewith we
joy for your sakes before our God; night and day praying
exceedingly that we may see your face, and may perfect that
which is lacking in your faith?
Now may our God and Father himself, and our Lord
Jesus, direct our way unto you: and the Lord make you to
increase and abound in love one toward another, and toward
all men, even as we also do toward you; to the end he may
establish your hearts unblamable in holiness before our God
and Father, at the coming of our Lord Jesus with all his
saints.
Finally then, brethren, we beseech and exhort you in the
Lord Jesus, that, as ye received of us how ye ought to walk
and to please God, even as ye do walk,—that ye abound
more and more.
But concerning love of the brethren ye have no need that
one write unto you: for ye yourselves are taught of God to
love one another; for indeed ye do it toward all the brethren
But we exhort you, brethren,
that are in all Macedonia.
that ye abound more and more; and that ye study to be quiet,
and to do your own business, and to work with your hands,582
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
even as we charged you; that ye may walk becomingly to-
ward them that are without, and may have need of nothing.
But we would not have you ignorant, brethren, concern-
ing them that fall asleep; that ye sorrow not, even as the
rest, who have no hope. For if we believe that Jesus died
and rose again, even so them also that are fallen asleep in
Jesus will God bring with him. For this we say unto you
by the word of the Lord, that we that are alive, that are left
unto the coming of the Lord, shall in no wise precede them
that are fallen asleep. For the Lord himself shall descend
from heaven, with a shout, with the voice of the archangel,
and with the trump of God: and the dead in Christ shall
rise first; then we that are alive, that are left, shall together
with them be caught up in the clouds, to meet the Lord in
the air: and so shall we ever be with the Lord. Wherefore
comfort one another with these words.
But we beseech you, brethren, to know them that labor
among you, and are over you in the Lord, and admonish you;
and to esteem them exceeding highly in love for their work’s
sake. Be at peace among yourselves. And we exhort you,
brethren, admonish the disorderly, encourage the faint-heart-
ed, support the weak, be longsuffering toward all. See that
none render unto any one evil for evil; but always follow
after that which is good, one toward another, and toward all.
Rejoice always; pray without ceasing; in everything give
thanks: for this is the will of God in Christ Jesus to you-
Quench not the Spirit; despise not prophesyings;
ward.
prove all things; hold fast that which is good; abstain from
every form of evil.
TO
TIMOTHY
Paul, an apostle of Christ Jesus according to the com-
mandment of God our Saviour, and Christ Jesus our hope;
unto Timothy, my true child in faith: Grace, mercy, peace,
from God the Father and Christ Jesus our Lord.
I thank him that enabled me, even Christ Jesus our Lord,
for that he counted me faithful, appointing me to his service;
though I was before a blasphemer, and a persecutor, and
injurious: howbeit I obtained mercy, because I did it igno-
rantly in unbelief; and the grace of our Lord abounded ex-
ceedingly with faith and love which is in Christ Jesus.LETTERS
TO
EARLY:CHRISTIANS
583
Faithful is the saying, and worthy of all acceptation, that
Christ Jesus came into the world to save sinners; of whom I
am chief: howbeit for this cause I obtained mercy, that in me
as chief might Jesus Christ show forth all his longsuffering,
for an ensample of them that should thereafter believe on him
unto eternal life.
This charge I commit unto thee, my child Timothy, ac-
cording to the prophecies which led the way to thee, that by
them thou mayest war the good warfare; holding faith and
a good conscience; which some having thrust from them
made shipwreck concerning the faith.
Faithful is the saying, If a man
seeketh the office of a
bishop, he desireth a good work. The bishop therefore must
be without reproach, the husband of one wife, temperate,:
sober-minded, orderly, given to hospitality, apt to teach; no
brawler, no striker; but gentle, not contentious, no lover of
money; one that ruleth well his own house, having his chil-
dren in subjection with all gravity; (but if a man knoweth
not how to rule his own house, how shall he take care of the
church of God?) not a novice, lest being puffed up he fall
into the condemnation of the devil. Moreover he must have
good testimony from them that are without; lest he fall into
reproach ana the snare of the devil. Deacons in like manner
must be grave, not double-tongued, not given to much wine,
not greedy of filthy lucre; holding the mystery of the faith in
a pure conscience. And let these also first be proved; then
let them serve as deacons, if they be blameless.
If thou put the brethren in mind of these things, thou shalt
be a good minister of Christ Jesus, nourished in the words of
the faith, and of the good doctrine which thou hast followed
until now: but refuse profane and old wives’ fables. And
exercise thyself unto godliness: for bodily exercise is profit-
able for a little; but godliness is profitable for all things,
having promise of the life which now is, and of that which is
to come.
For to this end we labor and strive, because we
have our hope set on the living God, who is the Saviour of
all men, specially of them that believe. ‘These things com-
mand and teach. Let no man despise thy youth; but be thou
an ensample to them that believe, in word, in manner of life,
in love, in faith, in purity. ‘Till I come, give heed to reading,
to exhortation, to teaching. Neglect not the gift that is in584
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
thee, which was given thee by prophecy, with the laying on
of the hands of the presbytery. Be diligent in these things;
give thyself wholly to them; that thy progress may be mani-
fest unto all. Take heed to thyself, and to thy teaching.
Continue in these things; for in doing this thou shalt save
both thyself and them that hear thee.
If any man teacheth a different doctrine, and consenteth
not to sound words, even the words of our Lord Jesus Christ,
and to the doctrine which is according to godliness; he is
puffed up, knowing nothing, but doting about questionings
and disputes of words, whereof cometh envy, strife, railings,
evil surmisings, wranglings of men corrupted in mind and
bereft of the truth, supposing that godliness is a way of gain.
But godliness with contentment is great gain: for we brought
nothing into the world, for neither can we carry anything
out; but having food and covering we shall be therewith con-
tent. But they that are minded to be rich fall into a temp-
tation and a snare and many foolish and hurtful lusts, such
as drown men in destruction and perdition. For the love of
money is a root of all kinds of evil: which some reaching
after have been led astray from the faith, and have pierced
themselves through with many sorrows.
But thou, O man of God, flee these things; and follow
after righteousness, godliness, faith, love, patience, meekness.
Fight the good fight of the faith, lay hold on the life eternal,
whereunto thou wast called, and didst confess the good con-
fession in the sight of many witnesses.
Charge them that are rich in this present world, that they
be not highminded, nor have their hope set on the uncertainty
of riches, but on God, who giveth us richly all things to
enjoy; that they do good, that they be rich in good works,
that they be ready to distribute, willing to communicate;
laying up in store for themselves a good foundation against
the time to come, that they may lay hold on the life which is
life indeed.
O Timothy, guard that which is committed unto thee.
turning away from the profane babblings and oppositions of
the knowledge which is falsely so called; which some profess-
ing have erred concerning the faith.
I thank God, whom I serve from my forefathers in a pureLETTERS
TO
EARLY
CHRISTIANS
585
conscience, how unceasing is my remembrance of thee in my
supplications, night and day longing to see thee, remembering
thy tears, that I may be filled with joy; having been re-
minded of the unfeigned faith that is in thee; which dwelt
first in thy grandmother Lois, and thy mother Eunice; and,
I am persuaded, in thee also. For which cause I put thee in
remembrance that thou stir up the gift of God, which is in
thee through the laying on of my hands. For God gave us
not a spirit of fearfulness; but of power and love and dis-
cipline. Be not ashamed therefore of the testimony of our
Lord, nor of me his prisoner: but suffer hardship with the
gospel according to the power of God; who saved us, and
called us with a holy calling, not according to our works,
but according to his own purpose and grace, which was given
us in Christ Jesus before times eternal, but hath now been
manifested by the appearing of our Saviour Christ Jesus,
who abolished death, and brought life and immortality to
light through the gospel, whereunto I was appointed a
For which cause
preacher, and an apostle, and a teacher.
I suffer also these things: yet I am not ashamed; for I know
him whom I have believed, and I am persuaded that he is
able to guard that which I have committed unto him against
that day. Hold the pattern of sound words which thou hast
heard from me, in faith and love which is in Christ Jesus.
That good thing which was committed unto thee guard
through the Holy Spirit which dwelleth in us.
Thou therefore, my child, be strengthened in the grace
that is in Christ Jesus. And the things which thou hast
heard from me among many witnesses, the same commit
thou to faithful men, who shall be able to teach others also.
Of these things put them in remembrance, charging them
in the sight of the Lord, that they strive not about words, to
no profit, to the subverting of them that hear. Give dili-
gence to present thyself approved unto God, a workman that
needeth not to be ashamed, handling aright the word of
truth. But flee youthful lusts, and follow after righteous-
ness, faith, love, peace, with them that call on the Lord out
of a pure heart. But foolish and ignorant questionings re-
fuse, knowing that they gender strifes. And the Lord’s ser-
vant must not strive, but be gentle towards all, apt to teach,
them-
forbearing, in meekness correcting them that oppose586
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
selves; if peradventure God may give them repentance unto
the knowledge of the truth, and they may recover themselves
out of the snare of the devil, having been taken captive by
him unto his will.
But know this, that in the last days grievous times shall
come.
For men shall be lovers of self, lovers of money,
boastful, haughty, railers, disobedient to parents, unthankful,
unholy, without natural affection, implacable, slanderers,
without self-control, fierce, no lovers of good, traitors, head-
strong, puffed up, lovers of pleasure rather than lovers of
God; holding a form of godliness, but having denied the
power thereof: from these also turn away.
Evil men and
imposters shall wax worse and worse, deceiving and being
deceived.
But abide thou in the things which thou hast
learned and hast been assured of, knowing of whom
thou
hast learned them; and that from a babe thou hast known
the sacred writings which are able to make thee wise unto
salvation through faith which is in Christ Jesus. Every
scripture inspired of God is also profitable for teaching, for
reproof, for correction, for instruction which is in righteous-
ness: that the man of God may be complete, furnished com-
pletely unto every good work.
I charge thee in the sight of God, and of Christ Jesus,
who shall judge the living and the dead, and by his appearing
and his kingdom: preach the word; be urgent in season, out
of season; reprove, rebuke, exhort, with all longsuffering and
teaching. For the time will come when they will not endure
the sound doctrine; but, having itching ears, will heap to
themselves teachers after their own lusts; and will turn
away their ears from the truth, and turn aside unto fables.
But be thou sober in all things, suffer hardship, do the work
of an evangelist, fulfil thy ministry. For I am already being
offered, and the time of my departure is come. I have fought
the good fight, I have finished the course, I have kept the
faith: henceforth there is laid up for me the crown of right-
eousness, which the Lord, the righteous judge, shall give to
me at that day; and not to me only, but also to all them that
have loved his appearing.LETTERS
TO
EARLY
CHRISTIANS
SELECTIONS FROM OTHER
TESTAMENT°EPISTLES
AN
EPISTLE
TO
THE
= 587
NEW
HEBREWS
God} having of old time spoken unto the fathers in the
prophets by divers portions and in divers manners, hath at
the end of these days spoken unto us in his Son, whom he
appointed heir of all things, through whom also he made the
worlds; who being the effulgence of his glory, and the very
image of his substance, and upholding all things by the word
of his power, when he had made purification of sins, sat
down on the right hand of the Majesty on high; having
become by so much better than the angels, as he hath in-
herited a more excellent name than they.
Therefore we ought to give the more earnest heed to the
things that were heard, lest haply we drift away from them.
For if the word spoken through angels proved stedfast, and
every transgression and disobedience received a just recom-
pense of reward ;how shall we escape, if we neglect so great
4 salvation? which having at the first been spoken through
the Lord, was confirmed unto us by them that heard; God
also bearing witness with them, both by signs and wonders,
and by manifold powers, and by gifts of the Holy Spirit,
according to his own will. For the word of God is living,
and active, and sharper than any two-edged sword, and pierc-
ing even to the dividing of soul and spirit, of both joints and
the
marrow, and quick to discern the thoughts and intents of
his
in
manifest
not
is
that
creature
no
is
heart. And there
eyes
sight: but all things are naked and laid open before the
of him with whom we have to do.
h
Having then a great high priest, who hath passed throug
con-
our
fast
hold
us
let
God,
of
Son
the heavens, Jesus the
be touched
fession. For we have not a high priest that cannot
been in
hath
that
one
but
ties;
with the feeling of our infirmi
Let us
sin.
t
withou
yet
are,
we
as
like
d
tempte
points
all
grace,
of
throne
the
unto
s
boldnes
therefore draw near with
us in
help
to
grace
find
may
and
mercy,
receive
may
that we
time of need.
conviction
Now faith is assurance of things hoped for, a588
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
of things not seen. For therein the elders had witness borne
to them. By faith we understand that the worlds have been
framed by the word of God, so that what is seen hath not
been made out of things which appear.
By faith Abel of-
fered unto God a more excellent sacrifice than Cain, through
which he had witness borne to him that he was righteous,
God bearing witness in respect of his gifts: and through it
he being dead yet speaketh. By faith Enoch was translated
that he should not see death; and he was not found, because
God translated him: for he hath had witness borne to him
that before his translation he had been well-pleasing unto
God: and without faith it is impossible to be well-pleasing
unto him; for he that cometh to God must believe that he is,
and that he is a rewarder of them that seek after him. By
faith Noah, being warned of God concerning things not seen
as yet, moved with godly fear, prepared an ark to the saving
of his house; through which he condemned the world, and
became heir of the righteousness which is according to faith.
By faith Abraham, when he was called, obeyed to go out
unto a place which he was to receive for an inheritance; and
he went out, not knowing whither he went. By faith he be-
came a sojourner in the land of promise, as in a land not his
own, dwelling in tents, with Isaac and Jacob, the heirs with
him of the same promise: for he looked for the city which
hath the foundations, whose builder and maker is God. By
faith even Sarah herself received power to conceive seed
when she was past age, since she counted him faithful who
had promised: wherefore also there sprang of one, and him
as good as dead, so many as the stars of heaven in multitude,
and as the sand, which is by the sea-shore, innumerable.
These all died in faith, not having received the promises,
but having seen them and greeted them from afar, and hay-
ing confessed that they were strangers and pilgrims on the
earth. For they that say such things make it manifest that
they are seeking after a country of their own. And if indeed
they had been mindful of that country from which they went
out, they would have had opportunity to return. But now
they desire a better country, that is, a heavenly: wherefore
God is not ashamed of them, to be called their God; for he
hath prepared for them a city.
By faith Abraham, being tried, offered up Isaac: yea, heLETTERS
TO
EARLY
CHRISTIANS
— 589
that had gladly received the promises was offering up his
only begotten scn; even he to whom it was said, In Isaac
shall thy seed be called: accounting that God is able to raise
up, even from the dead; from whence he did also in a figure
receive him back. By faith Isaac blessed Jacob and Esau,
even concerning things to come.
By faith Jacob, when he
was dying, blessed each of the sons of Joseph; and wor-
shipped, leaning upon the top of his staff. By faith Joseph,
when his end was nigh, made mention of the departure of
the children of Israel; and gave commandment concerning
his bones.
By faith Moses, when he was born, was hid
three months by his parents, because they saw he was a
goodly child; and they were not afraid of the king’s com-
mandment.
By faith Moses, when he was grown up, re-
fused to be called the son of Pharaoh’s daughter; choosing
rather to share ill treatment with the people of God, than to
enjoy the pleasures of sin for a season; accounting the re-
proach of Christ greater riches than the treasures of Egypt:
for he looked unto the recompense of reward. By faith he
forsook Egypt, not fearing the wrath of the king: for he en-
dured, as seeing him who is invisible. By faith he kept the
passover, and the sprinkling of the blood, that the destroyer
of the first-born should not touch them. By faith they passed
through the Red Sea as by dry land: which the Egyptians
assaying to do were swallowed up. By faith the walls of
Jericho fell down, after they had been compassed about for
seven days. By faith Rahab the harlot perished not with
them that were disobedient, having received the spies with
peace.
And what shall I more say? for the time will fail me if I
tell of Gideon, Barak, Samson, Jephthah; of David and
Samuel and the prophets: who through faith subdued king-
doms, wrought righteousness, obtained promises, stopped the
mouths of lions, quenched the power of fire, escaped the edge
of the sword, from weakness were made strong, waxed
mighty in war, turned. to flight armies of aliens. Women
received their dead by a resurrection: and others were tor-
tured, not accepting their deliverance; that they might ob-
tain a better resurrection: and others had trial of mockings
and scourgings, yea, moreover of bonds and imprisonment:
they were stoned, they were sawn asunder, they were tempt-590
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
ed, they were slain with the sword: they went about in
sheepskins, in goatskins; being destitute, afflicted, ill-treated
(of whom the world was not worthy), wandering in deserts
and mountains and caves, and the holes of the earth. And
these all, having had witness borne to them through their
faith, received not the promise, God having provided some
better thing concerning us, that apart from us they should
not be made perfect.
Therefore let us also, seeing we are compassed about with
so great a cloud of witnesses, lay aside every weight, and the
sin which doth so easily beset us, and let us run with patience
the race that is set before us, looking unto Jesus the author
and perfecter of our faith, who for the joy that was set be-
fore him endured the cross, despising shame, and hath sat
down at the right hand of the throne of God. For consider
him that hath endured such gainsaying of sinners against
himself, that ye wax not weary, fainting in your souls. Ye
have not yet resisted unto blood, striving against sin; and ye
have forgotten the exhortation which reasoneth with you as
with sons,
My son, regard not lightly the chastening of the Lord,
Nor faint when thou art reproved of him;
For whom the Lord loveth he chasteneth,
And scourgeth every son whom he receiveth.
It is for chastening that ye endure; God dealeth with you
as with sons; for what son is there whom his father chasten-
eth not? But if ye are without chastening, whereof all have
been made partakers, then are ye bastards, and not sons.
Furthermore, we had the fathers of our flesh to chasten us,
and we gave them reverence: shall we not much rather be in
subjection unto the Father of spirits, and live?
For they.
indeed for a few days chastened us as seemed good to them;
but he for our profit, that we may be partakers of his holi-
ness. All chastening seemeth for the present to be not joyous
but grievous; yet afterward it yieldeth peaceable fruit unto
them that have been exercised thereby, even the fruit of
righteousness. Wherefore lift up the hands that hang down,
and the palsied knees; and make straight paths for your feet,
that that which is lame be not turned out of the way, but
rather be healed.
Let love of the brethren continue.
Forget not to showLETTERS
TO
EARLY
CHRISTIANS
591
love unto strangers: for thereby some have entertained an-
gels unawares. Remember them that are in bonds, as bound
with them; them that are ill-treated, as being yourselves also
in the body. Let marriage be had in honor among all. Be
ye free from the love of money; content with such things as
ye have: for himself hath said, I will in no wise fail thee,
neither will I in any wise forsake thee.
Remember them that had the rule over you, men that
spake unto you the word of God; and considering the issue
of their life, imitate their faith. Jesus Christ is the same
yesterday and to-day, yea and for ever.
ow the God of peace, who brought again from the dead
the great shepherd of the sheep with the blood of an eternal
covenant, even our Lord Jesus, make you perfect in every
good thing to do his will, working in us that which is well-
pleasing in his sight, through Jesus Christ; to whom be the
glory for evet and ever. Amen.
THE
EPISTLE
OF
JAMES
James, a servant of God and of the Lord Jesus Christ, to
the twelve tribes which are of the Dispersion, greeting.
Count it all joy, my brethren, when ye fall into manifold
temptations; knowing that the proving of your faith work-
eth patience. And let patience have its perfect work, that
ye may be perfect and entire, lacking in nothing.
But if any of you lacketh wisdom, let him ask of God,
who giveth to all liberally and upbraideth not; and it shall
be given him. But let him ask in faith, nothing doubting:
for he that doubteth is like the surge of the sea driven by the
wind and tossed. For let not that man think that he shall
receive anything of the Lord; a doubleminded man, unstable
in all his ways.
Blessed is the man that endureth temptation; for when he
hath been approved, he shall receive the crown of life, which
the Lord promised to them that love him. Let no man say
when he is tempted, I am tempted of God; for God cannot
be tempted with evil, and he himself tempteth no man: but
each man is tempted, when he is drawn away by his own
lust, and enticed. Then the lust, when it hath conceived,
beareth sin: and the sin, when it is fullgrown, bringeth forth592
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
death. Be not deceived, my beloved brethren. Every good
gift and every perfect gift is from above, coming down from
the Father of lights, with whom can be no variation, neither
shadow that is cast by turning. Of his own will he brought
us forth by the word of truth, that we should be a kind of
firstfruits of his creatures.
But let every man
Ye know this, my beloved brethren.
be swift to hear, slow to speak, slow to wrath: for the wrath
of man worketh not the righteousness of God. Wherefore
putting away all filthiness and overflowing of wickedness,
receive with meekness the implanted word, which is able to
save your souls. But be ye doers of the word, and not hear-
ers only, deluding your own selves. For if any one is a
hearer of the word and not a doer, he is like unto a man
beholding his natural face in a mirror: for he beholdeth him-
self, and goeth away, and straightway forgetteth what man-
But he that looketh into the perfect
ner of man he was.
law, the law of liberty, and so continueth, being not a hearer
that forgetteth but a doer that worketh, this man shall be
blessed in his doing. If any man thinketh himself to be re-
ligious, while he bridleth not his tongue but deceiveth his
heart, this man’s religion is vain. Pure religion and unde-
filed before our God and Father is this, to visit the father-
less and widows
in their affliction, and to keep oneself un-
spotted from the world.
My brethren, hold not the faith of our Lord Jesus Christ,
the Lord of glory, with respect of persons. For if there come
into your synagogue a man with a gold ring, in fine clothing,
and there come in also a poor man in vile clothing; and ye
have regard to him that weareth the fine clothing, and say,
Sit thou here in a good place; and ye say to the poor man,
Stand thou there, or sit under my footstool; do ye not make
distinctions among yourselves, and become judges with evil
thoughts?
Hearken, my beloved brethren; did not God
choose them that are poor as to the world to be rich in faith,
and heirs of the kingdom which he promised to them that
love him? But ye have dishonored the poor man. Do not
the rich oppress you, and themselves drag you before the
judgment-seats? Do not they blaspheme the honorable name
by which ye are called? Howbeit if ye fulfil the royal law,
according to the scripture, Thou shalt love thy neighbor asLETTERS!
TO
“EARLY;
CHRISTIANS
593
thyself, ye do well: but if ye have respect of persons, ye com-
mit sin, being convicted by the law as transgressors.
For
whosoever shall keep the whole law, and yet stumble in one
point, he is become guilty of all. For he that said, Do not
commit adultery, said also, Do not kill. Now if thou dost
not commit adultery, but killest, thou art become a trans-
gressor of the law. So speak ye, and so do, as men that are
to be judged by a law of liberty. For judgment is without
mercy to him that hath showed no mercy: mercy glorieth
against judgment.
What doth it profit, my brethren, if a man say he hath
Ifa
faith, but have not works? can that faith save him?
brother or sister be naked and in lack of daily food, and one
of you say unto them, Go in peace, be ye warmed and filled;
and yet ye give them not the things needful to the body;
what doth it profit? Even so faith, if it have not works, is
dead in itself. Yea, a man will say, Thou hast faith, and I
have works: show me thy faith apart from thy works, and I
by my works will show thee my faith. Thou believest that
God is one; thou doest well: the demons also believe, and
shudder. But wilt thou know, O vain man, that faith apart
from works is barren? Was not Abraham our father justi-
fied by works, in that he offered up Isaac his son upon the
altar? Thou seest that faith wrought with his works, and
by works was faith made perfect; and the scripture was ful-
filled which saith, And Abraham
believed God, and it was
reckoned unto him for righteousness; and he was called the
friend of God. Ye see that by works a man is justified, and
not only by faith. And in like manner was not also Rahab
the harlot justified by works, in that she received the mes-
sengers, and sent them out another way? For as the body
apart from the spirit is dead, even so faith apart from works
is dead.
Be not many of you teachers, my brethren, knowing that
we
we shall receive heavier judgment. For in many things
If any stumbleth not in word, the same is a
all stumble.
we
perfect man, able to bridle the whole body also. Now if
obey
may
they
that
mouths
their
into
bridles
horses’
the
put
ships
us, we turn about their whole body also. Behold, the
winds,
rough
by
driven
are
and
great
so
are
they
also, though
the im-
are yet turned about by a very small rudder, whither594
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
pulse of the steersman willeth. So the tongue also is a little
member, and boasteth great things. Behold, how much wood
is kindled by how small a fire! And the tongue is a fire:
the world of iniquity among our members is the tongue,
which defileth the whole body, and setteth on fire the wheel
of nature, and is set on fire by hell. For every kind of beasts
and birds, of creeping things and things in the sea, is tamed,
and hath been tamed by mankind: but the tongue can no man
tame; it is a restless evil, it is full of deadly poison. There-
with bless we the Lord and Father; and therewith curse we
men, who are made after the likeness of God: out of the
same mouth cometh forth blessing and cursing. My breth-
ren, these things ought not so to be. Doth the fountain send
forth from the same opening sweet water and bitter? can a -
fig tree, my brethren, yield olives, or a vine figs? neither can
salt water yield sweet.
Who is wise and understanding among you? let him show
by his good life his works in meekness of wisdom.
But if
ye have bitter jealousy and faction in your heart, glory not
and lie not against the truth. This wisdom is not a wisdom
that cometh down from above, but is earthly, sensual, devil-
ish. For where jealousy and faction are, there is confusion
and every vile deed. But the wisdom that is from above is
first pure, then peaceable, gentle, easy to be entreated, full of
mercy and good fruits, without variance, without hypocrisy.
And the fruit of righteousness is sown in peace for them that
make peace.
Is any among you suffering? let him pray. Is any cheer-
ful? let him sing praise. Is any among you sick? let him
call for the elders of the church; and let them pray over
him anointing him with oil in the name of the Lord: and
the prayer of faith shall save him that is sick, and the Lord
shall raise him up; and if he have committed sins, it shall
be forgiven him. Confess therefore your sins one to another,
and pray one for another, that ye may be healed. The sup-
plication of a righteous man availeth much in its working.
Elijah was a man of like passions with us, and he prayed
fervently that it might not rain; and it rained not on the
earth for three years and six months. And he prayed again:
i the heaven gave rain, and the earth brought forth her
ruit.LETTERS
TO
EARLY
CHRISTIANS
595
My brethren, if any among you err from the truth, and
one convert him; let him know, that he who converteth a
sinner from the error of his way shall save a soul from death,
and shall cover a multitude of sins.
THE,
EPISTUES
OF
PETER
Peter, an apostle of Jesus Christ, to the elect who are
sojourners of the Dispersion in Pontus, Galatia, Cappadocia,
Asia, and Bithynia.
Beloved, I beseech you as sojourners and pilgrims, to
abstain from fleshly lusts, which war against the soul; hav-
ing your behavior seemly among the Gentiles; that, wherein
they speak against you as evil-doers, they may by your good
works, which they behold, glorify God in the day of visita-
tion.
Be subject to every ordinance of man for the Lord’s sake:
whether to the king, as supreme; or unto governors, as sent
by him for vengeance on evil-doers and for praise to them
that do well. For so is the will of God, that by well-doing
ye should put to silence the ignorance of foolish men: as
free, and not using your freedom for a cloak of wickedness,
Love the
Honor all men.
but as bondservants of God.
Honor the king.
Fear God.
brotherhood.
Servants, be in subjection to your masters with all fear;
not only to the good and gentle, but also to the froward.
For this is acceptable, if for conscience toward God a man
endureth griefs, suffering wrongfully. For what glory is it,
if, when ye sin, and are buffeted for it, ye shall take it
patiently? but if, when ye do well, and suffer for it, ye shall
take it patiently, this is acceptable with God. For hereunto
were ye called: because Christ also suffered for you, leaving
you an example, that ye should follow his steps: who did no
sin, neither was guile found in his mouth: who, when he was
reviled, reviled not again; when he suffered, threatened not;
but committed himself to him that judgeth righteously: who
his own self bare our sins in his body upon the tree, that we,
;_by
having died unto sins, might live unto righteousness
like
astray
going
were
ye
For
healed.
were
ye
whose stripes
sheep; but are now returned unto the Shepherd and Bishop
of your souls,596
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
Finally, be ye all likeminded, compassionate, loving as
brethren, tenderhearted, humbleminded: not rendering evil
for evil, or reviling for reviling; but contrariwise blessing;
And who is he that will harm you, if ye be zealous of that
which is good? But even if ye should suffer for righteous-
ness’ sake, blessed are ye: and fear not their fear, neither be
troubled; but sanctify in your hearts Christ as Lord: being
ready always to give answer to every man that asketh you a
reason concerning the hope that is in you, yet with meekness
and fear: having a good conscience; that, wherein ye are
spoken against, they may be put to shame who revilé your
good manner of life in Christ. For it is better, if the will
of God should so will, that ye suffer for well-doing than for
evil-doing. Because Christ also suffered for sins once, the
righteous for the unrighteous, that he might bring us to
God; being put to death in the flesh, but made alive in the
spirit.
.
Beloved, think it not strange concerning the fiery trial
among you, which cometh upon you to prove you, as though
a strange thing happened unto you: but insomuch as ye are
partakers of Christ’s sufferings, rejoice; that at the revela-
tion of his glory also ye may rejoice with exceeding joy. If
ye are reproached for the name of Christ, blessed are ye;
because the Spirit of glory and the Spirit of God resteth
upon you. For let none of you suffer as a murderer, or a
thief, or an evil-doer, or as a meddler in other men’s matters:
but if a man suffer as a Christian, let him not be ashamed;
but let him glorify God in this name. For the time is come
for judgment to begin at the house of God: and if it begin
first at us, what shall be the end of them that obey not the
gospel of God? And if the righteous is scarcely saved, where
shall the ungodly and sinner appear? Wherefore let them
also that suffer according to the will of God commit their
souls in well-doing unto a faithful Creator.
The elders therefore among you I exhort, who am a
fellow-elder, and a witness of the sufferings of Christ, who
am also a partaker of the glory that shall be revealed: Tend
the flock of God which is among you, exercising the over-
sight, not of constraint, but willingly, according to the will
of God; nor yet for filthy lucre, but of a ready mind; neither
as lording it over the charge allotted to you, but makingLETTERS
TO
EARLY
CHRISTIANS
597
yourselves ensamples to the flock. And when the chief Shep-
herd shall be manifested, ye shall receive the crown of glory
that fadeth not away. Likewise, ye younger, be subject unto
the elder. Yea, all of you gird yourselves with humility, to
serve one another: for God resisteth the proud, but giveth
grace to the humble.
Humble yourselves therefore under
the mighty hand of God, that he may exalt you in due time;
casting all your anxiety upon him, because he careth for
you. Be sober, be watchful: your adversary the devil, as a .
roaring lion, walketh about, seeking whom he may devour:
whom withstand stedfast in your faith, knowing that the
same sufferings are accomplished in your brethren who are
in the world.
Simon Peter, a servant and apostle of Jesus Christ, to
them that have obtained a like precious faith with us in the
righteousness of our God and the Saviour Jesus Christ:
Grace to you and peace be multiplied in the knowledge of
God and of Jesus our Lord; seeing that his divine power
hath granted unto us all things that pertain unto life and
godliness, through the knowledge of him that called us by
his own glory and virtue; whereby he hath granted unto us
his precious and exceeding great promises; that through these
ye may become partakers of the divine nature, having es-
caped from the corruption that is in the world by lust. Yea,
and for this very cause adding on your part all diligence, in
your faith supply virtue; and in your virtue knowledge;
and in your knowledge self-control; and in your self-control
patience; and in your patience godliness; and in your godli-
ness brotherly kindness; and in your brotherly kindness love.
For if these things are yours and abound, they make you to
be not idle nor unfruitful unto the knowledge of our Lord
Jesus Christ. For he that lacketh these things is blind, see-
ing only what is near, having forgotten the cleansing from
his old sins. Wherefore, brethren, give the more diligence
to make your calling and election sure: for if ye do these
things, ye shall never stumble: for thus shall be richly sup-
plied unto you the entrance into the eternal kingdom of our
Lord and Saviour Jesus Christ.
Wherefore I shall be ready always to put you in remem-
brance of these things, though ye know them, and are estab-598
THE
NEW. TESTAMENT
lished in the truth which is with you.
For we did not follow
cunningly devised fables, when we made known unto you
the power and coming of our Lord Jesus Christ, but we
were eyewitnesses of his majesty. For he received from God
the Father honor and glory, when there was borne such a
voice to him by the Majestic Glory, This is my beloved Son,
in whom I am well pleased: and this voice we ourselves
heard borne out of heaven, when we were with him in the
- holy mount. And we have the word of prophecy made more
sure; whereunto ye do well that ye take heed, as unto a
lamp shining in a dark place, until the day dawn, and the
day-star arise in your hearts: knowing this first, that no
prophecy of scripture is of private interpretation.
For no
prophecy ever came by the will of man: but men spake from
God, being moved by the Holy Spirit.
‘But there arose false prophets also among the people, as
among you also there shall be false teachers, who shall privily
bring in destructive heresies, denying even the Master that
bought them, bringing upon themselves swift destruction.
But forget not this one thing, beloved, that one day is with
the Lord as a thousand years, and a thousand years as one
day. The Lord is not slack concerning his promise, as some
count slackness; but is longsuffering to you-ward, not wish-
ing that any should perish, but that all should come
to re-
pentance.
But the day of the Lord will come as a thief;
in the which the heavens shall pass away with a great noise,
and the elements shall be dissolved with fervent heat, and
the earth and the works that are therein shall be burned up.
Seeing that these things are thus all to be dissolved, what
manner of persons ought ye to be in all holy living and
godliness, looking for and earnestly desiring the coming of
the day of God, by reason of which the heavens being on
fire shall be dissolved, and the elements shall melt with fer-
vent heat? But, according to his promise, we look for new
heavens and a new earth, wherein dwelleth righteousness.
AN
EPISTLE
OF
JOHN
That which was from the beginning, that which we have
heard, that which we have seen with our eyes, that which
we beheld, and our hands handled, concerning the Word ofLETTERS
TO
EARLY
CHRISTIANS
599
life (and the life was manifested, and we have seen, and
bear witness, and declare unto you the life, the eternal life,
which was with the Father, and was manifested unto us);
that which we have seen and heard declare we unto you
also, that ye also may have fellowship with us: yea, and our
fellowship is with the Father, and with his Son Jesus Christ:
he these things we write, that our joy may be made
ull.
And this is the message which we have heard from him
and announce unto you, that God is light, and in him is no
darkness at all. If we say that we have fellowship with him
and walk in the darkness, we lie, and do not the truth: but
if we walk in the light, as he is in the light, we have fellow-
ship one with another, and the blood of Jesus his Son cleans-
eth us from all sin. If we say that we have no sin, we
deceive ourselves, and the truth is not in us. If we confess
our sins, he is faithful and righteous to forgive us our sins,
If we say that
and to cleanse us from all unrighteousness.
we have not sinned, we make him a liar, and his word is not
in us.
My little children, these things write I unto you that ye
may not sin. And if any man sin, we have an Advocate
with the Father, Jesus Christ the righteous: and he is the
propitiation for our sins; and not for ours only, but also for
the whole world. And hereby we know that we know him,
He that saith, I know him,
if we keep his commandments.
and keepeth not his commandments, is a liar, and the truth
is not in him; but whoso keepeth his word, in him verily hath
the love of God been perfected. Hereby we know that we
are in him: he that saith he abideth in him ought himself
also to walk even as he walked.
Beloved, no new commandment write I unto you, but an
old commandment which ye had from the beginning: the
Again, a
old commandment is the word which ye heard.
new commandment write I unto you, which thing is true in
him and in you; because the darkness is passing away, and
the true light already shineth. He that saith he is in the
light and hateth his brother, is in the darkness even until
He that loveth his brother abideth in the light, and
now.
But he that
there is no occasion of stumbling in him.
in the
walketh
and
darkness,
the
in
hateth his brother is600
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
darkness, and knoweth not whither he goeth, because the
darkness hath blinded his eyes.
I write unto you, my little children, because your sins
are forgiven you for his name’s sake.
I write unto you,
fathers, because ye know him who is from the beginning.
I write unto you, young men, because ye have overcome the
evil one. I have written unto you, little children, because
ye know the Father. I have written unto you, fathers, be-
cause ye know him who is from the beginning.
I have
written unto you, young men, because ye are strong, and
the word of God abideth in you, and ye have overcome the
evil one. Love not the world, neither the things that are
in the world. If any man hie the world, the love of the
Father is not in him. For all that is in the world, the lust
of the flesh and the lust of the eyes and the waanelory of
life, is not of the Father, but is of the world.
And the
world passeth away, and the lust thereof: but he that doeth
the will of God abideth for ever.
Little children, it is the last hour: and as ye heard that
anti-christ cometh, even now have there arisen many anti-
christs; whereby we know that it is the last hour. They
went out from us, but they were not of us; for if they had
been of us, they would have continued with us: but they
went out, that they might be made manifest that they all
are not of us. And now, my little children, abide in him;
that, if he shall be manifested, we may have boldness, and
not be ashamed before him at his coming.
If ye know
that he is righteous, ye know that every one also that doeth
righteousness is begotten of him.
Behold what manner of love the Father hath bestowed
upon us, that we should be called children of God; and such
we are. For this cause the world knoweth us not, because
it knew him not. Beloved, now are we children of God,
and it is not yet made manifest what we shall be. We
know that, if he shall be manifested, we shall be like him;
for we shall see him even as he is. And every one that hath
this hope set on him purifieth himself, even as he is pure.
Every one that doeth sin doeth also lawlessness; and sin is
lawlessness. And ye know that he was manifested to take
away sins; and in him is no sin. Whosoever abideth in him
sinneth not: whosoever sinneth hath not seen him, neitherLETTERS
TO
EARLY
CHRISTIANS
601
knoweth him.
My little children, let no man lead you
astray: he that doeth righteousness is righteous, even as he
is righteous: he that doeth sin is of the devil; for the devil
sinneth from the beginning. To this end was the Son of
God manifested, that he might destroy the works of the
devil. Whosoever is begotten of God doeth no sin, because
his seed abideth in him: and he cannot sin, because he is
begotten of God.
Marvel not, brethren, if the world hateth you. We know
that we have passed out of death into life, because we love
He that loveth not abideth in death. Who-
the brethren.
soever hateth his brother is a murderer: and ye know that
Thereby
no murderer hath eternal life abiding in him.
know we love, because he laid down his life for us: and we
ought to lay down our lives for the brethren. But whoso
hath the world’s goods, and beholdeth his brother in need,
and shutteth up his compassion from him, how doth the love
of God abide in him? My little children, let us not love in
word, neither with the tongue; but in deed and truth.
Hereby shall we know that we are of the truth, and shall
assure our heart before him: because if our heart condemn
us, God is greater than our heart, and knoweth all things.
Beloved, if our heart condemn us not, we have boldness to-
ward God; and whatsoever we
ask we
receive of him, be-
cause we keep his commandments and do the things that are
pleasing in his sight. And this is his commandment, that
we should believe in the name of his Son Jesus Christ, and
And
love one another, even as he gave us commandment.
he
and
him,
in
abideth
commandments
his
keepeth
he that
the
by
us,
in
abideth
he
that
in him. And hereby we know
Spirit which he gave us.
Beloved, believe not every spirit, but prove the spirits,
s are
whether they are of God; because many false prophet
of
Spirig
the
ye
know
Hereby
gone out into the world.
come
is
Christ
Jesus
that
eth
confess
that
spirit
God: every
eth not
in the flesh is of God: and every spirit that confess
ist,
anti-chr
the
of
spirit
the
is
this
and
God:
of
Jesus is not
is in the
whereof ye have heard that it cometh; and now it
have
and
n,
childre
little
my
God,
of
are
Ye
world already.
he
than
you
in
is
that
overcome them: because greater is he
re
therefo
world:
the
of
are
“They
that is in the world.602
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
speak they as of the world, and the world heareth them. We
are of God: he that knoweth God heareth us; he who is not
of God heareth us not. By this we know the spirit of truth,
and the spirit of error.
Beloved, let us love one another: for love is of God; and
every one that loveth is begotten of God, and knoweth God.
He that loveth not knoweth not God; for God is love.
Herein was the love of God manifested in us, that God
hath sent his only begotten Son into the world that we might
live through him. Herein is love, not that we loved God,
but that he loved us, and sent his Son to be the propitiation
for our sins. Beloved, if God so loved us, we also ought
to love one another. No man hath beheld God at any time:
if we love one another, God abideth in us, and his love is
perfected in us: hereby we know that we abide in him and
he in us, because he hath given us of his Spirit. And we
have beheld and bear witness that the Father hath sent the
Son to be the Saviour of the world. Whosoever shall con-
fess that Jesus is the Son of God, God abideth in him, and
he in God. And we know and have believed the love which
God hath in us. God is love; and he that abideth in love
abideth in God, and.God abideth in him.
Herein is love
made perfect with us, that we may have boldness in the day
of judgment; because as he is, even so are we in this world.
There is no fear in love: but perfect love casteth out fear,
because fear hath punishment; and he that feareth is not
made perfect in love. We love, because he first loved us.
If a man say, I love God, and hateth his brother, he is a
liar: for he that loveth not his brother whom he hath seen,
cannot love God whom he hath not seen. And this com-
mandment have we from him, that he who loveth God love
his brother also.
eREVELATIONOe
are
ea
Ste
part. aad
£08.
ge, fav
f<
veh thee as ot seneuwatelel od os wera dd
’
ateed hun) ac that herwchiw arthy<n ees
Sad
cod
pietycdt sate esate sitio pekytageenrte Pee
|
oe
» Bebae
feat:
Pe
en
a
wan
_
ie
Liat loely pebeevnien ot Gon ,.andy kocereth Lie4
‘guile, ea lenosv enh rat Gon 5 f9ts God. inpover
My
Wee
Hoes Gove
yhtir. cans (ibs
wo). ud
matsheand
wy ras igh
Gol
on tibegotionSusy wid the wenris}
ina that we
cher iquigede. hes il Hater‘9 bowey rere 3 that we layed
Coat me insted
ibs, 82s) "ent. bie Bort
eeekpsti:>
Bb eeesoneanothe:
(Ae
“e weak,
Powe cue
tf
Aged
Nee iucn
arent,
Gad
Pertected ta isacbrrebyo we
*
:
ot
die-*|
.
wile Keheye!the
errage?}
epery
>
emer, pai“na:
so
My
he Blepript rat 1stS
We
hath beheld oe
£
taved. us,
sttigethin
khow
wy,’
ate
wey pad Gal? love
thar “ie whe}
~
tam
f
4
ve) t) tus, be larg he Ward Sivan us hsiy spinit
hieve pel cut) anv ce" Ay Tas poe hath
m=
—
BsSip: ty be rhe shiests
itSmale Jace ia tie Son of Geel, id éoidetn in hime)
j
b
Twice
hnLigtp (aed,
iAged oer. Ano. ond have babies
eualb-e
elie,
ES
Sith 90 tat ik, x deve; ade) de thar:
%
ype
in Gn wewink {Sod atoderk tae fam Pvt
Vtede prefect wit 9%, that we mpy fave iidhdiieasthei
- ut eailial ip tecense
ay he seven chite we me thie
seg .
\
1
«
Dome
* novfrara
Fogde ertert inlow
..
bas’ pen ore
SS)
gone
a
*
mc ae
aWe iove, pier:
L jowe. Chad, sand dulcothy
toned
Pelee wwe Thor
us datestha.
2
’
Ler
A, a
-
‘
.
¢
+
’
vebaal
wart.
od
3
et pordece: dot wnate th 4
7%
'
he death
por seat =
Lin, Thee isewho: bower
a
.
£ wa
er.
We. ie a!
—
“teacher,
ra
hak!y he
haw fog fat rhs low seth rot dit ‘isda ek: We
i
‘
doves
pepe! tear dink pisteistasessts “amd he bayPS yee oo,
75
oe
viiREVELATION
The Revelation of Jesus Christ, which God gave him to
show unto his servants, even the things which must shortly
come to pass: and he sent and signified it by his angel unto
his servant John; who bare witness of the word of God, and
of the testimony of Jesus Christ, even of all things that he
saw.
Blessed is he that readeth, and they that hear the
words of the prophecy, and keep the things that are written
therein: for the time is at hand.
THE
MESSAGES
TO
THE
SEVEN
CHURCHES
John to the seven churches that are in Asia: Grace to you
and peace, from him who is and who was and who is to
come; and from the seven Spirits that are before his throne;
and from Jesus Christ, who is the faithful witness, the first-
born of the dead, and the ruler of the kings of the earth.
Unto him that loveth us, and loosed us from our sins by his
blood; and he made us to be a kingdom, to be priests unto
his God and Father; to him be the glory and the dominion
Behold, he cometh with the
Amen.
for ever and ever.
clouds; and every eye shall see him, and they that pierced
him; and all the tribes of the earth shall mourn over him.
Even so, Amen.
I am the Alpha and the Omega, saith the Lord God, who
is and who was and who is to come, the Almighty.
I John, your brother and partaker with you in the tribu-
lation and kingdom and patience which are in Jesus, was in
the isle that is called Patmos, for the word of God and the
testimony of Jesus. I was in the Spirit on the Lord’s day,
and I heard behind me a great voice, as of a trumpet saying,
Whatthou seest, write in a book and send it to the seven
mum,and unto Thyatira, and unto Sardis, and unto Phila-
churches: unto Ephesus, and unto Smyrna, and unto Perga-
delphia, and unto Laodicea. And I turned to see the voice
that spake with me. And having turned I saw seven golden
candlesticks; and in the midst of the candlesticks
605
one like606
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
unto a son of man, clothed with a garment down to the foot,
and girt about at the breasts with a golden girdle. And his
head and his hair were white as white wool, white as snow;
and his eyes were as a flame of fire; and his feet like unto
burnished brass, as if it had been refined in a furnace; and
his voice as the voice of many waters. And he had in his
right hand seven stars: and out of his mouth proceeded a
sharp two-edged sword: and his countenance was as the sun
shineth in his strength. And when I saw him, I fell at his
feet as one dead. And he laid his right hand upon me, say-
ing, Fear not; I am the first and the last, and the Living
one; and I was dead, and behold, I am alive for evermore,
and I have the keys of death and of Hades. Write there-
fore the things which thou sawest, and the things which are,
and the things which shall come to pass hereafter; the mys-
tery of the seven stars which thou sawest in my right hand,
and the seven golden candlesticks. ‘The seven stars are the
angels of the seven churches: and the seven candlesticks are
seven churches.
To the angel of the church in Ephesus write:
These things saith he that holdeth the seven stars in his
right hand, he that walketh in the midst of the seven golden
candlesticks: I know thy works, and thy toil and patience,
and that thou canst not bear evil men, and didst try them
that call themselves apostles, and they are not, and didst
find them false; and thou hast patience and didst bear for
my name’s sake, and hast not grown weary. But I have this
against thee, that thou didst leave thy first love. Remember
therefore whence thou art fallen, and repent and do the first
works; or else I come to thee, and will move thy candle-
stick out of its place, except thou repent. But this thou hast,
that thou hatest the works of the Nicolaitans, which I also
hate. He that hath an ear, let him hear what the Spirit
saith to the churches. To him that overcometh, to him will
Ade to eat of the tree of life, which is in the Paradise of
od.
And to the angel of the church in Smyrna write:
These things saith the first and the last, who was dead,
and lived again: I know thy tribulation, and thy poverty
(but thou art rich), and the blasphemy of them that say
they are Jews, and they are not, but are a synagogue ofREVELATION
607
Satan. Fear not the things which thou art about to suffer:
behold, the devil is about to cast some of you into prison,
that ye may be tried; and ye shall have tribulation ten days.
Be thourfaithful unto death, and I will give thee the crown
of life. He that hath an ear, let him hear what the Spirit
saith to the churches.
He that overcometh shall not be
hurt of the second death.
And to the angel of the church in Pergamum write:
These things saith he that hath the sharp two-edged
sword:
I know
where
thou dwellest, even where Satan’s
throne is; and thou holdest fast my name, and didst not
deny my faith, even in the days of Antipas my witness, my
faithful one, who was killed among you, where Satan
dwelleth.
But I.have a few things against thee, because
thou hast there some that hold the teaching of Balaam, who
taught Balak to cast a stumblingblock before the children of
Israel, to eat things sacrificed to idols, and to commit for-
nication. So hast thou also some that hold the teaching of
Repent therefore; or else
the Nicolaitans in like manner.
I come to thee quickly, and I will make war against them
with the sword of my mouth. He that hath an ear, let him
hear what the Spirit saith to the churches. To him that
overcometh, to him will I give of the hidden manna, and I
will give him a white stone, and upon the stone a new name
written, which no one knoweth but he that receiveth it.
And to the angel of the church in Thyatira write:
These things saith the Son of God, who hath his eyes like
a flame of fire, and his feet are like unto burnished brass:
I know thy works, and thy love and faith and ministry and
patience, and that thy last works are more than the first.
But I have this against thee, that thou sufferest the woman
Jezebel, who calleth herself a prophetess; and she teacheth
and seduceth my servants to commit fornication, and to eat
things sacrificed to idols. And I gave her time that she
All the
should repent; and she willeth not to repent.
reins
the
searcheth
that
he
am
I
that
know
churches shall
and hearts: and I will give unto each one of you according
to your works. But to you I say, to the rest that are in
Thyatira, as many as have not this teaching, who know not
the deep things of Satan, as they are wont to say; I cast
Nevertheless that, which ye
upon you none other burden.608
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
have, hold fast till I come.
And he that overcometh, and
he that keepeth my works unto the end, to him will I give
authority over the nations: and he shall rule them with a rod
of iron, as the vessels of the potter are broken to shivers;
as I also have received of my Father: and I will give him
the morning star. He that hath an ear, let him hear what
the Spirit saith to the churches.
And to the angel of the church in Sardis write:
These things saith he that hath the seven Spirits of God,
and the seven stars: I know thy works, that thou hast a name
that thou livest, and thou art dead. Be thou watchful, and
establish the things that remain, which were ready to die:
for I have found no works of thine perfected before my
God.
Remember therefore how thou hast received and
didst hear; and keep it, and repent. If therefore thou shalt
not watch, I will come as a thief, and thou shalt not know
what hour I will come upon thee. But thou hast a few
namés in Sardis that did not defile their garments: and they
shall walk with me in white; for they are worthy. He that
overcometh shall thus be arrayed in white garments; and I
will in no wise blot his name out of the book of life, and I
will confess his name before my Father, and before his
angels. He that hath an ear, let him hear what the Spirit
saith to the churches.
And to the angel of the church in Philadelphia write:
These things saith he that is holy, he that is true, he that
hath the key of David, he that openeth and none shall shut,
and that shutteth and none openeth: I know thy works
(behold, I have set before thee a door opened, which none
can shut), and thou hast a little power, and didst keep my
word, and didst not deny my name.
Behold, I give of the
synagogue of Satan, of them that say they are Jews, and
they are not, but do lie; behold, I will make them to come
and worship before thy feet, and to know that I have loved
thee. Because thou didst keep the word of my patience, I
also will keep thee from the hour of trial, that hour which is
to come upon the whole world, to try them that dwell upon
the earth. I come quickly: hold fast that which thou hast,
that no one take thy crown.
He that overcometh, I will
make him a pillar in the temple of my God, and he shall
go out thence no more: and I will write upon him the nameREVELATION
609
of my God, and the name of the city of my God, the new
Jerusalem, which cometh down out of heaven from my God,
and mine own new name. He that hath an ear, let him hear
what the Spirit saith to the churches.
And to the angel of the church in Laodicea write:
These things saith the Amen, the faithful and true wit-
ness, the beginning of the creation of God: I know thy
works, that thou art neither cold nor hot: I would thou
wert cold or hot. So because thou art lukewarm, and neither
hot nor cold, I will spew thee out of my mouth. Because
thou sayest, I am rich, and have gotten riches, and have
need of nothing; and knowest not that thou art the wretched
one and miserable and poor and blind and naked: I counsel
thee to buy of me gold refined by fire, that thou mayest be-
come rich; and white garments, that thou mayest clothe
thyself, and that the shame of thy nakedness be not made
manifest; and eyesalve to anoint thine eyes, that thou may-
est see. As many as I love, I reprove and chasten: be zeal-
ous therefore, and repent. Behold, I stand at the door and
knock: if any man hear my voice and open the door, I will
come in to him, and will sup with him, and he with me. He
that overcometh, I will give to him to sit down with me in
my throne, as I also overcame, and sat down with my Father
in his throne. He that hath an ear, let him hear what the
Spirit saith to the churches.
THE
SEALED
BOOK
AND
THE
LAMB
in
After these things I saw, and behold, a door opened
a
of
as
voice
a
heard,
I
that
heaven, and the first voice
hither, and
up
Come
saying,
one
me,
with
ng
speaki
t
trumpe
pass here-
I will show thee the things which must come to
there
behold,
and
Spirit:
the
in
was
I
htway
Straig
after.
throne;
the
upon
sitting
one
and
was a throne set in heaven,
stone and a
and he that sat was to look upon like a jasper
the throne,
about
round
w
sardius: and there was a rainbo
the throne
about
round
And
upon.
look
to
d
like an emeral
I saw
thrones
the
upon
were four and twenty thrones: and
ts;
garmen
white
in
arrayed
sitting,
elders
four and twenty
throne
the
of
out
And
and on their heads crowns of gold.
And _ there
s.
‘proceed lightnings and voices and thunder610
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
were seven lamps of fire burning before the throne, which
are the seven Spirits of God; and before the throne, as it
were a sea of glass like unto crystal; and round about the
throne, four living creatures full of eyes before and behind.
And the first creature was like a lion, and the second crea-
ture like a calf, and the third creature had a face as of a
man, and the fourth creature was like a flying eagle. And
the four living creatures, having each one of them six wings,
are full of eyes round about and within: and they have no
rest day and night, saying,
Holy, holy, holy, is the Lord God, the Almighty, who
was and who is and who is to come.
And when the living creatures shall give glory and honor and
thanks to him that sitteth on the throne, to him that liveth
for ever and ever, the four and twenty elders shall fall
down before him that sitteth on the throne, and shall wor-
ship him that liveth for ever and ever, and shall cast their
crowns before the throne, saying,
Worthy art thou, our Lord and our God, to receive
the glory and the honor and the power: for thou didst
create all things, and because of thy will they were, and
were created.
And I saw in the right hand of him that sat on the
throne a book written within and on the back, close sealed
with seven seals. And I saw a strong angel proclaiming
with a great voice, Who is worthy to open the book, and to
loose the seals thereof? And no one in the heaven, or on
the earth, or under the earth, was able to open the book, or
to look thereon.
And I wept much, because no one was
found worthy to open the book, or to look thereon: and
one of the elders saith unto me, Weep not; behold, the
Lion that is of the tribe of Judah, the Root of David, hath
overcome to open the book and the seven seals thereof. And
I saw in the midst of the throne and of the four living crea-
tures, and in the midst of the elders, a Lamb standing, as
though it had been slain, having seven horns, and seven eyes,
which are the seven Spirits of God, sent forth into all the
earth. And he came, and he taketh it out of the right hand
of him that sat on the throne. And when he had taken the
book, the four living creatures and the four and twenty
elders fell down before the Lamb, having each one a harp,REVELATION
1
611
and golden bowls full of incense, which are the prayers of
the saints. And they sing a new song, saying,
Worthy art thou to take the book, and to open the seals
thereof: for thou wast slain, and didst purchase unto
God with thy blood men of every tribe, and tongue,
and people, and nation, and madest them to be unto our
God a kingdom and priests; and they reign upon the
earth.
And I saw, and I heard a voice of many angels round
about the throne and the living creatures and the elders;
and the number of them was ten thousand times ten thou-
sand, and thousands of thousands; saying with a great voice,
Worthy is the Lamb that hath been slain to receive the
power, and riches, and wisdom, and might, and honor,
and glory, and blessing.
And every created thing which is in the heaven, and on
the earth, and under the earth, and on the sea, and all things
that are in them, heard I saying,
Unto him that sitteth on the throne, and unto the
Lamb, be the blessing, and the honor, and the glory, and
the dominion, for ever and ever.
And the four living creatures said, Amen.
fell down and worshipped.
THE
BREAKING
OF
THE
SEVEN
And the elders
SEALS
And I saw when the Lamb opened one of the seven seals,
and I heard one of the four living creatures saying as with
a voice of thunder, Come. And I saw, and behold, a white
horse, and he that sat thereon had a bow; and there was
given unto him a crown: and he came forth conquering,
and to conquer.
And when he opened the second seal, I heard the second
And another horse came
living creature saying, Come.
sat thereon it was given
that
him
to
and
horse:
red
forth, a
to take peace from the earth, and that they should slay one
another: and there was given unto him a great sword.
And when he opened the third seal, I heard the third
And I saw, and behold, a
living creature saying, Come.
black horse; and he that sat thereon had a balance in his
hand. And I heard as it were a voice in the midst of the612
THE NEW
TESTAMENT
four living creatures saying, A measure of wheat for a shill-
ing, and three measures of barley for a shilling; and the oil
and the wine hurt thou not.
And when he opened the fourth seal, I heard the voice of
the fourth living creature saying, Come. And I saw, and
behold, a pale horse: and he that sat upon him, his name
was Death; and Hades followed with him. And there was
given unto them authority over the fourth part of the earth,
to kill with sword, and with famine, and with death, and by
the wild beasts of the earth.
And when he opened the fifth seal, I saw underneath the
altar the souls of them that had been slain for the word of
God, and for the testimony which they held: and they cried
with a great voice, saying, How long, O Master, the holy and
true, dost thou not judge and avenge our blood on them that
dwell on the earth? And there was given them to each one a
white robe; and it was said unto them, that they should rest
yet for a little time, until their fellow-servants also and
their brethren, who should be killed even as they we
should have fulfilled their course.
And I saw when he opened the sixth seal, and there was
a great earthquake; and the sun became black as sackcloth
of hair, and the whole moon became as blood; and the stars
of the heaven fell unto the earth, as a fig tree casteth her
unripe figs when she is shaken of a great wind. And the
heaven was removed as a scroll when it is rolled up; and
every mountain and island were moved out of their places.
And the kings of the earth, and the princes, and the chief
captains, and the rich and the strong, and every bondman
and freeman, hid themselves in the caves and in the rocks of
the mountains; and they say to the mountains, and to the
rocks, Fall on us, and hide us from the face of him that sit-
teth on the throne, and from the wrath of the Lamb: for the
great day of their wrath is come; and who is able to stand?
After this I saw four angels standing at the four corners
of the earth, holding the four winds of the earth, that no
wind should blow on the earth,or on the sea, or upon any
tree. And I saw another angel ascend from the sunrising,
having the seal of the living God: and he cried with a great
voice to the four angels to whom it was given to hurt the
earth and the sea, saying, Hurt not the earth, neither theREVELATION
613
sea, nor the trees, till we shall have sealed the servants of
our God on their foreheads. And I heard the number of
them that were sealed, a hundred and forty and four thou-
sand, sealed out of every tribe of the children of Israel.
After these things I saw, and behold, a great multitude,
which no man could number, out of every nation and of all
tribes and peoples and tongues, standing before the throne
and before the Lamb, arrayed in white robes, and palms in
their hands; and they cry with a great voice, saying,
Salvation unto our God who sitteth on the throne, and
unto the Lamb.
And all the angels were standing round about the throne,
and about the elders and the four living creatures; and they
fell before the throne on their faces, and worshipped God,
saying,
Amen:
Blessing, and glory, and wisdom, and thanks-
giving, and honor, and power, and might, be unto our
God for ever and ever. Amen.
And one of the elders answered, saying unto me, These
that are arrayed in the white robes, who are they, and whence
came they? And I say unto him, My lord, thou knowest.
And he said to me, These are they that come out of the great
tribulation, and they washed their robes and made them
white in the blood of the Lamb. Therefore are they before
the throne of God; and they serve him day and night in his
temple: and he that sitteth on the throne shall spread his
tabernacle over them. ‘They shall hunger no more, neither
thirst any more; neither shall the sun strike upon them, nor
any heat: for the Lamb that is in the midst of the throne
shall be their shepherd, and shall guide them unto fountains
of waters of life: and God shall wipe away every tear from
their eyes.
And when he opened the seventh seal, there followed
silence in heaven about the space of half an hour. And
a
I
saw the seven angels that stand before God; and there were
given unto them seven trumpets.
THE
SOUNDING
OF
THE
SEVEN
TRUMPETS
And another angel came and stood over the altar, having
a golden censer; and there was given unto him much incense,614
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
that he should add it unto the prayers of all the saints upon
And the
the golden altar which was before the throne.
smoke of the incense, with the prayers of the saints, went up
before God out of the angel’s hand. And the angel taketh
the censer; and he filled it with the fire of the altar, and
cast it upon the earth: and there followed thunders, and
voices, and lightnings, and an earthquake.
And the seven angels that had the seven trumpets pre-
pared themselves to sound.
And the first sounded, and there followed hail and fire,
mingled with blood, and they were cast upon the earth: and
the third part of the earth was burnt up, and the third part
of the trees was burnt up, and all green grass was burnt up.
And the second angel sounded, and as it were a great
mountain burning with fire was cast into the sea: and the
third part of the sea became blood; and there died the third
part of the creatures which were in the sea, even they that
had life; and the third part of the ships was destroyed.
And the third angel sounded, and there fell from heaven
a great star, burning as a torch, and it fell upon the third
part of the rivers, and upon the fountains of the waters; and
the name of the star is called Wormwood: and the third part
of the waters became wormwood; and many men died of the
waters, because they were made bitter.
And the fourth angel sounded, and the third part of the
sun was smitten, and the third part of the moon, and the
third part of the stars; that the third part of them should be
darkened, and the day should not shine for the third part of
it, and the night in like manner.
And I saw, and I heard an eagle, flying in mid heaven,
saying with a great voice, Woe, woe, woe, for them that
dwell on the earth, by reason of the other voices of the trum-
pet of the three angels, who are yet to sound.
And the fifth angel sounded and I saw a star from heaven
fallen unto the earth: and there was given to him the key of
the pit of the abyss.
And he opened the pit of the abyss;
and there went up a smoke out of the pit, as the smoke of a
great furnace; and the sun and the air were darkened by
reason of the smoke of the pit. And out of the smoke came
forth locusts upon the earth; and power was given them, as
the scorpions of the earth have power. And it was said untoREVELATION
615
them that they should not hurt the grass of the earth, neither
any green thing, neither any tree, but only such men
as have
not the seal of God on their foreheads. And it was
given
them that they should not kill them, but that they should
be
tormented five months: and their torment was as the tor-
ment of a scorpion, when it striketh a man. ‘They have over
them as king the angel of the abyss: his name in Hebrew
is Abaddon, and in the Greek tongue he hath the name
Apollyon.
The first Woe is past: behold, there come yet two Woes
hereafter.
And the sixth angel sounded, and I heard a voice from the
horns of the altar which is before God, one saying to the
sixth angel that had the trumpet, Loose the four angels that
are bound at the great river Euphrates. And the four angels
were loosed, that had been prepared for the hour and day
and month and year, that they should kill the third part of
men. And the number of the armies of the horsemen was
twice ten thousand times ten thousand: I heard the number
of them. And thus I saw the horses in the vision, and them
that sat on them, having breastplates as of fire and of hya-
cinth and of brimstone: and the heads of the horses are as
the heads of lions; and out of their mouths proceedeth fire
and smoke and brimstone.
By these three plagues was the
third part of men killed, by the fire and the smoke and the
brimstone, which proceeded out of their mouths.
And I saw another strong angel coming down out of
heaven, arrayed with a cloud; and the rainbow was upon his
head, and his face was as the sun, and his feet as pillars of
fire; and he had in his hand a little book open: and he set
his right foot upon the sea, and his left upon the earth; and
he cried with a great voice, as a lion roareth: and when he
cried, the seven thunders uttered their voices. And when
the seven thunders uttered their voices, I was about to write:
and I heard a voice from heaven saying, Seal up the things
which the seven thunders uttered, and write them not. And
the angel that I saw standing upon the sea and upon the
earth lifted up his right hand to heaven, and sware by him
that liveth for ever and ever, who created the heaven and
the things that are therein, and the earth and the things that
are therein, and the sea and the things that are therein, that616
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
there shall be delay no longer: but in the days of the voice
of the seventh angel, when he is about to sound, then is fin-
ished the mystery of God, according to the good tidings
And the
which he declared to his servants the prophets.
speaking
again
it
heard
I
heaven,
from
heard
I
which
voice
with me, and saying, Go, take the book which is open in the
hand of the angel that standeth upon the sea and upon the
earth. And I went unto the angel, saying unto him that he
should give me the little book. And he saith unto me, Take
it, and eat it up; and.it shall make thy belly bitter, but in
thy mouth it shall be sweet as honey. And I took the little
book out of the angel’s hand, and ate it up; and it was in my
mouth sweet as honey: and when I had eaten it, my belly
was made bitter. And they say unto me, Thou must proph-
esy again over many peoples and nations and tongues and
kings.
And there was given me a reed like unto a rod: and one
said, Rise, and measure the temple of God, and the altar,
and them that worship therein.
And the court which is
without the temple leave without, and measure it not; for it
hath been given unto the nations: and the holy city shall
they tread under foot forty and two months.
The second Woe is past: behold, the third Woe cometh
quickly.
And the seventh angel sounded; and there followed great
voices in heaven, and they said,
The kingdom of the world is become the kingdom of
our Lord, and of his Christ: and he shall reign for ever
and ever.
And the four and twenty elders, who sit before God on
their thrones, fell upon their faces and worshipped God,
saying,
We give thee thanks, O Lord God, the Almighty, who
art and who wast; because thou hast taken thy great
power, and didst reign. And the nations were wroth,
and thy wrath came, and the time of the dead to be
judged, and the time to give their reward to thy ser-
vants the prophets, and to the saints, and to them that
fear thy name, the small and the great; and to destroy
them that destroy the earth.REVELATION
THE
COMING
OF
THE
617
KINGDOM
And there was opened the temple of God that is in heaven;
and there was seen in his temple the ark of his covenant;
and there followed lightnings, and voices, and thunders, and
- an earthquake, and great hail.
And there was war in heaven: Michael and his angels
going forth to war with the dragon; and the dragon warred
and his angels; and they prevailed not, neither was their
place found any more in heaven. And the great dragon was
cast down, the old serpent, he that is called the Devil and
Satan, the deceiver of the whole world; he was cast down to
the earth, and his angels were cast down with him. And I
heard a great voice in heaven, saying,
:
Now is come the salvation, and the power, and the king-
dom of our God, and the authority of his Christ: for
the accuser of our brethren is cast down, who accuseth
them before our God day and night. And they over-
came him because of the blood of the Lamb, and because
of the word of their testimony; and they loved not
their life even unto death. Therefore rejoice, O heav-
ens, and ye that dwell in them. Woe for the earth and
for the sea: because the devil is gone down unto you,
having great wrath, knowing that he hath but a short
time.
And I saw a beast coming up out of the sea, having ten
horns and seven heads, and on his horns ten diadems, and
upon his heads names of blasphemy. And the beast which I
saw was like unto a leopard, and his feet were as the feet of
a bear, and his mouth as the mouth of a lion: and the dragon
gave him his power, and his throne, and great authority.
And I saw one of his heads as though it had been smitten
unto death; and his death-stroke was healed: and the whole
earth wondered after the beast; and they worshipped the
dragon, because he gave his authority unto the beast; and
they worshipped the beast, saying, Who is like unto the
beast ?and who is able to war with him? and there was given
to him a mouth speaking great things and blasphemies; and
there was given to him authority to continue forty and two
months. And he opened his mouth for blasphemies against
God, to blaspheme his name, and his tabernacle, even them618
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
that @well in the heaven. And it was given unto him to
make war with the saints, and to overcome them: and there
was given to him authority over every tribe and people and
tongue and nation. And all that dwell on the earth shall
worship him, every one whose name hath not been written
from the foundation of the world in the book of life of the -
Lamb that hath been slain. If any man hath an ear, let him
hear. If any man is for captivity, into captivity he goeth:
if any man shall kill with the sword, with the sword must
he be killed.
Here is the patience and the faith of the
saints.
And I saw another beast coming up out of the earth;
and he had two horns like unto a lamb, and he spake as a
dragon. And he exerciseth all the authority of the first
beast in his sight. And he maketh the earth and them
that dwell therein to worship the first beast, whose death-
stroke was healed.
And he doeth great signs, that he
should even make fire to come down out of heaven upon
the earth in the sight of men.
And he deceiveth them
that dwell on the earth by reason of the signs which it
was given him to do in the sight of the beast; saying to
them that dwell on the earth, that they should make an
image to the beast who hath the stroke of the sword and
lived. And it was given unto him to give breath to it,
even to the image of the beast, that the image of the beast
should both speak, and cause that as many as should not
worship the image of the beast should be killed. And he
causeth all, the small and the great, and the rich and the
poor, and the free and the bond, that there be given them
a mark on their right hand, or upon their forehead; and
that no man should be able to buy or to sell, save he that
hath the mark, even the name of the beast or the number
of his name.
Here is wisdom.
He that hath understand-
ing, let him count the number of the beast; for it is the
number of a man: and his number is Six hundred and
sixty and six.
And I saw, and behold, the Lamb standing on the
mount Zion, and with him a hundred and forty and four
thousand, having his name, and the name of his Father,
written on their foreheads.
And I heard a voice from
heaven, as the voice of many waters, and as the voice of aREVELATION
619
great thunder: and the voice which I heard was as the
voice of harpers harping with their harps: and they sing
as it were a new song before the throne, and before the
four living creatures and the elders: and no man could
learn the song save the hundred and forty and four thou-
sand, even they that had been purchased out of the earth.
And I saw another angel flying in mid heaven, having
eternal good tidings to proclaim unto them that dwell on
the earth, and unto every nation and tribe and tongue and
people; and he saith with a great voice, Fear God, and
give him’ glory; for the hour of his judgment is come:
and worship him that made the heaven and the earth and
sea and fountains of waters.
And another, a second angel, followed, saying, Fallen,
fallen is Babylon the great, that hath made all the nations
to drink of the wine of the wrath of her fornication.
And another angel, a third, followed them, saying with
a great voice, If any man worshippeth the beast and his
image, and receiveth a mark on his forehead, or upon his
hand, he also shall drink of the wine of the wrath of God,
which is prepared unmixed in the cup of his anger; and
he shall be tormented with fire and brimstone in the pres-
ence of the holy angels, and in the presence of the Lamb:
and the smoke of their torment goeth up for ever and
ever; and they have no rest day and night, they that wor-
ship the beast and his image, and whoso receiveth the mark
Here is the patience of the saints, they that
of his name.
keep the commandments of God, and the faith of Jesus.
And I heard a voice from heaven saying, Write, Blessed
are the dead who die in the Lord from henceforth: yea,
saith the Spirit, that they may rest from their labors; for
their works follow them.
And I saw, and behold, a white cloud; and on the cloud
I saw one sitting like unto a son of man, having on his
head a golden crown, and in his hand a sharp sickle. And
another angel came out from the temple, crying with a
great voice to him that sat on the cloud, Send forth thy
sickle, and reap: for the hour to reap is come; for the harvest
of the earth is ripe. And he that sat on the cloud cast his
sickle upon the earth; and the earth was reaped.
And another angel came out from the temple which is620
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
in heaven, he also having a sharp sickle. And another
angel came out from the altar, he that hath power over
fire; and he called with a great voice to him that had the
sharp sickle, saying, Send forth thy sharp sickle, and gather
the clusters of the vine of the earth; for her grapes are fully
ripe. And the angel cast his sickle into the earth, and gath-
ered the vintage of the earth, and cast it into the winepress,
the great winepress, of the wrath of God. And the wine-
press was trodden without the city, and there came out blood
from the winepress, even unto the bridles of the horses, as
far as a thousand and six hundred furlongs.
And I saw another sign in heaven, great and marvellous,
seven angels having seven plagues, which are the last, for in
them is finished the wrath of God.
And I saw as it were a sea of glass mingled with fire; and
them that come off victorious from the beast, and from his
image, and from the number of his name, standing by the sea
of glass, having harps of God. And they sing the song of
Moses the servant of God, and the song of the Lamb, saying,
Great and marvellous are thy works, O Lord God, the
Almighty; righteous and true are thy ways, thou King
of the ages. Who shall not fear, O Lord, and glorify
thy name? for thou only are holy; for all the nations
shall come and worship before thee; for thy righteous
acts have been made manifest.
THE
SEVEN
GOLDEN BOWLS
OF WRATH
JUDGMENT
UPON BABYLON
AND
THE
And after these things I saw, and the temple of the taber-
nacle of the testimony in heaven was opened: and there came
out from the temple the seven angels that had the seven
plagues, arrayed with precious stone, pure and bright, and
girt about their breasts with golden girdles. And one of
the four living creatures gave unto the seven angels seven
golden bowls full of the wrath of God, who liveth for ever
and ever. And the temple was filled with smoke from the
glory of God, and from his power; and none was able to
enter into the temple, till the seven plagues of the seven
angels should be finished.
And I heard a great voice out of the temple, saying to theREVELATION
621
seven angels, Go ye, and pour aut the seven bowls of the
wrath of God into the earth.
After these things I saw another angel coming down out
of heaven, having great authority; and the earth was light-
ened with his glory.. And he cried with a mighty voice, say-
ing, Fallen, fallen is Babylon -the great, and is become a
habitation of demons, and a hold of every unclean spirit, and
a hold of every unclean and hateful bird.
For by the wine
of the wrath of her fornication all the nations are fallen;
and the kings of the earth committed fornication with her,
and the merchants of the earth waxed rich by the power of
her wantonness.
And I heard another voice from heaven, saying, Come
forth, my people, out of her, that ye have no fellowship with
her sins, and that ye receive not of her plagues: for her sins
have reached even unto heaven, and God hath remembered
her iniquities. Render unto her even as she rendered, and
double unto her the double according to her works: in the
cup which she mingled, mingle unto her double. How much
soever she glorified herself, and waxed wanton, so much give
her of torment and mourning: for she saith in her heart, I
sit a queen, and am no widow, and shall in no wise see
‘Therefore in one day shall her plagues come,
mourning.
death, and mourning, and famine; and she shall be utterly
burned with fire; for strong is the Lord God who judged
her. And the kings of the earth, who committed fornica-
tion and lived wantonly with her, shall weep and wail over
her, when they look upon the smoke of her burning, standing
afar off for the fear of her torment, saying, Woe, woe, the
great city, Babylon, the strong city! for in one hour is thy
judgment come. And the merchants of the earth weep and
mourn over her, for no man buyeth their merchandise any
more; merchandise of gold, and silver, and precious stone,
and pearls, and fine linen, and purple, and silk, and scarlet;
and all thyine wood, and every vessel of ivory, and every
vessel made of most precious wood, and of brass, and iron,
and marble; and cinnamon, and spice, and incense, and oint-
ment, and frankincense, and wine, and oil, and fine flour, and
wheat, and cattle, and sheep; and merchandise of horses and
chariots and slaves; and souls of men. And the fruits which
‘thy soul lusted after are gone from thee, and all things that622
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
were dainty and sumptuous are perished from thee, and men
shall find them no more at all. The merchants of these
things, who were made rich by her, shall stand afar off for
the fear of her torment, weeping and mourning; saying,
Woe, woe, the great city, she that was arrayed in fine linen
and purple and scarlet, and‘decked with gold and precious
stone and pearl! for in one hour so great riches is made deso-
late. And every shipmaster, and every one that saileth any
whither, and mariners, and as many as gain their living by
sea, stood afar off, and cried out as they looked upon the
smoke of her burning, saying, What city is like the great
city? And they cast dust on their heads, and cried, weeping
and mourning, saying, Woe, woe, the great city, wherein all
that had their ships in the sea were made rich by reason of
her costliness! for in one hour is she made desolate. Rejoice
over her, thou heaven, and ye saints, and ye apostles, and ye
prophets; for God hath judged your judgment on her.
And a strong angel took up a stone as it were a great mill-
stone and cast it into the sea, saying, Thus with a mighty fall
shall Babylon, the great city, be cast down, and shall be
found no more at all. And the voice of harpers and min-
strels and flute-players and trumpeters shall be heard no
more at all in thee; and no craftsman, of whatsoever craft,
shall be found any more at all in thee; and the voice of a
mill shall be heard no more at all in thee; and the light of a
lamp shall shine no more at all in thee; and the voice of the
bridegroom and of the bride shall be heard no more at all in
thee: for thy merchants were the princes of the earth; for
with thy sorcery were all the nations deceived. And in her
was found the blood of prophets and of saints, and of all
that have been slain upon the earth.
After these things I heard as it were a great voice of a
great multitude in heaven, saying,
Hallelujah; Salvation, and glory, and power, belong to
our God: for true and righteous are his judgments; for
he hath judged the great harlot, her that corrupted the
earth with her fornication, and he hath avenged the
blood of his servants at her hand.
And a second time they say, Hallelujah. And her smoke
goeth up for ever and ever. And the four and twenty eldersREVELATION
623
and the four living creatures fell down and worshipped God
that sitteth on the throne, saying, Amen; Hallelujah.
THE
WORD
OF
GOD
AND THE
OPENING
BOOK OF LIFE
OF
THE
And a voice came forth from the throne, saying,
Give praise to our God, all ye his servants, ye that fear
him, the small and the great.
And I heard as it were the voice of a great multitude, and
as the voice of many waters, and as the voice of mighty
thunders, saying,
Hallelujah: for the Lord our God, the Almighty, reign-
eth. Let us rejoice and be exceeding glad, and let us
give the glory unto him: for the marriage of the Lamb
is come, and his wife hath made herself ready. And it
was given unto her that she should array herself in fine
linen, bright and pure: for the fine linen is the righteous
acts of the saints.
And he saith unto me, Write, Blessed are they that are
bidden to the marriage supper of the Lamb. And he saith
unto me, These are true words of God. And I fell down
before his feet to worship him. And he saith unto me, See
thou do it not: I am a fellow-servant with thee and with thy
brethren that hold the testimony of Jesus: worship God: for
the testimony of Jesus is the spirit of prophecy.
And I saw the heaven opened; and behold, a white horse,
and he that sat thereon called Faithful and True; and in
righteousness he doth judge and make war. And his eyes are
a flame of fire, and upon his head are many diadems; and he
hath a name written which no one knoweth but he himself.
And he is arrayed in a garment sprinkled with blood: and
his name is called The Word of God. And the armies which
are in heaven followed him upon white horses, clothed in fine
linen, white and pure. And out of his mouth proceedeth a
sharp sword, that with it he should smite the nations: and
he shall rule them with a rod of iron: and he treadeth the
winepress of the fierceness of the wrath of God, the Al-
mighty. And he hath on his garments and on his thigh a
name written, KING OF KINGS, AND LORD OF
LORDS.624
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
And I saw an angel standing in the sun; and he cried with
a loud voice, saying to all the birds that fly in mid heaven,
Come and be gathered together unto the great supper of
God; that ye may eat the flesh of kings, and the flesh of
captains, and the flesh of mighty men, and the flesh of horses
and of them that sit thereon, and the flesh of all men, both
free and bond, and small and great.
And I saw the beast, and the kings of the earth, and their
armies, gathered together to make war against him that sat
upon the horse, and against his army. And the beast was
taken, and with him the false prophet that wrought the signs
in his sight, wherewith he deceived them that had received
the mark of the beast and them that worshipped his image:
they two were cast alive into the lake of fire that burneth
with brimstone: and the rest were killed with the sword of
him that sat upon the horse, even the sword which came
forth out of his mouth: and all the birds were filled with
their flesh.
And I saw an angel coming down out of heaven, having
the keys of the abyss and a great chain in his hand. And he
laid hold on the dragon, the old serpent, which is the Devil
and Satan, and bound him for a thousand years, and cast
him into the abyss, and shut it, and sealed it over him, that
he should deceive the nations no more, until the thousand
years should be finished: after this he must be loosed for a
little time.
And I saw thrones, and they sat upon them, and judgment
was given unto them: and I saw the souls of them that had
been beheaded for the testimony of Jesus, and for the word
of God, and such as worshipped not the beast, neither his
image, and received not the mark upon their forehead and
upon their hand; and they lived, and reigned with Christ, a
thousand years. The rest of the dead lived not until the
thousand years should be finished. This is the first resur-
rection. Blessed and holy is he that hath part in the first
resurrection: over these the second death hath no power;
but they shall be priests of God and of Christ, and shall
reign with him a thousand years.
And when the thousand years are finished, Satan shall be
loosed out of his prison, and shall come forth to deceive the
nations which are in the four corners of the earth, Gog andREVELATION
625
Magog, to gather them together to the war: the number of
whom is as the sand of the sea. And they went up over the
breadth of the earth, and compassed the camp of the saints
about, and the beloved city: and fire came down out of
heaven, and devoured them.
And the devil that deceived
them was cast into the lake of fire and brimstone, where are
also the beast and the false prophet; and they shall be tor-
mented day and night for ever and ever.
And I saw a great white throne, and him that sat upon it,
from whose face the earth and the heaven fled away; and
there was found no place for them. And I saw the dead, the
great and the small, standing before the throne; and books
were opened: and another book was opened, which is the
book of life: and the dead were judged out of the things
which were written in the books, according to their works.
And the sea gave up the dead that were in it; and death ana
Hades gave up the dead that were in them: and they were
judged every man according to their works. And death and
Hades were cast into the lake of fire. This is the second
death, even the lake of fire. And if any was not found writ-
ten in the book of life, he was cast into the lake of fire.
THE
VISION
OF
THE
NEW
JERUSALEM
And I saw a new heaven and a new earth: for the first
heaven and the first earth are passed away; and the sea is no
more. And I saw the holy city, new Jerusalem, coming down
out of heaven from God, made ready as a bride adorned for
her husband. And I heard a great voice out of the throne,
saying, Behold, the tabernacle of God is with men, and he
shall dwell with them, and they shall be his peoples, and
God himself shall be with them, and be their God: and he
shall wipe away every tear from their eyes; and death shall
be no more; neither shall there be mourning, nor crying, nor
And he
pain, any more: the first things are passed away.
that sitteth on the throne said, Behold, I make all things
new. And he saith, Write: for these words are faithful and
true. . And he said unto me, They are come to pass. I am
the Alpha and the Omega, the beginning and the end. I
will give unto him that is athirst of the fountain of the water
of life freely. He that overcometh shall inherit these things;626
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
and I will be his God, and he shall be my son. But for the
fearful, and unbelieving, and abominable, and murderers,
and fornicators, and sorcerers, and idolaters, and all liars,
their part shall be in the lake that burneth with fire and
brimstone; which is the second death.
And there came one of the seven angels who had the seven
bowls, who were laden with the seven last plagues; and he
spake with me, saying, Come hither, I will show thee the
bride, the wife of the Lamb. And he carried me away in the
Spirit to a mountain great and high, and showed me the holy
city Jerusalem, coming down out of heaven from God, hav-
ing the glory of God: her light was like unto a stone most
precious, as it were a jasper stone, clear as crystal: having a
wall great and high; having twelve gates, and at the gates
twelve angels; and names written thereon, which are the
names of the twelve tribes of the children of Israel: on the
east were three gates; and on the north three gates; and on
the south three gates; and on the west three gates. And the
wall of the city had twelve foundations, and on them twelve
names of the twelve apostles of the Lamb.
And he that
spake with me had for a measure a golden reed to measure
the city, and the gates thereof, and the wall thereof. And
the city lieth foursquare, and the length thereof is as great as
the breadth: and he measured the city with the reed, twelve
thousand furlongs: the length and the breadth and the height
thereof are equal. And he measured the wall thereof, a hun-
dred and forty and four cubits, according to the measure of
a man, that is, of an angel. And the building of the wall
thereof was jasper: and the city was pure gold, like unto
pure glass. The foundations of the wall of the city were
adorned with all manner of precious stones. The first foun-
dation was jasper; the second, sapphire; the third, chalce-
dony; the fourth, emerald; the fifth, sardonyx; the sixth,
sardius; the seventh, chrysolite; the eighth, beryl; the ninth,
topaz; the tenth, chrysoprase; the eleventh, jacinth; the
twelfth, amethyst. And the twelve gates were twelve pearls;
each one of the several gates was of one pearl: and the street
of the city was pure gold, as it were transparent glass. And
I saw no temple therein: for the Lord God the Almighty,
and the Lamb, are the temple thereof. And the city hath no
need of the sun, neither of the moon, to shine upon it: forREVELATION
627
the glory of God did lighten it, and the lamp thereof is the
Lamb. And the nations shall walk amidst the light thereof:
and the kings of the earth bring their glory into it. And the
gates thereof shall in no wise be shut by day (for there shall
be no night there): and they shall bring the glory and the
honor of the nations into it: and there shall in no wise enter
into it anything unclean, or he that maketh an abomination
and a lie: but only they that are written in the Lamb’s book
of life. And he showed me a river of water of life, bright as
crystal, proceeding out of the throne of God and of the
Lamb, in the midst of the street thereof. And on this side of
the river and on that was the tree of life, bearing twelve
manner of fruits, yielding its fruit every month: and the
leaves of the tree were for the healing of the nations. And
there shall be no curse any more: and the throne of God and
of the Lamb shall be therein: and his servants shall serve
him; and they shall see his face; and his name shall be on
their foreheads. And there shall be night no more; and they
need no light of lamp, neither light of sun; for the Lord God
shall give them light: and they shall reign for ever and ever.
And he said unto me, These words are faithful and true:
and the Lord, the God of the spirits of the prophets, sent his
angel to show unto his servants the things which must shortly
come to pass. And behold, I come quickly. Blessed is he
that keepeth the words of the prophecy of this book.
And I John am he that heard and saw these’ things. And
when I heard and saw, I -fell down to worship before the feet
unto
of the angel that showed me these things. And he saith
and
me, See thou do it not: I am a fellow-servant with thee
the
keep
that
them
with
and
,
prophets
the
with thy brethren
words of this book: worship God.
And he saith unto me, Seal not up the words of the proph-
is un-
ecy of this book; for the time is at hand. He that
is
that
he
and
still:
ess
teousn
unrigh
do
righteous, let him
us,
righteo
is
that
he
and
filthy, let him be made filthy still:
holy, let him be
let him do righteousness still: and he that is
my reward is
and
;
y
made holy still. Behold, I come quickl
work is. I
his
as
ng
accordi
man
each
to
with me, to render
the be-
last,
the
and
am the Alpha and the Omega, the first
robes,
their
wash
that
they
are
Blessed
ginning and the end.628
THE
NEW
TESTAMENT
that they may have the right to come to the tree of life, and
may enter in by the gates into the city. Without are the
dogs, and the sorcerers, and the fornicators, and the murder-
ers, and the idolaters, and every one that loveth and maketh
a lie.
I Jesus have sent mine angel to testify unto you these
things for the churches. I am the root and the offspring of
David, the bright, the morning star.
And the Spirit and the bride say, Come.
And he that
heareth, let him say, Come. And he that is athirst, let him
come: he that will, let him take the water of life freely.
